Authors
James Kendrick
Number of Reviews
39

Title
Review for Tarzan and the Lost City (1998)
Director: Carl Schenkel || Screenplay: Bayard Johnson and J.
Anderson Black || Stars: Casper Van Dien (Tarzan), Jane March
(Jane Porter), Steven Waddington (Nigel Ravens) || MPAA Rating:
PG
"Tarzan and the Lost City" is one of the most anemic movies to
come out in quite a while. Not only it is poorly written, badly
acted, and generally incompetent in all cinematic areas, it is
thoroughly uninspired and insipid.
Unfortunately, it's not bad in the way great, colossal misfires
like "Heaven's Gate" (1980) or "Ishtar" (1987) were bad. 
Instead, it literally drips off the screen like a movie nobody
wanted to be associated with, which begs the question of why it
was made in the first place. With all the good scripts lying
around Hollywood un-produced, how does needless drek like this
make its way to the big screen?
Of course, Tarzan is one of the most filmed characters in all of
motion picture history - he has appeared in over forty films,
which have ranged from the very good (1984's "Greystoke: The
Legend of Tarzan, Lord of the Apes") down to the really bad
(1981's "Tarzan, the Ape Man" with Bo Derek). Most of these films
were just cheapie B-movies made in the thirties and forties,
starring ex-Olympic athletes and a lot of cutsie chimps.
Therefore, if another Tarzan movie is to be made, one might
assume that it would have something new to offer - a different
angle, an original storyline, anything to set it apart from all
the others. "Greystoke" added a never-before-seen level of
realism to the pulpy tale, and even "Tarzan, the Ape Man" at
least had the mis-guided audacity to sexualize the story as a
vehicle for Bo Derek's bare breasts.
"Tarzan and the Lost City," on the other hand, has absolutely
nothing to offer but a bunch of recycled storylines and bad
dialogue. The script, by Bayard Johnson and J. Anderson Black is
about as formulaic and generic as they come. Comic books have
better plots than this. The movie is so bad, in fact, that it
retains that ridiculous Tarzan call that was so tirelessly mocked
in last summer's comedy "George of the Jungle." Didn't the
producers think to leave that back in the old Weissmuller
pictures where it belongs?
The story starts with the legend of Tarzan already firmly
established: a quick opening narration tells of Tarzan (Casper
Van Dien) being found in the jungle after having been raised by
apes, and his return to England where he assumes his Greystoke
heritage. When the movie starts in 1913, he is a civilized
English gentleman (without an English accent), and he is to marry
Jane (Jane March) in less than a week.
However, when a wicked archeologist/grave-robber named Nigel
Ravens (Steve Waddington) begins hunting for the fabled lost City
of Opar, one of Africa's last great secrets, the witch doctor of
an ancient African tribe summons Tarzan back to the jungle. At
first, Jane refuses to go, pouting about how it will interfere
with their wedding; but after Tarzan leaves she changes her mind
and tracks him down, therefore assuring lots of lame smooch
scenes between her and her ape-man.
Once the film gets going (in its own sluggish way), it delves
into a series of jungle adventures, as Tarzan, Jane, and the
natives attempt the thwart Ravens and his crew from discovering
the city. Most of the so-called adventures are cheesy,
predictable, and unexciting, with no pace, tension, or action to
speak of. There are sequences stolen from innumerable recent
adventure movies, ranging from "Raiders of the Lost Ark" (1981)
to "The Goonies" (1985). When the movie is running short on
action, it includes a few Greenpeace-friendly scenes of Tarzan
freeing caged animals, releasing a baby elephant from a trap, and
throwing ivory tusks into the river.
The movie is also lacking even a remote hint of reality. For
instance, when Tarzan - who was raised in the jungle - is bit by
a cobra, he doesn't even attempt to suck the venom out like any
semi-experienced weekend backpacker would do. Instead, he ties a
tourniquet around his arm and stumbles off into the jungle with
no plan for survival.
Of course, one can't help but notice how fundamentally misleading
the title is. Not to ruin the ending or anything, but there is no
lost city. There is, however, a lost pyramid, which I suppose is
all the resource-strapped FX department could come up with (the
special effects are not worthy of a made-for-TV movie). Which
also brings up the question of why the treasure hunters had to
slog through numerous underground caverns to get to the lost
pyramid, when it's sitting right out in the middle of an open
field?
Strictly speaking, "Tarzan and the Lost City" isn't even bad
enough to have camp quality, although Casper Van Dien's laughably
stiff performance comes real close. This movie proves what
"Starship Troopers" only hinted at: he cannot act, but he sure
looks well-groomed, even in the deepest heart of the African
jungle. Van Dien is much too much of a pretty-boy to be an
effective Tarzan; he's a Calvin Klein model in a loin cloth. I
also wondered what the make-up department was thinking when it
outfitted him with that awful circa-1983 Steve Perry haircut.
Waddington makes a decent villain, although he's like a charmless
version of Belloq from "Raiders of the Lost Ark." As Jane, the
ex-model Jane March has little to do but smile and look pretty
next to Tarzan. She does fire off a gun at the evil treasure
hunters a time or two, but whenever a snake comes into the
picture, she is reduced to a hysterical mess.
However, amidst all this complaining, I do have one piece of good
news. "Tarzan and the Lost City" is so lacking in ideas both new
and old, that it is unable to fill even an hour and a half of
celluloid. So, we can say this much for it: at least it had the
decency to be short.

Title
Review for Godzilla (1998)
Director: Roland Emmerich || Screenplay: Dean Devlin and Roland Emmerich (based
on the character Godzilla, owned and created by the Toho Company Ltd.) || Stars:
Matthew Broderick (Dr. Niko Tatopoulos), Jean Reno (Philippe Roache), Maria
Pitillo (Audrey Timmonds), Hank Azaria (Victor "Animal" Palotti), Kevin Dunn
(Colonel Hicks), Michael Lerner (Mayor Ebert), Harry Shearer (Charles Caiman),
Arabella Field (Lucy Palotti), Vicki Lewis (Dr. Elsie Chapman) || MPAA Rating:
PG-13
More than forty years and some two-dozen movies after he first raised his huge
reptilian head in the 1954 Japanese monster flick "Gojira," Godzilla is back,
courtesy of the director / producer team of Roland Emmerich and Dean Devlin, the
sci-fi twosome that last blew theater speakers out with massive alien
destruction in "Independence Day" (1996). Leaner, meaner, faster, and sleeker,
this late 90's reinterpretation of the normally dumpy, rubbery monster is
certainly a sight to behold, although his sheer size is almost too overwhelming.
Even though his earlier incarnations were laughably fake, the Godzilla of the
original Japanese movie had personality. In fact, audiences took such a liking
to him, that most of his later films switched him to the role of the good guy,
where instead of destroying Tokyo for mean-spirited purposes, he did it in the
services of saving the city folk from other monsters far more fearsome.
Devlin and Emmerich's Godzilla is no such creature. The result of French nuclear
testing in the South Pacific, he's a bad-to-the-bone animalistic aberration of
nature who rampages through New York City not once, not twice, but three times,
laying to waste such landmarks as the Chrysler Building, the Brooklyn Bridge,
and Madison Square Garden. And, whatever Godzilla doesn't destroy, the U.S. Army
does in its often ill-fated attempts to kill him.
Much has been made about what Godzilla looks like. The advertisements, which
have been running for a year now, purposely kept his physical look a secret (I
already knew what he looked like before I saw the movie, not because I have
inside connections, but because I saw a toy replica on the rack in a grocery
store several days ago - so much for the big unveiling). The new Godzilla, which
is brought completely to life by impeccable digital imagery, looks like a
combination of a really big T-Rex and the Rancor from "Return of the Jedi."
Square-headed and very nimble, he's so large the camera can rarely contain his
entirety in one shot.
The script, more or less written by Devlin and Emmerich, is nothing but a thin
rack on which to hang the non-stop orgy of destruction. In the leads, the
screenplay offers us two thoroughly blasé characters portrayed by Matthew
Broderick and Maria Pitillo, both of whom act so chipper and wide-eyed in their
amazement that they become the film's chief liability.
Broderick plays Dr. Niko Tatopoulos, and before you ask, "where the hell did
they come up with that clumsy name," it was borrowed from Patrick Tatopoulos,
the designer of the new Godzilla. Broderick is a scientist working for the U.S.
Nuclear Regulatory Commission by studying the growth effects of the Chernobyl
accident on earth worms. Pitillo plays Audrey Timmonds, Broderick's ex-college
sweetheart, now an aspiring TV newscaster (aren't they all in the movies these
days?)
The screenplay also throws in a lot of incompetent military personnel, Jean Reno
("The Professional," "Mission: Impossible") as a charismatic French secret
service agent, and Michael Lerner as the obnoxious Mayor Ebert, who is most
likely an unsubtle stab at movie critic Roger Ebert (Lerner is even seen briefly
in an election advertisement poster with the patented "thumbs up"). One of the
more likable characters is Victor "Animal" Palotti (Hank Azaria), a gung-ho TV
cameraman who has more personality that Broderick and Pitillo combined.
However, any and all of these characters function as little more than human ants
constantly running from Godzilla's carnage. And what carnage it is. Starting
with an early attack on a large Japanese ship, Godzilla proceeds to pull a fleet
of three American fishing boats under the sea, before exploding out of the
Hudson River and demolishing most of New York. For those who don't particularly
care for the Big Apple, watching it get tossed and bashed by the giant lizard is
a vicarious treat for the first fifteen minutes. But destruction without real
emotional implication gets tiresome after a while, which is all that fills most
of "Godzilla's" overlong running time.
About two-thirds of the way through the movie, Emmerich suddenly switches gears
and develops a long sequence inside the ruins of Madison Square Garden that is
almost worthy of the hype surrounding "Godzilla." Ironically, the scene doesn't
include the titular big guy, but rather 200 snapping offspring. It turns out the
Godzilla has some amazing reproductive capabilities, and he decided to make the
Knicks' home court into his personal nest.
Broderick and Co. arrive on the scene just in time for all the eggs to hatch,
releasing some 200 nine-foot Godzilla clones that look, move, and sound almost
exactly like the velociraptors in Steven Spielberg's "Jurassic Park" (1993). The
chase inside the Garden plays like a combination of the scenes in the visitor's
center in "Jurassic Park" and queen's nest sequence in James Cameron's "Aliens"
(1986). It's tribute to the superiority of those films over this one that
"Godzilla's" best scenes are almost directly stolen from them.
But, even if they aren't particularly original, they're still extraordinarily
effective. The baby Godzillas exude real menace, and the entire sequence inside
Madison Square Garden is suspenseful, creatively staged, and creates a palpable
sense of danger - basically everything that had been missing from the first half
of the film.


Title
Review for Horse Whisperer, The (1998)
Director: Robert Redford || Screenplay: Richard LaGravenese and Eric Roth (based
on the novel by Nicholas Evans) || Stars: Robert Redford (Tom Booker), Kristin
Scott Thomas (Annie MacLean), Scarlett Johansson (Grace MacLean), Sam Neill
(Robert MacLean), Dianne Wiest (Diane Booker), Chris Cooper (Frank Booker),
Cherry Jones (Liz Hammond) || MPAA Rating: PG-13
Robert Redford is very good at playing characters who have incredible, God-given
gifts, but are able to act like ordinary people. In "The Natural" (1984), he
played the fallen angelic character of Roy Hobbs, the baseball player who was
destined to be "the best there ever was," but still acted like a humble farm
boy. In "Butch Cassidy and the Sundance Kid" (1969), he was the most dangerous
shot in the West, yet he came off like a nothing more than a boyishly
good-looking charmer. Even in "Indecent Proposal" (1993), where he played a man
who was so good at making money that he believed he could buy love, Redford was
still able to exude an aura of shy decency, especially when reciting a tale of
lost love.
In his latest film, "The Horse Whisperer," based on the best-selling novel by
Nicholas Evans, Redford again plays such a character. Redford also directed the
film although he swore up and down that he would never direct himself in a movie
- I suppose the character of Tom Booker, a man who has the amazing gift of
understanding and somehow communicating with horses, was just too good to pass
up. Despite his enormous and rare gift when it comes to training troubled horses
(a magazine article coins the phrase "horse whisperer" to describe his uncanny
talent), Booker sees himself as an everyday cattle rancher whose greatest fear
is growing old and no longer having a purpose in life.
Booker's talents are taxed into service by Annie MacLean (Kristin Scott Thomas),
a New York magazine editor whose daughter, Grace (Scarlett Johansson), was
recently in a horrible accident. The accident, which is filmed with
gut-wrenching horror, happens when Grace and her best friend are out riding
horses - an eighteen-wheeler kills Grace's friend, severely wounds and
traumatizes Grace's horse, Pilgrim, and causes Grace to lose part of her right
leg.
Annie believes that if Pilgrim can be healed, Grace will be healed as well,
which leads her to Booker. At first, she tries to get Booker to come to New York
to see the horse, but that doesn't work. Instead, she packs up Grace and
Pilgrim, leaves her husband, Robert (Sam Neill) behind, and heads for the
rolling hills of Montana where Booker runs a ranch with his brother, Frank
(Chris Cooper), and his sister-in-law, Diane (Dianne Wiest).
In many ways, the film is like a journey, both literally and symbolically. The
move out West has always been a great American tradition of renewal, and it's
hard not to see Annie and Grace's leaving Manhattan for Montana as a variation
on the classic theme of city vs. country. In "The Horse Whisperer," country is
clearly the victor. The city is characterized by claustrophobia and unhappiness,
and it is not until the characters arrive in the wide-open spaces of Montana
that Grace's anger at being physically and emotionally crippled begins to
dissipate, Annie's controlling nature begins to relax, and Pilgrim once again
learns to trust people.
Redford is just as in love with the grand Montana country in this film as he was
when he directed "A River Runs Through It" six years ago. In many ways, "The
Horse Whisperer" comes from the same poetic vein as "River," and the movie could
probably be a good fifteen minutes shorter if Redford had decided to spend less
camera-time on the grass and mountains. But then, that would ruin the magic.
Much of the film's photography is truly elegant, and it creates a palpable sense
of the sheer expansiveness of the land. To further emphasize this, Redford and
cinematographer Robert Richardson ("Natural Born Killers," "Platoon") cheated a
bit by shooting the beginning of the film - which takes place in New York - with
mostly cold, harsh bluish filters and a more squarish 1.85:1 aspect ratio; when
the action shifts to Montana, Richardson switches to soft-focus and natural
lighting, and the screen widens to a 2.35:1 aspect ratio.
In terms of the story itself, "The Horse Whisperer" gives us the same
romanticized view of adultery found in  David Lean's "A Brief Encounter" (1945)
and Clint Eastwood's 1995 adaptation of Robert James Waller's "The Bridges of
Madison County" (Richard LaGravenese, co-screenwriter here also adapted
"Bridges"). Although "The Horse Whisperer" has a strong romantic sensibility, I
still find something oddly troubling about this kind of story. It seems to me
that there should be some sympathy for the husband who's being left behind for
this brief, heart-sweeping affair, but there rarely is.
In "The Horse Whisperer," the thankless role of being the fuddy-duddy husband
falls to Sam Neill. He plays the character as a decent, hard-working man who is
a good husband and father; his only failure is that he loves his wife more than
she loves him. He is at risk of losing Annie to Booker not because he did
anything to drive her away, but simply because he happens to be a normal, fairly
uninspiring man.
There is one scene that is particularly telling of how the movie feels about
each character. It shows Booker and Robert going into a horse pen - Booker is
dressed like a classic cowboy with hat and all, while Robert looks somewhat
frumpy and out-of-place in a baseball cap. As they enter the pen, Booker
assuredly swings over the fence, while Robert hesitates, then opens the gate
and, in a goofy moment, forgets to close it behind him. It's a small scene, but
it clearly demonstrates the movie's thorough love of the Booker character for
his romantic roughness. After all, Booker represents everything good about the
city while Robert represents everything banal and unnatural about it.
The best scenes in "The Horse Whisperer" tend to involve not the building
romance between Booker and Annie, but rather the healing process of Grace and
her horse. Although Booker's horse-training methods are mythical and
unrealistic, the scenes with him and Pilgrim are strangely mesmerizing. These
are paralleled by the scenes between him and Grace, some of which are humorous,
and all of which are tender and true. At some point, I wished the movie would
drop the whole romance angle and focus on Grace more.
Nevertheless, Redford is obviously a romantic at heart, and he brings a light
touch to the erotic moments in the film. There are no dramatic sex scenes, but
there is a moving scene when he and Scott Thomas are slow-dancing, always moving
ever closer together, that is far more erotic than any scene of sweaty bodies
grinding together. Although the movie is longer than it should be and is
essentially a melodramatic tearjerker with an unsatisfying conclusion that
guarantees unhappiness for just about every character, there are enough moments
like that which make "The Horse Whisperer" worth the price of admission.


Title
Review for Lancelot du Lac (1974)
Lancelot du Lac (Lancelot du Lac)  (France, 1974)
a film review by James Kendrick
director: Robert Bresson
screenwriter: Robert Bresson (based on the epic poem by Chretien De
Troyes)
stars: Luc Simon (Lancelot), Laura Duke Condominas (Queen Guinevere),
Vladimir Antolek-Oresek (King Arthur), Humbert Balsan (Gawain), Patrick
Bernhard (Modred), Arthur De Montalembert (Lionel)
MPAA rating: Not Rate
Review: *** (out of ****)
Uncompromising French director Robert Bresson's "Lancelot of the Lake"
achieves the exact opposite effect of Sir Thomas Malory's "Morte
Darthur." Instead of enshrining the legend of King Arthur and his
Knights of the Round Table, it dethrones them by revealing Arthur as a
weak, ineffectual leader and the Knights as a group of jealous,
bickering men who failed to live up to the legends prescribed to them.
Chivalry has no place in "Lancelot of the Lake," except as that of a
dying ideal.
Bresson begins his tale as the Knights of the Round Table are returning,
decimated, after failing Merlin's command to retrieve the Holy Grail,
the mystical cup that was filled with Christ's blood. Bresson
immediately gives us his impression of the essential meaning of the
Grail quest: bloodshed and failure. The opening sequence is a series of
clumsy, disjointed fights amongst anonymous knights -- a head is hacked
off, a stomach is impaled, a skull is split open, skeletal remains hang
from trees, and burning bodies smolder in the ruins of a flaming house.
Since the film starts with Camelot in near-ruin, and takes only an hour
and a half to arrive at its inevitable conclusion, it doesn't carry the
grand, tragic resonance of other Arthurian films. We never get to see
Camelot at the peak of its power, therefore there is no real downfall to
witness.
But, then again, it is not the name of Camelot that is evoked in the
title of the film. Rather, it is Lancelot, and Bresson is more
interested in the internal battle within his heart, than the external
downfall of a kingdom. Lancelot has always been a tragic figure in the
Arthurian tales, and Bresson uses him as the central figure to explore
the battle between the spirit and the flesh. The greatest of all
knights, he was flawed only in his love for Arthur's wife, Queen
Guinevere, and it was that illicit affair that eventually caused the
downfall of Camelot.
Even when Lancelot attempts to end the affair with Guinevere (Laura Duke
Condominas), he only finds himself falling back into her arms against
his better judgment. He knows it means the destruction of the idealized
kingdom , but he is powerless in his passion. When Sir Mordred (Patrick
Bernhard) accuses Lancelot of the affair, other knights, including Sir
Gawain (Humbert Balsan) spring to Lancelot's defense. It is this battle
within the Knights that is the eventual undoing of the Round Table; the
flesh wins out over the spirit, and the consequences are dire.
Bresson is an intensely personal filmmaker most interested in the
interiors of men's hearts and minds. "Lancelot of the Lake" is filled
with his particular trademarks: a stripped-down, minimalist style, flat,
expressionless dialogue, and a grand use of natural sounds in place of
music. He uses background music only twice in the film, during an
opening narration segment and during the opening credits. The music here
is a heavy drumbeat and accompanying bagpipes, but the rest of the film
is scored with natural sounds that punctuate the film's thematic
elements: the incessant clanking and creaking of heavy armor, the
neighing of horses, the rhythm of hooves beating down dirt roads, and
the natural chirping and whispering of the forest.
Like most of his other films, Bresson employed nonprofessional actors
who recite the dialogue in emotionless, flat voices. All the actors he
used in "Lancelot of the Lake" had never acted before, and with the
exception of Patrick Bernhard, they never acted again. Never once do
they raise their voices or put any emphasis on a given word. Instead of
using vocal inflection, Bresson strove to create emotion through images.
In some ways, this technique works; in other ways, it doesn't. The final
montage of Arthur's men battling each other is quite marvelous, and the
final image of the knights in shining armor reduced to a literal
scrap-pile sums up the entire film in one moment. However, other times
Bresson's uncompromising methods are distracting and questionable. For
instance, during an important jousting contest, Bresson films the
majority of the action so that the only things visible are the horses'
legs. He does this repeatedly, opening each shot with the same few notes
from a bagpipe and the raising of a different flag. While there might be
symbolic value in this, the resulting experience of watching it can be
bothersome.
Nevertheless, "Lancelot of the Lake" is a fascinating cinematic
experience boldly made by a master filmmaker. Bresson's style may not be
for everyone, but one has to respect his strength as an artist. By
re-evaluating the Arthurian legends and making them his own, he turns
"Lancelot of the Lake" into something rare in modern cinema: a truly
personal film.


Title
Review for I, the Jury (1982)
Director: Richard T. Heffron /
Screenplay: Larry Cohen (based on the novel by Mickey Spillane) /
Stars: Armand Assante (Mike Hammer), Barbara Carrera (Dr.
Charlotte Bennett), Laurene Landon (Velda), Alan King (Charles
Kalecki), Geoffrey Lewis (Joe Butler), Paul Sorvino (Detective
Pat Chambers), Judson Scott (Charles Hendricks), Barry Snider
(Romero), Julia Barr (Norma Childs) /
MPAA Rating: R /
Review: *1/2 (out of ****)
In the 1982 updating of Mickey Spillane's 1947 novel "I, The
Jury," hard-boiled detective Mike Hammer is a Vietnam vet who
drives a shiny bronze Trans Am, dresses like Don Johnson in
"Miami Vice" with less pastels, and has sworn off alcohol.
However, he still smokes his Lucky Strikes, detests all forms of
authority, and kills at a whim. Beyond that, the updated film
retains little or no resemblance to the original pulpy
page-turner by Spillane, probably the most infamous and often
reviled of all mystery writers.
The movie starts off with a bang: a howler of an opening credits
sequence that is a cheap steal from the James Bond series,
complete with cheesy graphics and an overbearing jazz score by
Bill Conti ("Rocky"). After that, the movie and the book begin
the same, with the murder of Jack Williams (Frederick Downs), a
one-armed detective and Hammer's best friend. Hammer declares
that he will seek vengeance for Jack's death, and with the help
of his devoted secretary, the blond and shapely Velda (Laurene
Landon), and the alternately friendly / antagonistic police chief
Pat Chambers (Paul Sorvino), he is immediately on the killer's
trail.
Here the movie splits completely from the book, and dives into a
convoluted and improbable tale of government conspiracy and mind
control tactics involving the Mafia, the CIA, one of Hammer's
Vietnam vet buddies, and a kinky sex clinic. Many of the same
characters from the book appear in the movie, but they take on
slightly different roles. For instance, Charles Kalecki (Alan
King), a numbers runner and narcotics dealer in the book, turns
into a suave mob boss. And, more importantly, Hammer's suspicious
love interest, Charlotte Bennett (Barbara Carrera), morphs from a
run-of-the-mill psychiatrist into the coordinator and founder of
the sex clinic.
"I, The Jury" is one of several cinematic renditions of
Spillane's books (including a 1953 version which was made in
3-D), but this film differs from those earlier versions in one
major way: it includes all of the sex and violence Spillane wrote
about that could never be given screen treatment due to
Hollywood's production code. Although this takes the 1982 version
of "I, The Jury" closer to the core of the original subject
matter, it is in this aspect that the film received the most
criticism, because it took this new license to extremes that many
argued surpassed what was in the book.
Rest assured, the movie not only includes a great deal of nudity,
but it is thoroughly violent, especially toward women. It
features one woman having her neck slashed, a set of twins forced
to strip before being stabbed to death by a psychotic sexual
deviant programmed by the CIA (Judson Scott), and another woman
shot point-blank in the belly by Hammer himself. No one would
deny that Spillane's writing has a definite misogynistic nature,
but the movie seems to take it a step further by giving it such
glorious screen treatment; its constant equation of sex and
violence, much of which is played with the intention of being
erotic, is quite unsettling. It's no surprise that the movie,
like the book, fades to black with a dead woman on the floor.
"I, The Jury" had a troubled production and was not
well-supported by the studio that made it, which is one
explanation why it didn't do well in theaters and many people
have forgotten that it was ever made. The script was written by
Larry Cohen, who is best known for his creatively cheesy but
nonetheless effective monster movies, like "It's Alive" (1974)
and its two sequels, "Q" (1981), and "The Stuff" (1985). Cohen
wrote the script thinking he was going to helm the project as
well, but he was yanked from the director's chair after only a
week's worth of shooting because he was already $100,000 over
budget.
He was quickly replaced by Richard T. Heffron, who has worked for
the last three decades on a handful of undistinguished movies and
dozens of television projects. Heffron was obviously brought in
not for his talent, but because he could make the movie rapidly
and efficiently. It shows in the final product. Cohen had
personal interest in the updated version of Hammer, but Heffron
has none. He shot the movie quickly and clumsily, and although
some scenes ring true, most of them are flat, trite, and
invariably dull. The movie features numerous car chases,
shoot-outs, and stunts, but Heffron's background in television is
the dominant tone; despite the graphic violence and full-frontal
nudity, "I, The Jury," takes on the air of a made-for-TV quickie,
with no real punch or depth.
But the problems in "I, The Jury" run deeper than the technical.
The central fault in this updating is Mike Hammer, whose
character was lost in the shuffle while updating from the fifties
to the eighties. Because Spillane wrote all his Hammer mysteries
in the first person, Hammer's character is central to the tale
because all the events are filtered through his persona. We never
really get that impression in the movie -- there is no
first-person voice-over narration and some scenes don't have
Hammer in them at all. Consequently, a great deal of the texture
of Spillane's storytelling is lost.
The period updating turns out to be a detrimentally bad idea
because much of Hammer's moral code is thrown to the wind.
Despite his characterization as a hard-nosed, violent,
misogynistic killer, Hammer always stuck fervently to his own
moral code. The title itself, "I, The Jury," refers to his
anti-establishment notion of being his own law. Unlike private
eyes who seek out the bad guys and then turn them over the
police, Hammer both pursues the criminal and exacts the
punishment.
In this way, he can be seen as "above the law," but he still
adheres strictly to her own personal code of conduct, his own
morality. The movie forgoes that aspect of his character, and
Hammer comes off not only as amoral in society's terms, but in
any terms, especially his own. If anything, Hammer always had his
professionalism, but the movie does away with that in the first
three minutes by showing him rolling in the sack with the wife of
a client who had paid him to find out if that wife was being
unfaithful. Maybe the scene was intended for laughs, but it only
cheapens Hammer's character and is, by all accounts, a lousy way
to start the movie.
The blame for Hammer's character can't be laid on Assante's
shoulders, because despite some unnecessary Marlon Brandon-like
mumbling, he delivers a fine performance. Spillane never once
described Hammer's physical attributes in any of the dozen books
in which he appeared, so any actor could conceivably portray him.
Of course, because of the lack of written description, those who
have read Spillane's books will have a strong personal notion of
what Hammer looks like, and therefore almost any screen
incarnation will somehow fall short of expectations (Spillane,
who played the character himself in 1963's "The Girl Hunters," is
generally considered the best of the film Hammers).
The rest of actors are most un-noteworthy. With the exceptions of
Alan King and Paul Sorvino, everyone who appeared in "I, The
Jury" were up-and-comers who basically went nowhere. Many of them
ended up working in television (like Carrera, who had a short
stint on "Dallas" in the mid-eighties), which only adds to the
made-for-TV atmosphere of the film. Maybe someday, someone will
manage to get the right elements together and make an effective
film rendition of a Spillane book, but this is certainly not it.


Title
Review for Conversation, The (1974)
Director: Francis Ford Coppola /
Screenplay: Francis Ford Coppola /
Stars: Gene Hackman (Harry Caul), John Cazale
(Stan), Allen Garfield (William P. "Bernie"
Moran), Frederic Forrest (Mark), Cindy Williams
(Ann), Michael Higgins (Paul), Elizabeth MacRae
(Meredith), Teri Garr (Amy), Harrison Ford (Martin
Stett) /
MPAA Rating: R /
Review: **** (out of ****)
As "The Conversation" slowly weaves its absorbing
and intricate web, it works its way under your
skin, drawing you into its sense of paranoia,
until you are sharing the same feelings as the
protagonist, who in this case is a man named Harry
Caul (Gene Hackman).
Caul's profession is surveillance -- watching and
recording other people. Even one of Caul's
fiercest competitors (Allen Garfield) admits that
he is "the best bugger on the West Coast." He is a
private contractor, and will work for anyone,
including rich businessmen or even the government.
When the film opens, Caul and his assistant, Stan
(John Cazale), are in the middle of a difficult
assignment. A mysterious man known only as The
Director has paid Caul $15,000 to record a
conversation between his wife (Cindy Williams) and
another man (Michael Higgins) as they walk in
circles in a park in the middle of downtown San
Francisco during crowded lunchtime.
Caul completes the assignment by using three
recording devices: one in a shopping bag carried
by a man following them, and two parabolic
microphones of his own design positioned over two
hundred yards away. Of course, none of these three
recordings is complete, but back in his studio,
Caul works carefully to assemble the raw footage
into a complete conversation. The scenes depicting
Caul at work reminded me of Antonini's "Blowup"
and Brian De Palma's "Blow Out." Like those
movies, "The Conversation" invites the viewer to
watch over Caul's shoulder as he puts the pieces
together, slowly deciphering what was said.
The conflict comes when Caul breaks his strict
rule of not getting personally involved in his
work when he realizes that when he turns the tape
over to the Director, a murder might ensue. He
doesn't know for sure, but several years ago he
was involved in another assignment that resulted
in three deaths, and he doesn't want to live
through it again. Of course, his job is to listen
to conversations, not to hear them. When Stan
shows curiosity at what the conversation is about,
Caul snaps back this his profession is to not be
curious. "I don't care what's being said," he
says. "I just want a good recording."
Hackman plays Caul as a tightly-strung, paranoid,
and intensely personal man who is incapable of
being involved in human relationships. Early on we
see him with a semi-girlfriend (Teri Garr), but
the relationship sours because he hates being
asked questions, even simple ones like "Where do
you work?" His unrelenting privacy blocks him off
from the rest of the world, so much that he
becomes distraught when he learns that his
landlady has a key to his apartment.
In this way, "The Conversation" is an affecting
tragedy. Although it is a brilliantly written and
expertly-paced mystery with some fantastic twists
and scenes that might make Hitchcock proud, it is
also a finely-tuned character study, mostly due to
Hackman's outstanding performance. It also
incorporates a running theme of how privacy is
slowly being eroded by society and, more
specifically, technology. Caul is paranoid simply
because he knows that any person can be recorded
at any time in any place. He knows because he's
the expert, and even though he is one of the best,
there are others out there.
"The Conversation" was written and directed by
Francis Ford Coppola when he was at the height of
his talent. He had just won Best Picture in 1972
for "The Godfather," and even though "The
Conversation" was nominated for Best Picture in
1974, it lost out to his own "The Godfather Part
II."
But unlike the sprawling "Godfather Saga," "The
Conversation" utilizes Coppola's striking ability
to create a closed sense of claustrophobia and
suspicion. He successfully taps into the primal
fear that we can never be alone, that someone is
always watching. This is one of the few films that
might be more relevant today than it was
twenty-three years ago, because in the age of the
Internet, global telecommunications, and satellite
cameras, the threat of invaded privacy is more
real than ever, and always getting worse.

Title
Review for Lords of Discipline, The (1983)
Director: Franc Roddam || Screenplay: Thomas Pope and Lloyd
Fonvielle (based on the novel by Pat Conroy) || Stars: David
Keith (Will McLean), Robert Prosky (Bear), G.D. Spradlin (Gen.
Durrell), Barbara Babcock (Abigail), Michael Biehn (Alexander),
Rick Rossovich (Dante Pignetti), John Lavachielli (Mark),
Mitchell Lichtenstein (Trado), Mark Breland (Pearce), Malcolm
Danare (Poteete) || MPAA Rating: R
"The Lords of Discipline" was one of the last in a string of
youth-oriented military movies that appeared in the early
eighties, including "Taps" (1981) and "An Officer and a
Gentleman" (1983). However, it has neither the idealism of the
former, nor the romance of the latter.
The story is set at the fictional Carolina Military Institute in
South Carolina, some time during the mid-sixties when America was
in a period of profound change. Although at first, the movie
seems to be about the school's difficulty in incorporating its
first black cadet, it soon turns into a sort of quasi-mystery
about one honest cadet's battle against a secretive
group-within-the-group. Known as "The Ten," this group has
determined to ensure that all those that "don't fit in" according
to their standards are run out of the school.
The main character is a senior cadet named Will McLean,
effectively portrayed by David Keith, who looks like a less
severe version of Patrick Swayze. Will is something of a misfit,
and the only reason he is at the school is because it was his
dying father's wish. He has been taken under the wing of the
school's cadet commander, a salty old cigar-chomping colonel
known as Bear (Robert Prosky). Bear asks Wills to keep an eye on
the new black cadet, Pearce (Mark Breland), because Bear knows
there will be trouble, and Pearce will need an older cadet to
stand up for him. Will isn't excited about the idea, but because
of the respect and friendship he shares with Bear, he agrees.
It doesn't take long for the pressure to mount on Pearce - he is
systematically attacked with racial slurs and extreme physical
exercise, but it's really no worse than any of the freshman
"knobs" are getting. However, once "The Ten" get involved,
everything changes. The movie establishes the danger of "The Ten"
by first depicting their physical and mental torture of another
freshman, this one a chubby slacker who ends up throwing himself
off a building in desperation. This suicide is probably the most
gratuitous scene in the film, not because it's graphically
violent, but because once it happens, the character is just
forgotten. (Somehow, I have a hard time believing that if a
military school lost a freshman to suicide in the first week,
there wouldn't be some kind of investigation.)
Before the suicide, Will had never heard about "The Ten." When he
asks Bear about it, Bear is allusive. Was he, perhaps, a past
member? And who are the current members? Infuriated that "The
Ten" are able to break the school's strict codes of conduct at
their leisure, and suspecting that the school itself is secretly
backing them, Will sets out to unmask the group and put a stop to
their reign of terror.
The framework of "The Lords of Discipline" is your typical one
man and his righteousness versus the group and their evil doings.
As directed by Franc Roddam, it's a fairly effective thriller,
although it sometimes feels a bit mean-spirited and sadistic. The
movie was based on a novel by Pat Conroy, the same man who wrote
"The Great Santini" (1979) and "The Prince of Tides" (1991). It
contains Conroy's typically melodramatic and intense treatment of
characters and situations, but there is a strain of realism
because Conroy attended The Citadel, which is the obvious
inspiration for the fictional Carolina Military Institute.
One of the major disappointments in the film is its coarse and
ill-defined treatment of racial matters. It seems that every
single character is racist, even those we're suppose to be siding
with, including Bear, Will, and his three roommates, Dante
Pignetti, a.k.a. "Pig" (Rick Rossovich), Mark (John Lavachielli),
and Trado (Mitchell Lichtenstein). The roommates are ostensibly
on Will's side and therefore on the audience's side as well, but
the movie often makes them quite difficult to like as people. The
movie throws around a lot of racial slurs amongst the roommates
and other caders, but little is ever made of it.
Of course, the story does take place in the South during the
sixties, but does that mean that every white character living in
that time and place was openly racist? At one point, Will and his
roommates are on the verge of getting run out of the school for
their actions against "The Ten," and in his defense Will blurts
out, "I never did it for the nigger!" It almost completely
undermines his credibility as a character, and brings into
question the film's motives.
There's a small scene between Will and Pearce at the end of the
film that tries to smooth everything over, but it feels forced
and phony. Is Will truly proud that the school's first black
cadet might actually make it, or is he just proud of himself for
winning against the system?
In a nutshell, "The Lords of Discipline" wants be titillating
with its sadistic violence and hazing rituals (including Pearce
having the number "10" carved on his back with a knife and a
torture session involving electrodes and gasoline), and then
throw down a firm ruling that it was all wrong. Those who dislike
the military environment could easily point this movie out as a
perfect example of what's wrong with our military system.
However, at the same time, those who support the military can
also use the movie in their defense, citing the fact that when
the cadets play by the rules, everything works. It's only when a
small group takes matters in its own hands that the system gets
out of control.
However, despite the alternating sadistic/righteous tone of "The
Lords of Discipline," there is some fun to be had: watching for
now-famous actors in early roles. Look for Judge Reinhold
("Beverly Hills Cop"), Michael Biehn ("The Terminator," "The
Abyss") and especially Bill Paxton ("Apollo 13," "Titanic"), who
for some reason chose to be listed in the credits as "Wild" Bill
Paxton. Ironically enough, it the two young actors who give the
best performances - David Keith who also starred in "An Officer
and a Gentleman," and Rick Rossovich, who some will remember as
Slider in "Top Gun" - who went virtually nowhere.

Title
Review for Love and Death on Long Island (1997)
Director: Richard Kwietniowsk || Screenplay: Richard Kwietniowsk (based on the
novel by Gilbert Adair) || Stars: John Hurt (Giles De'Ath), Jason Priestley
(Ronnie Bostock), Fiona Loewi (Audrey), Sheila Hancock (Mrs. Barker), Maury
Chaykin (Irv), Gawn Grainger (Henry), Elizabeth Quinn (Mrs. Reed) || MPAA
Rating: PG-13
Humans are strange, emotional creatures, and sometimes we react to each other in
unexpected ways. It is easy for a person to become caught up, fascinated with
someone else, often blurring the line between interest and obsession. With the
advent of movies and television, it has become even easier, because the screen
gives us a plethora of beautiful, fascinating subjects to observe and wonder
about. What else explains all the fan clubs, teen picture magazines, fan mail,
Web sites, and girls who cry when they see Leonardo DiCaprio?
"Love and Death on Long Island" is about this very subject, but it goes about it
in a peculiar and surprising way. The object of affection is a B-movie star
named Ronnie Bostock (Jason Priestly), who stars in cheesy flicks with titles
like "Hotpants College II" and "Skid Marks." The person who is so taken with him
is a stuffy, British intellectual author named Giles De'Ath (John Hurt), who
discovers Ronnie only because he accidentally goes into a theater showing
"Hotpants College II," instead of the latest adaptation of an E.M. Forester
novel.
Giles is a secluded man, a reclusive widower who has buried himself in his
mahogany office, surrounded by books. As a man resistant to change, he doesn't
so much despise technology as he ignores it. He doesn't own a television, a VCR,
a microwave, or an answering machine. He refuses to give interviews, and spends
all his time hand-writing long, probably unreadable books about distant academic
subjects. He is the last man in the world who would become obsessed with a bad
American actor, which is what makes the entire premise of the film both
hilarious and poignant. Here is an unreachable man whose armor is cracked in the
most unexpected way.
Giles' obsession with Ronnie is never fully explained, nor should it be. Some
will narrowly interpret it as homosexual love, but I think it's bigger than
that. There is never an instance in the film where Giles seems interested in sex
- he is simply fascinated by Ronnie. He returns to the theater to see "Hotpants
College II," and then begins to research. He discovers Ronnie's picture
plastered all over fan magazines like "Sugar," the title of which proudly
declares it "The #1 British girls magazine." Giles is so embarrassed about
buying it, he wraps it up in another magazine to hide it.
Giles then looks up Ronnie's other movies on video, which prompts him to buy a
VCR. When the delivery boy arrives with the new machine, he is quite surprised
to find that Giles doesn't realize the necessity of a TV to make the VCR work.
After seeing the other two movies Ronnie has starred in as well as a really bad
sitcom, Giles decides to find the man himself. As part of the trivia gleaned
from the fan 'zines, Giles learns that Ronnie lives on Long Island in New York.
There's an amusing dream sequence where Giles imagines that he's on a British
game show, answering trivia questions about Ronnie "life work," such as what his
dog's name is and what he has a weakness for (pizza with extra anchovies).
"Love and Death on Long Island" is an odd, but thoroughly insightful, touching,
and entertaining film. The first half is funny in a goofy kind of way. We watch
Giles hide the teen fan magazines from his maid and watch bad straight-to-video
movies with the misguided interpretive eye of a Shakespearean critic. There's
another funny sequence when he's supposed to be lecturing on "The Death of the
Future," and ends up rambling on a tangent about the subtleties of acting (with
Ronnie in mind, of course).
The second half of the film is more thoughtful and pointed, when Giles finally
meets Ronnie and his fiancee, a likable model named Audrey (Fiona Loewi). Giles
tries to convince Ronnie that he can be more than what he is, that his career
deserves better than the next sequel to "Hotpants College." But, even as Giles
is saying the words, we know as surely as Ronnie does that it's not right. No
matter how intense Gile's fascination is, Ronnie is not a great actor and
probably never will be.
The strength of the film is in its cast, especially John Hurt. He creates a
wonderfully memorable character in Giles - a dignified man of superior intellect
who finally discovers his weakness. Hurt's performance simply embues intellect,
distinction, and a disdain for all things non-academic. In his tweed jackets and
wide ties, Hurt is utterly believable when he still refers to the movies as
"pictures."
As Ronnie, Jason Priestly displays a fine knack for serious acting, even if he
is essentially parodying his own teen stardom from eight years of "Beverly Hills
90210." But, let's not forget that Johnny Depp got a cinematic jump-start in
John Waters' "Cry-Baby" (1990), parodying his stardom from "21 Jump Street."
Priestly certainly holds his own during the film's most important moments near
the end of the film, where much is said but not spoken between Giles and Ronnie.


Title
Review for Apostle, The (1997)
Director: Robert Duvall || Screenplay: Robert Duvall || Stars:
Robert Duvall (Euliss "Sonny" Dewey), Farrah Fawcett (Jessie
Dewey), Miranda Richardson (Toosie), Todd Allen (Horace), John
Beasley (Brother Blackwell), June Carter Cash (Sonny's Momma),
Walt Goggins (Sam), Billy Joe Shaver (Joe), Billy Bob Thornton
(Troublemaker) || MPAA Rating: PG-13
True faith and its expression through organized religion is a
difficult subject for a motion picture to tackle head-on, which
is probably why so few of them do it. Even the most religious
directors - like Martin Scorsese or Ingmar Bergman - usually
address issues of faith in implicit rather than explicit
religious terms.
So it's not hard to see why it took Robert Duvall fifteen years
to get "The Apostle" onto the big-screen. As a matter of fact,
even after fifteen years he still never managed to get financial
backing, and he ended up paying for it with $5 million of his own
money. He also wrote the script, directed the film, and starred
as the central character, a fiery Texas preacher named Euliss
"Sonny" Dewey. Few filmmakers have the courage and sheer audacity
to take on that kind of financial, technical, and creative
responsibility single-handedly, and it's testament to what an
intensely personal project this was for Duvall. And, thankfully,
every bit of that personal investment translates on-screen into
power and honest emotion.
Sonny is an energetic, Pentecostal preacher who has been speaking
(actually shouting) from behind the pulpit since he was twelve.
He spends much of his time traveling about the country,
evangelizing with other preachers at tent revivals. Unlike most
Hollywood characterizations of intense preachers, Sonny is not a
phony or a swindler, and the film's purpose is not to unearth
hypocrisy and sin in either Sonny or the church. Duvall makes it
abundantly clear that Sonny truly believes in what he says,
although like all humans, he has weaknesses.
One of his weaknesses become apparent when he finds out that, not
only does his long-suffering wife, Jessie (Farrah Fawcett), want
to leave him for another man in the congregation, but the two of
them have secretly plotted to remove him as preacher. Faced with
the loss of two things he loves passionately- his church and his
family - that same raw power that allows Sonny to get entire
congregations rocking and swaying transforms into a violent
temper. At his son's baseball game, Sonny snaps and smashes his
wife's lover in the face with a baseball bat, inflicting a wound
that may be fatal.
Not knowing what else to do, Sonny disappears. He throws away his
identification, drives his car into a lake, and takes a bus to
Louisiana, hoping to start over again. In the tiny, mostly poor
coastal town of Bayou Boutte, Sonny once again finds his calling.
After befriending a simple auto mechanic (Walt Goggins) and
tracking down the town's ex-minister (John Beasley), Sonny sets
up his own church, The One Way to Heaven Temple. Re-christening
himself as "The Apostle E.F.," he quickly draws together an eager
congregation, and together they realize real change in each
other's lives. But, always, Sonny's past is lurking a step behind
him, waiting to swallow his progress.
Duvall has made his intentions in making "The Apostle" clear. In
a recent article in "Newsweek," he wrote: "Filmmakers hardly ever
depict spirituality with such a strong emphasis on the Holy
Spirit, and when they do, it tends to be patronizing - full of
charlatans and snake handlers ... But what I really wanted to do
was try to understand what these preachers go through and what
they believe, and to portray it in an accurate way."
The strength of Duvall's convictions turn out to be the strength
of his film - "The Apostle" always rings true, even in the most
painful moments, because we know he's being sincere with the
subject matter. After fifteen years of traveling the country,
listening to all shapes and sizes of ministers and taking
studious notes on what they said, Duvall has captured the energy
and vitality of what it means to be truly spiritual.
His Sonny is a man who speaks directly to God and expects to be
spoken right back to. "I've always called you Jesus and you've
always called me Sonny," he says. When neighbors call and
complain that he is being too loud one night in one his rants
with the Man Upstairs, Sonny's mother (June Carter Cash) just
hangs up on them because she knows there's no sense trying to
interrupt him.
The main theme to emerge from "The Apostle" is the fact that good
can come from any situation. Sonny's act of violence toward
another human being is inarguably a horrific thing, and Duvall
never shrinks from that fact. However, that very same act of
violence is what brings Sonny to Bayou Boutte, where he finds
people whom he desperately needs and who desperately need him.
In his short time in Louisiana, he does a world of good, and when
the police finally show up to take him away, he goes quietly,
knowing that he deserves the punishment that is awaiting him.
And, as a scene during the final credits shows, he even turns his
punishment into a positive opportunity for change and betterment.
It is that strength in Sonny's character that makes him so
appealing and magnetic to others - he is flawed, but he is
powerful enough to overcome those flaws. Weak men are the ones
who simply accept their weaknesses and lack the desire to better
themselves.
Watching Duvall on-screen, it's not hard to imagine that he would
have been a magnificent preacher if he had chosen that vocation
over acting. As Sonny, he completely inhabits the character, and
his performance is certainly the best of the year. Because he
spent so much time absorbing the traits, methods, quirks, and
personalities of real preachers, Duvall was able to create a
complete character who always feels indelibly human.
As a director, Duvall feels that less is more. His camera simply
takes in what goes on in front of it, with very little intrusion.
There are no fancy crane shots or extended dollies or excessive
close-ups. Duvall knew that the power of the film's characters
(enhanced by the fact that he cast mostly non-professional
churchgoers and actual ministers) didn't need to be artificially
enhanced. In this way, "The Apostle" almost plays out like a
documentary, not only in its technical simplicity, but more
importantly, in its sense of reality.


Title
Review for Dangerous Beauty (1998)
Director: Marshall Herskovitz || Screenplay: Jeannine Dominy
(based on the book "The Honest Courtesan" by Margaret Rosenthal)
|| Stars: Catherine McCormack (Veronica Franco), Rufus Sewell
(Marco Venier), Jacqueline Bisset (Paola Franco), Oliver Platt
(Maffio Venier), Moira Kelly (Beatrice Venier), Fred Ward
(Domenico Venier), Naomi Watts (Guila De Lezze), Jeroen Krabbé
(Pietro Venier), Joanna Cassidy (Laura Venier), Daniel Lapaine
(Serafino Franco), Jake Weber (King Henry) || MPAA Rating: R ||
Review: *** (out of ****)
"Dangerous Beauty" is a really nothing more than a grandiose soap
opera set in Venice circa 1583. It is beautifully filmed,
wonderfully acted, and certainly nothing short of entertaining,
but it lacks any true fundamental seriousness. Dealing with
themes of forbidden love, religious intolerance, subordination of
women, sexual freedom, and the roles of pleasure and sin in a
high-cultured society, it still feels like brightly lit fluff.
The director, Marshall Herskovitz, doesn't want to follow the
dark and dangerous trail this story could lead down, so he opts
for a more genial, livelier, and relatively shallow
interpretation.
The film takes place during the Renaissance, a time when Venice
was the pleasure capital of Europe. At this time, Venice was its
own republic, and it thrived on being the central juncture of
East-West commerce. The film is told almost entirely through the
viewpoint of the aristocracy and the bourgeoisie of Venice, so we
rarely get to see how the rest of the society lived. However,
there is an abundance of detail concerning the lives and
livelihoods of the upper classes, their hedonistic lifestyles and
constant merriment.
The story centers on Veronica Franco (Catherine McCormack), a
lower class woman who falls in love with Marco Venier (Rufus
Sewell), the son of wealthy aristocratic parents (Jeroen Krabbé
and Joanna Cassidy). Unfortunately, the culture of that time
period did not view marriage as an act of love -- rather, it was
more like a business transaction, where rich families married
their sons and daughters to each other in order to secure power,
wealth, and ensure that outsiders couldn't get in. Veronica,
despite her charm and good looks, is certainly an outsider. After
a short love affair, Marco breaks her heart with the news that he
cannot marry her.
However, because she is beautiful and intelligent, Veronica has a
chance to enter Marco's world, albeit not as his wife. She
decides to become a courtesan -- a class of women who were as
well-educated as they were ravishing, and sold their sexuality to
wealthy men for the privilege of wining and dining with the
elite. A courtesan was not a mere prostitute; they were afforded
a special place in society, and they were greatly revered,
respected, and often envied. At one point, a character mentions
that some rulers obtain more political advice from their
courtesans than from their lieutenants.
Veronica goes through the transformation with the help of her
mother, Paola (Jacqueline Bisset), who was once a famed courtesan
herself. Once she enters the lifestyle, Veronica finds that it
suits her quite well. She is allowed to read all the books she
wants, she is given the opportunity to publish her poetry, and
she has the richest and most powerful men in the republic
throwing themselves at her feet, including the awestruck Marco.
Their relationship develops into a playful bantering, with
Veronica utilizing her newfound power by constantly rejecting
Marco's advances. In many ways, their relationship is sad because
Marco is married to a women he is unable to love, and Veronica is
consumed by multiple relationships with men she is unwilling to
love. "Love the love, not the man," as her mother told her.
"Dangerous Beauty," which was based on a factual book by Margaret
Rosenthal, flows along as smoothly and serenely as the Grand
Canal running through the heart of Venice. It has multiple plot
lines -- including Veronica's adversarial relationship with a
court poet (Oliver Platt), her role in obtaining France's
military assistance in Venice's battle against the Turks, and
even the dreaded shadow of the plague and the encroachment of the
Spanish Inquisition -- yet it is never confusing or overbearing.
Much of the film's success is due to the glowing performance by
Catherine McCormack in the lead role. Known chiefly for the small
part she played as the lover whose murder raised Mel Gibson's ire
in "Braveheart" (1995), McCormack shows the true gifts and
inarguable talent of a leading lady. She has the kind of
exquisite classical beauty that would be treasured in a
courtesan; her character is intelligent, witty, and both sensual
and vulnerable, all of which McCormack easily transmits with a
single flash of her eyes.
The rest of the roles are also filled well, including Rufus
Sewell whose performance here and earlier this month in "Dark
City" have assured him a solid place in Hollywood. He has the
same kind of unusual good looks and charm of Ray Liotta, and he
seems perfectly at home in period dramas. Oliver Platt plays a
variation of the comic relief role that he has come to inhabit
like a second skin, although the film deals his character a cheap
blow at the end by having him improbably join the Inquisition and
turn into the bad guy.  Platt is a good actor, but he's just too
hard to hate. Jacqueline Bisset proves that she is every bit as
stirring as she ever was, and even Fred Ward turns up in a small,
but moving performance as Marco's uncle.
"Dangerous Beauty" is Marshall Herskovitz's sophomore directorial
effort, after the overlooked 1993 film "Jack the Bear." Partnered
with Edward Zwick, Herskovitz has spent most of his time as a
producer on television ("thirtysomething," "My So-Called Life")
and in the movies ("Legends of the Fall"). His directing style
can be best described as transparent -- it never gets in the way
of the story, yet it has no discernible flourish or particular
distinctions. He could have approached the film in any number of
ways, including overdosing on the sexual aspect, which he wisely
avoids. "Dangerous Beauty" contains just enough bare flesh and
ribald sex to make it appropriately erotic, but not so much that
it seems exploitative.
Herskovitz is also aided by a strong supporting crew, including
the luscious photography by Bojan Bazelli, whose previous efforts
include the highly-stylized thriller "Kalifornia" (1993) and Abel
Ferrara's dark sci-fi film "Body Snatchers" (1994). Bazelli
captures the film in strong, bold colors, and be brings
sixteenth-century Venice to life in wide, panoramic shots that
are often enhanced with digital imagery. However, the real
details are found in the production design by Norman Garwood
("Brazil," "The Princess Bride") and the costumes by Gabriella
Pescucci ("The Age of Innocence").
The only problem with "Dangerous Beauty" is that it doesn't stick
with you. It's a good story well-told with interesting
characters, but it's easy to shrug off once you've left the
theater. The only sequence that has the chance to be truly
indelible is Veronica being pulled in front of the hypocrisy of
the Inquisition and threatened with the death penalty for her
transgressions, but it never quite comes off because it's simply
too melodramatic and conventional. Herskovitz tries with all his
might to make it a nailbiter, but somehow its outcome is a
foregone conclusion, and like the rest of the film, it carries no
real weight, despite the potential severity of the subject
matter.


Title
Review for Bulworth (1998)
Director: Warren Beatty || Screenplay: Warren Beatty and Jeremy Pikser || Stars:
Warren Beatty (Jay Billington Bulworth), Halle Berry (Nina), Oliver Platt
(Dennis Murphy), Don Cheadle (L.D.), Paul Sorvino (Graham Crockett), Jack Warden
(Eddie Davers), Christine Baranski (Constance Bulworth), Joshua Malina (Bill
Feldman) || MPAA Rating: R
Warren Beatty's "Bulworth" is a caustic political comedy that doesn't attack any
particular political group, but rather the ingrained insincerity that has
infected the American political system. Some might think this film is vulgar,
and in many ways it is. However, as loud and raucous as it is, "Bulworth" speaks
the truth, which is almost always ugly to hear.
Beatty, who directed the film and co-wrote the script with Jeremy Pikser ("The
Lemon Sisters"), stars as incumbent U.S. Senator Jay Billington Bulworth, who
has one of the best politician names in cinema history. Bulworth is a Democrat,
and in Beatty's view, he is symbolic of everything that has gone wrong with the
current Democratic Party. Once an ideological liberal (like Beatty still is),
Bulworth has long since succumbed to the materialistic pressures of Washington.
Instead of waging the battles for the impoverished and the downtrodden, which
was once the calling card of Democrats, Bulworth has become another sell-out
money hound - if he's not accepting illegal bribes from the insurance lobby or
taking campaign contributions from the Chinese, he's making wind-bag speeches
that start with the amusingly Clintonesqe statement, "America is standing on the
doorstep of a new millennium .... blah, blah, blah."
When the film opens, it is a few days before the 1996 primary elections, and
Bulworth is sitting at his desk weeping because he realizes how corrupt he has
become. In a fit of desperation, he takes out a $10 million life insurance
policy from a dirty insurance rep played by Paul Sorvino (part of a shady lobby
deal to kill a threatening bill in committee), and then hires a hit man to kill
him, although he doesn't know who the assassin will be, or when the hit will
take place.
Knowing that he will soon be dead, Bulworth unleashes his own brand of political
rhetoric on the world, which is made up of politically incorrect truths about
the state of American politics and the society in general. At a Compton church,
he tells the group of African-Americans that they will have no power in the U.S.
unless they "put down that malt liquor and chicken wings, and get behind
somebody other than a running back who stabs his wife." Later, in a particularly
hilarious sequence, Bulworth mixes with the Hollywood elite, then insults the
quality of their movies and informs them that the only reason he's there is
because "my guys always put the big Jews on my schedule."
All throughout this physically and politically suicidal escapade, Bulworth's
Chief of Staff, Dennis Murphy (Oliver Platt), follows behind in a state of
constant shock and bewilderment. Platt has some of the movie's funniest scenes,
as he makes Murphy into a politically savvy but nonetheless clueless assistant
who is forced to watch his own career teeter at the brink of being flushed down
the toilet. His constant half-truth-telling and spin-doctoring to cover
Bulworth's stampede is equaled in its perversion only by a self-righteous
reporter (Nora Dunn) who acts like Murphy's refusal to explain Bulworth's
actions (something he really cannot do) is somehow an act of treason.
When Bulworth decides he wants to live after all, and therefore must constantly
evade a grim-looking assassin to be who's trailing him at every turn, he hides
out in the ghetto, complete with a stereotypical gangsta wardrobe which he wears
to one of his television interviews.
At this point, Beatty abandons much of the political aspect and dives into a
cartoonish exploration of the black inner-city experience. Bulworth becomes
friendly with a young black woman named Nina (Halle Berry), who he meets at the
Harlem church rally. She has a tough-talking brother who is deep in debt to a
local gangster named L.D. (Don Cheadle of "Boogie Nights"), who also becomes
involved in Bulworth's campaign. Some of the scenes in the ghetto ring true, but
much of it feels like a lighter version of scenes depicted in more intense
inner-city films like "Boyz'N'Hood" (1991) and "Menace II Society" (1993).
"Bulworth's" chief liability is Beatty's insistence on having his character
adopt a clumsy style of rap as his new communication device. Instead of speaking
at political rallies, he breaks into a kind of rhythmless rap style that is a
reminder of why almost all hip-hop stars are black. It's hard to tell whether
Beatty is being humorous by being so bad, or whether he's actually that
incompetent. At any rate, the rap sounds more Run D.M.C. than Snoop Doggy Dogg,
which makes the film seem dated instead of contemporary. Beatty would have been
better off simply adopting some of the inner-city lingo and working that into
his speeches, instead of trying to sound like L.L. Cool J.
Other than that, "Bulworth" hits all its targets with wry, hilarious accuracy.
The film is like a letter bomb to the Democratic Party, and even if you don't
agree with Beatty's liberal message about the unrequited duties of the federal
government, it is hard to deny the impact the film has in exploring the monetary
and moral debauchery that infests modern politics. Unlike "Primary Colors" which
opened earlier this year, "Bulworth" doesn't try to tip-toe around the truly
painful issues that hit close to home - instead, it takes them dead-on.


Title
Review for Mandingo (1975)
director: Richard Fleischer
screenwriter: Normal Wexler (based on the novel by Ken Ostott and the
play by Jack Krikland)
stars: James Mason (Warren Maxwell), Perry King (Hammond Maxwell), Susan
George (Blanche), Ken Norton (Mede), Brenda Sykes (Ellen), Ji-Tu Cumbuka
(Cicero), Roy Poole (Doc Redfield), Richard Ward (Agamemnon)
MPAA rating: R
review: *1/2 (out of ****)
"Mandingo" has traditionally been seen as one of two things: either a
much-needed revisionist look at slavery in the South, or in the words of
film critic Leonard Maltin, "a trashy potboiler" that "appeals only to
the S&M crowd." Actually, I think "Mandingo" is a strange combination of
the two, although it fails on both fronts. It's too trashy to be good
drama, but too dramatic to be good trash.
The story takes place on a dilapidated Louisiana plantation run by
crotchety old Warren Maxwell (James Mason) and his son, Hammond (Perry
King). One day in New Orleans, Hammond comes across a slave trader
selling a Mandingo named Mede (heavyweight boxer Ken Norton). Although
the movie never explains it, a Mandingo is simply the name for Africans
who come from the region of the upper Niger River valley. According to
the movie, Mandingos were the Rolls Royce of African slaves. Hammond
pays top price for Mede and has to fight off others in order to get him.
Hammond then spends his time training Mede to be a fighter in money
brawls with other slaves.
Meanwhile, Hammond has married his cousin, Blanche (Susan George),
because she wants to escape her family and he is under pressure from his
father to produce a grandchild. Hammond, however, is happier spending
nights with his "bed wench," the derogatory name given to female slaves
used by their masters for easy sex.
It is quickly apparent that Hammond, despite his overt racism, is more
in love with his bed wench, a sensitive slave girl named Ellen (Brenda
Sykes), than he is with Blanche. Hammond considers Blanche tainted goods
because he finds out on their wedding night that another man had
"pleasured" her before he did. Of course, it's fine that he's slept with
numerous slave girls, but the fact that his wife, a "white lady," had
been with another man out of wedlock destroys his capacity to care for
her. So Blanche is usually left lonely and sex-starved while Hammond is
sleeping with Ellen.
Blanche gets back at Hammond by seducing the studly Mede and bearing his
child. Hammond and his father cannot stand the idea that Blanche has
given birth to a half-black child (although it's okay that Ellen was
pregnant by Hammond), so Warren kills the child by letting it bleed to
death after birth, and Hammond poisons Blanche. Hammond then finds Mede,
shoots him twice in the shoulder, and pushes him into a giant cauldron
of boiling water. Yes, you read right: the film ends with Hammond
getting his revenge by boiling Mede alive.
Judging only by the plot, "Mandingo" is pure sexploitation. The main
purpose of the film seems to be getting as many blacks and whites into
bed together as possible, with only the slightest commentary on what
that would mean in 19th century Southern society. When "Mandingo" was
released in 1975, it was still a bit of a shocker to see miscegenation
on screen in such a graphic detail; this way the movie could revise
cinematic history while attracting large audiences of curious voyeurs.
Dramatically, "Mandingo" is weak and unfocused, and historically it's
mostly confused. If one were to judge history by this film, it would be
easy to walk away with the notion that the entire system of American
slavery was based on sexuality, not economics. Not once in the film do
we see any of the slaves working, except for a few house servants. The
men spend most of the time sitting around, while the sole purpose of a
female slave seems to be free sex for the owner. There is historical
basis in the notion that slave owners often slept with their female
slaves, but "Mandingo's" overwhelming emphasis on this aspect of slavery
gives the movie the unpleasant taste of a cheap sex flick (although
there's plenty of violence -- fights, vicious beatings, shootings, and
the aforementioned human boiling sequence -- thrown in for good
measure).
Some tried to write off "Mandingo" as a blaxploitation film, one of a
number of quickly-made, low-budget films appealing to black
sensibilities in the early seventies, but it's not that easy. "Mandingo"
was studio-financed by Paramount Pictures, and produced by Dino De
Laurentiis, the grandiose Italian producer behind such notorious
productions as "The Bible" (1966), the remake of "King Kong" (1976), and
the ill-fated "Dune" (1984).
The director was Richard Fleischer, a veteran who was best known for
several special effects-laden action movies including "20,000 Leagues
Under the Sea" (1954) and "Fantastic Voyage" (1966), as well as such
superior suspense films as "The Narrow Margin" (1952). The script, based
on the supermarket best-seller by Ken Ostott (and the subsequent play by
Jack Kirkland), was penned by Norman Wexler, who had been nominated for
an Oscar two years earlier for his work on "Serpico." James Mason, Perry
King, and Susan George were well-known and respected actors (Mason
already had three Oscar nominations under his belt), and Ken Norton
appeared to have a promising film career.
So why is "Mandingo" so bad? A number of reasons, including the fact
that all those experienced filmmakers behind and in front of the camera
did a lousy job. Wexler's script is pure poor hokum bordering on the
offensive; it combines stereotyped slave-talk ("Yessuh, massuh"),
stereotyped Southern white trash talk ("Fer whut're you gittin' outta
bed?"), and stereotyped contemporary militant black talk ("If you see me
hang, you gonna know you killed a black brother!"). Fleischer's
direction is clumsy, especially during the fight scenes, and all the
actors give weak performances, especially Susan George whose constant
shrieking finally becomes laughable.
Nevertheless, credit should be given where credit is due. Despite its
exploitative nature, "Mandingo" was one of the first Hollywood movies to
take an alternative look at slavery. Until then, there had been a kind
of underlying racism in all Hollywood films dealing with slavery. Even
classics such as "Gone With the Wind" (1939) can be seen as inherently
racist by its glossing over the subject matter. "Mandingo" reassessed
the South, and showed that it wasn't all beautiful plantations, green
fields, and pretty sunsets. But all this is constantly undermined by the
film's negligible point-of-view -- it claims to see things from the
black perspective, but the entire narrative focus is on the soap opera
tales of the white owners.
With a little more maturity and different handling, "Mandingo" might
have been an effective, worthwhile film. While it portrays many
sensitive aspects of slavery, it never deals with them. The issues the
movie brings up are worthwhile, but Wexler's script refuses to move them
beyond a surface level of trashily vicarious viewing. There is a great
deal of potential in honestly exploring the nature of a sexual
relationship between slave and owner, but "Mandingo" never does it.
Steven Spielberg touched on that same topic in "Schindler's List"
(1993), by looking at a Nazi officer writhing in inner turmoil because
of his feelings for a Jewish maid. The difference between that film and
"Mandingo" is that Spielberg dealt with the situation in a fair,
unexploitive manner that focused on the inherent human dilemma.
"Mandingo" is satisfied to simply show some skin, and because of that,
its "trashy potboiler" nature overshadows any potential social good it
might have accomplished.


Title
Review for Zardoz (1973)
Director: John Boorman || Screenplay: John Boorman || Stars: Sean Connery (Zed),
Charlotte Rampling (Consuella), Sara Kestelman (May), Sally Anne Newton
(Avalow), John Alderton (Friend), Niall Buggy (Zardoz/Arthur Frayn), Bosco Hogan
(George Saden), Jessica Swift (Apathetic) || MPAA Rating: R
John Boorman's "Zardoz" is a goofy cinematic debacle so fundamentally
misconceived and laughably executed that it takes on a bizarre enjoyment quality
all its own. Not since the rampant bumblings of one Edward D. Wood Jr. has a
movie been so silly and so serious at the same time.
Of course, Wood's career can be explained by two things: he had no money and he
had no talent. Boorman, on the other hand, cannot court such excuses to explain
"Zardoz" (or his follow-up film, the equally awful "Exorcist II: The Heretic").
Boorman obviously had a sizable budget, a matinee idol movie star (Sean Connery)
in the lead role, and although you wouldn't know it from this film, Boorman does
indeed have talent.
This is the man who made the slick modern masterpiece "Deliverance" (1972), as
well as the autobiographical World War II drama "Hope and Glory" (1987), the
slightly over-conceived Arthurian epic "Excalibur" (1981) and the father-son
jungle adventure "The Emerald Forest" (1985). His films all show that Boorman is
never lacking in imagination, but sometimes that comes at the cost of coherence
and taste. If Boorman is anything, he's ambitious, and when he succeeds, it's in
grand fashion. Unfortunately, the bigger they are, the harder they fall, and
when Boorman falls, the resounding impact can be heard for miles around.
"Zardoz" is meant to takes its place among the grandest of mystical movies, an
obsession of Boorman's. His screenplay tries to elicit the same mythological
connotations of the Arthurian legends or even "The Wizard of Oz," a book which
figures into the movie's plot. But, despite all this reaching, the resulting
movie is more unintentionally funny than intentionally enigmatical or
compelling.
The events take place in the distant year 2293, but there is little of the
typical futuristic movie-ness to be found. In fact, things seems to have moved
backwards, with people riding horses, shooting old-style guns, and living in
large Victorian mansions. It's more Middle Ages than Space Age.
The world of "Zardoz" is divided into two distinct hemispheres: the Outlands,
where all the poor, pathetic people live, and the Vortex, where a select group
of wealthy intellectuals live in comfort and everlasting life. These Immortals
never grow old, they never engage in sexual activity, they possess psychological
powers, and they live in a sort of quasi-utopian Marxist society where everyone
is equal, and everyone contributes equally to the society. However, if one
breaks the rules, that person is punished by being aged so many years. If
someone breaks the rules enough, he or she is aged to the point of senility, and
imprisoned to an eternal existence in a geriatric home with others aged
criminals.
One of the Immortals, Arthur Frayn (Niall Buggy ), a squirmy man with a mustache
and goatee tattooed on his face, is charged with keeping order in the Outlands
and forcing the residents to farm so the Immortals can be fed. Like "The Wizard
of Oz," he adopts a god-like status among the people by flying in to their part
of the world in a giant stone carved like a menacing head. (This flying head is
one of the movie's opening images, and it's a dead giveaway of the lunacy to
come.)
Calling himself Zardoz, Frayn gathers a bunch of Outlanders and makes them into
a group called the Exterminators, whose purpose is to kill most of the other
Outlanders so they can't procreate and take up more resources. From inside his
giant, stone head, Zardoz bellows seriously laugh-inducting statements like,
"The gun is good. The penis is evil." That line alone is worth the movie's cult
following.
One day, an Exterminator named Zed (Sean Connery), sneaks into Zardoz's flying
stone, pushes Frayn out, and goes back to the Vortex. Once there, the Immortals
label him a "Brutal" and study him like a lab rat, taking great, perverse care
in exploring his sexuality, which is a mystery to them. They seem especially
interested in his ability to gain an erection, and there is one downright
hilarious sequence where a bunch of scantily-clad female scientists show Zed
erotic footage on a video screen in an attempt to determine what gets him worked
up.
I say "hilarious" because that is exactly what "Zardoz" is. It is obvious that
Boorman did not intend it to be so; he made this film with the straightest of
faces, although I have a hard time believing that as production moved forward,
he didn't get even the slightest inkling of how patently ridiculous it was
becoming. Just looking at Connery is enough to give one the giggles - he spends
most of the film running around in a red loin cloth that resembles a diaper, a
mane of hair braided halfway down his back, a Wyatt Earp-style handlebar
mustache, and a pair of thigh-high patent leather boots that would look more
appropriate on a cheap Hollywood hooker.
Boorman made the film right after the critical and financial success of
"Deliverance," which is the only reason I can imagine a studio would green-light
this effort. He attracted some rich talent on both sides of the camera,
including cinematographer Geoffrey Unsworth ("2001"), whose striking visuals are
about the only good thing in "Zardoz" besides the inadvertent humor. Sean
Connery had made his last James Bond film in 1971, and perhaps he was looking
for a change in pace. He got exactly that in "Zardoz," and it's a wonder it
didn't end his career.
I'm sure Boorman intended for this movie to make some grand statements. Is it a
treatise about the infallibility of eternal life? Is it a condemnation of those
who consider growing old to be a bad thing? Or is it a social statement,
something about the inherent negativity of class distinctions and the violence
it creates? Karl Marx might like it if he were more like Timothy Leary. Come to
think of it, maybe Boorman made it as an extended LSD trip. People high on
illicit substances are the only ones I can imagine enjoying this asinine
silliness as anything more than a completely unintentional comedy.


Title
Review for God Told Me To (1977)
Director: Larry Cohen || Screenplay: Larry Cohen || Stars: Tony Lo Bianco (Peter
Nicholas), Deborah Raffin (Casey Forster), Sandy Dennis (Martha Nicholas),
Sylvia Sidney (Elizabeth Mullin), Sam Levene (Everett Lukas), Robert Drivas
(David Morten), Mike Kellin (Deputy Commissioner) || MPAA Rating: R
B-movie monster auteur Larry Cohen was really on a roll when he wrote, produced,
and directed his 1977 fanatic-religion-meets-alien-abduction thriller "God Told
Me To." Cohen, who openly embraces the low-rent traditions of cheapie horror
flicks and sleazy exposés, has made some of the clumsiest and most entertaining
schlock of the last twenty years.
A television screenwriter who graduated to the motion picture director's chair
during the blaxploitation era of the early seventies, Cohen first made himself
known with "It's Alive," the classic 1974 cult horror film about man-eating
babies. Since then, he has polished his technique and raised his production
levels, but subsequent efforts, including two "It's Alive" sequels, "Q" (1982),
"The Stuff" (1985), and his screenplay for "Maniac Cop" (1988), are all schlocky
drive-in movie material at heart.
"God Told Me To" is certainly one of his most ambitious movies because it takes
to task the very existence of God, as well as the nature of religion and
deification in the modern world. The movie can be seen as cynical at best, and
sacrilegious at worst, considering that the explanation of the particular God in
this film would fit nicely in an episode of "The X-Files." However, only those
who are intensely religious will be offended; the rest of us can just smile at
the film's simple and entertaining absurdity.
The movie opens with a series of randomly violent incidents in New York City - a
sniper perched on a water tower shoots and kills fourteen people; a police
officer (an early role for Andy Kaufman of TV's "Taxi" fame) walking in a St.
Patrick's Day parade suddenly opens fire on the crowd; a man in a supermarket
begins attacking people with a knife and so on. When police detective Peter
Nicholas (Tony Lo Bianco) begins investigating the incidents, he quickly
discovers a link connecting all the violence: whenever asked what made them do
it, the attackers, in calm rational voices, always respond, "God told me to."
This deeply affects Nicholas because of his own strong religious background. He
never misses confession and he won't divorce his wife Martha (Sandy Dennis) even
though they haven't slept in the same house for four years and he is actively
courting another girlfriend (Deborah Raffin). Nicholas is convinced that there
is someone or something controlling the actions of these people, all of whom
have no criminal histories to suggest they are capable of violence.
Why else would they be so serene and collected after their atrocious killing
sprees, especially a husband who sits in his own living room , gentling
explaining how he massacred his entire family, all because God told him to.
"He's done so much for us," the husband says. "I just thought it was time I did
something for Him." There is little doubt that something supernatural is at
work. For instance, the sniper, a 22-year-old man who had never held a gun
before, managed to shoot with deadly perfect aim, even though his gun was old,
cheap, and calibrated incorrectly.
Nicholas's pursuit of the case takes a turn when he finds out that a young man
with long blond hair was seen talking to each of the men before they erupted in
unexplained violence. As he tracks down this man, Nicholas begins to learn
things about himself while answering questions he never thought to ask. The case
involves many people who are somehow connected, including several women who gave
mysterious "virgin" births.
As kooky and confusing as the movie is, "God Told Me To" can actually be quite
entertaining and even absorbing. Cohen elicits good performances from all his
actors, especially tough character actor Tony Lo Bianco in the lead role and
Sylvia Sidney, who plays a mysterious old woman who holds an important key to
Nicholas' past.
As the explanation of the film's strange events begins to take shape, the action
becomes more and more incoherent, until it climaxes in an other-worldly
fist-fight bathed in visceral golden light. This ending, with all its
hyperkinetic violence, is something of a let-down, despite Cohen's success at
setting up an interesting mystery worthy of attention. The limited special
effects are often distracting, although they seem to fit nicely into the
ridiculous overall tone of the film.
Like many of Cohen's films, "God Told Me To" is cemented in an interesting idea,
but the final product seems more like a hastily thrown-together mosaic of
scenes, rather than a satisfying whole. Cohen seems to have the right ideas, but
he lacks the patience and drive to bring it all together. Other directors,
including Paul Morrissey ("Flesh For Frankenstein") and David Cronenberg ("The
Fly"), have shown that well-worn and admittedly cheap horror conventions can be
successfully reworked to explore deeper issues. Although Cohen strives for the
same territory, he never quite manages to get there.


Title
Review for Mercury Rising (1998)
Director: Harold Becker
Screenwriter: Lawrence Konner and Mark Rosenthal
(based on the novel "Simple Simon" by Ryne Douglas
Pearson)
Stars: Bruce Willis (Art Jeffries), Alec Baldwin
(Nicholas Kudrow),  Miko Hughes (Simon Lynch), Chi
McBride (Bizzi Jordan), Kim Dickens (Stacey)
MPAA Rating: R.
Review: *1/2 (out of ****).
"Mercury Rising" has numerous flaws, but there is
one that really stands out: its central plot
device is unnecessary. That's right. The major
aspect of the film, that which is supposed to make
it different from other routine government
conspiracy / action flicks could be dropped from
the beginning, and the movie would turn out
exactly the same, if not better.
This central device is the fact that a
nine-year-old boy is autistic. His name is Simon,
and an evil government bureaucrat named Nicholas
Kudrow (Alec Baldwin) wants him dead because he
unknowingly cracked a supersecret government code
slipped into the back of a puzzle magazine by its
programmers just to see if someone could beat it.
Simon is intended to be the heart and soul of the
film, and we are supposed to feel for him because
he is a poor handicapped child thrown into a
violent, unfair world against his will, with only
a renegade FBI agent played by Bruce Willis to
protect him.
The fact that he is autistic does nothing for the
emotional intensity or the plot necessities of
"Mercury Rising." I suppose the original novel
upon which the movie was based did much more with
this aspect of Simon's character and his
relationship with Willis, but here it is lost.
Miko Hughes, the young actor who plays Simon, goes
through the prescribed motions of being autistic:
he walks slowly, drawls his words, kicks and
screams when he's touched, and has a hard time
looking at other people. It's a difficult role for
an adult, much less a young child, to play, and
unfortunately Hughes never convinces us that he
isn't playing like he's autistic. Unlike Dustin
Hoffman's performance in "Rain Man" or Leonardo
DiCaprio's in "What's Eating Gilbert Grape," we
are always painfully aware that Hughes is
acting.
However, unlike "Rain Man" which used its
character's autism in unique and interesting ways
to build a credible and touching story, "Mercury
Rising" could go right about its generic,
predictable plot with Simon being simply a really
smart but really shy kid. Hell, he doesn't even
have to be shy. In fact, the movie might have been
more interesting if he had had a more active role,
rather than just being carted around under Willis'
arm.
Willis' character, Art Jeffries, is a
disillusioned FBI agent who has been removed from
undercover work and is now doing menial tasks like
listening to wiretaps with rookies who are happy
to be doing anything. He becomes involved with
Simon when he is called to check out a murder
scene at Simon's house, where his father has
apparently shot his mother in the back and then
committed suicide.
Of course, we know that isn't the way it happened
happen because we saw an evil, square-jawed
government hitman with a mean-looking crew-cut
knock off the parents. Simon was able to get away,
and Jeffries finds him hiding in a secret
compartment in a closet, which the rest of the
Chicago police department had overlooked. Jeffries
-- who is accused by several characters at
different times of being paranoid although his
actions never suggest it -- knows there is
something more, and he makes it his personal
mission to go against everything and everyone in
order to protect Simon. This is quite a task
because that same hitman who knocked off Simon's
parents is crawling everywhere, attempting to kill
Simon at the hospital, on the highway, and every
other place he goes.
Late in the movie, Jeffries is forced to enlist
the aid of a pretty young woman named Stacey (Kim
Dickens) who he meets at a coffee shop. Of all the
hard-to-believe aspects of the movie, this is the
worst. I can believe in the decency of the human
heart, but Stacey's character is far too
accommodating. Not only does she agree to watch
Simon while Jeffries runs off to solve the
mystery, she lets him into her apartment at two
o'clock in the morning when she knows the police
is after him, and then lets him leave Simon in her
apartment which means that she has to forgo a
business trip that is desperately needed to pay
the rent. The grinding squeals of the rusty plot
machine are almost overbearing at this point.
The movie might have been redeemed by some good
action sequences, but even here "Mercury Rising"
doesn't rise to the challenge. The movie was
directed by Harold Becker, who has made some good
suspense films including "Sea of Love" (1989) and
"Malice" (1993), but his talent is nowhere to be
found in this latest excursion. There is one fight
on a streetcar between Jeffries and another hitman
(played by Peter Stormare) that is so ineptly
directed, shot and edited, that I had no idea 1)
exactly where they were on the streetcar, 2) who
was hitting who, and 3) where this hitman came
from and how he knew where Jeffries and Simon
were. The grand finale takes place on the roof of
a tall building, and features a harrowing (yawn)
scene where Simon walks along the very edge of the
building, not because he has to, but because it's
more suspenseful that way.
Taken as a whole, "Mercury Rising" is an tepid,
confused movie that lacks style, wit, and any
traces of a sense of humor. Usually Willis brings
his personal brand of understated humor to his
roles, but here he is too straight and serious.
This is because the movie wants to be an action
flick and a heartfelt drama at the same time, but
it ends up failing on both fronts. Maybe the book
was better, but the way it's handled here is a
perfect case study in formula filmmaking
guaranteed to bore.

Title
Review for Wait Until Dark (1967)
Director: Terence Young || Screenplay: Robert Carrington and Jane
Howard Carrington (based on the play by Frederick Knott) ||
Stars: Audrey Hepburn (Susy Hendrix), Alan Arkin (Roat), Richard
Crenna (Mike Talman), Jack Weston (Carlino), Julie Herrod
(Gloria), Efrem Zimbalist, Jr. (Sam Hendrix), Samantha Jones
(Lisa) || MPAA Rating: Not Rated
With Marisa Tomei and Quentin Tarantino currently getting mixed
reviews in the big-budget Broadway revival of Frederick Knott's
1966 suspense play "Wait Until Dark," this would be a good time
to revisit the 1967 film version, which starred Audrey Hepburn
(who was nominated for an Oscar), Alan Arkin, and Richard Crenna.
Although I have not seen the current stage revival, I've read
enough reviews to ascertain that its essential problem is its
lack of ability to overcome what has always been the play's
fundamental weakness: it is horribly contrived.
The screen version, directed by Terence Young, is also thoroughly
contrived, but it is a perfect example of how mood, atmosphere,
music, and direction can overcome plot weaknesses. "Wait Until
Dark" is far from the greatest suspense movie ever made, but its
twisted tale of three con men swindling and eventually
terrorizing a blind woman alone in an apartment has just enough
momentum to sustain it for the duration of the film.
The story goes something like this: a beautiful drug dealer named
Lisa (Samantha Jones) is smuggling heroin in from Canada. The
drugs are carefully sewn into the back of a fancy doll. When
she's getting off the plane, she sees someone she doesn't want to
see, so she hands the doll to a complete stranger and tells him
to please hold it for her because it's a present that she doesn't
want her daughter to see. (This is the first of many strained
plot elements.)
The stranger is Sam Hendrix (Efrem Zimbalist, Jr.), and not
knowing what the doll contains, he takes it home to his New York
apartment, where he lives with his wife, Susy (Audrey Hepburn), a
determined woman who was recently blinded in a car wreck and is
still learning how to take care of herself while alone. Although
she can handle most of her daily chores alone, she still requires
some help from Gloria (Julie Herrod), the pre-teen girl who lives
upstairs.
Meanwhile, a mysterious criminal named Harry Roat (Alan Arkin)
hashes out a plan with two con men, Mike Talman (Richard Crenna)
and Carlino (Jack Weston) to get the doll back. When Sam is
called away on business and Susy is left alone one night, the
three criminals put their plan into action. They know the doll is
somewhere in Susy's apartment, but they don't know where (they
suspect it is in a safe in the living room).
However, instead of using bullying tactics and violent threats
like so most psychotic criminals, Roat and Co. develop a severely
and unnecessarily complicated con game to trick Susy into giving
up the doll willingly. The con involves Mike posing as an old
Army buddy of Sam's, Carlino playing a police detective, and Roat
playing several roles, including a deranged old man and another
man who suggests that his murdered wife might have been having an
affair with Sam, and Sam might be suspected of the murder.
As the film progresses, the audience becomes more and more aware
of just how little story there really is. Every plot element is
developed for the sole purpose of keeping the limited plot
chugging ahead. In all reality, there is no defensible reason for
this elaborate and labored con game except to serve the purposes
of suspense. Of course, without the con game, there would be no
movie. The only problem is that, unlike masterful con movies like
"The Sting" (1973) or "House of Games" (1987), the con in "Wait
Until Dark" isn't very clever, and it is certainly unnecessary.
There are so many more simple and more effective means of getting
the doll back, that the criminals end up looking more silly than
sinister.
There are three things that save "Wait Until Dark": the fine
performances by Hepburn, Arkin, and Crenna; a great, jangy music
score by Henry Mancini; and Young's direction. Young - who
directed some of the early Bond films including "Dr. No" (1962)
and "From Russia With Love" (1964) - should be commended
especially because he keeps the film flowing, even when you want
to stop and question the plot.
The movie's great climax, with Roat stalking Susy in the
apartment which she has made pitch black by knocking out all the
lights, is a small gem of direction, editing, and especially
cinematography by veteran Charles B. Lang. He and Young are
constantly wrangling with how to stage a chase sequence in a
small apartment with dark lighting from odd places, and they
manage to pull it off, making it both chilling and coherent. It's
somewhat ironic that the whole con game was devised to avoid
using violent tactics to get the doll, but in the end it is only
violence that can truly get the job done.
The film makes little effort to overcome its origins as a play. 
The majority of the action takes place in Susy's apartment, which
is one of those specifically stage-designed habitats where all
the rooms run horizontal to each other in a straight line, so
they can all be seen on stage at the same time. However, this
set-up ultimately works in the audience's favor because, by the
time the climax is at hand, we have seen the apartment enough
that we know where everything is. So when the lights go out and
we are left with the two antagonists in pitch blackness, we feel
like we're trapped with them.


Title
Review for Deep Impact (1998)
Director: Mimi Leder || Screenplay: Michael Tolkin and Bruce Joel Rubin ||
Stars: Robert Duvall (Spurgeon Tanner), Téa Leoni (Jenny Lerner), Elijah Wood
(Leo Biederman), Vanessa Redgrave (Robin Lerner), Maximilian Schell (Jason
Lerner), Morgan Freeman (President Beck), Leelee Sobieski (Sarah Hotchner),
James Cromwell (Alan Rittenhouse) || MPAA Rating: PG-13
Last year it was the battle of the dueling volcano movies, "Dante's Peak" and
"Volcano." This year, history repeats itself, except volcanoes have been
replaced with giant meteors on collision courses for Earth. Michael Bay's
"Armageddon" isn't due until July, but for those who just can't wait to see
Earth destroyed by fire from the heavens, the Steven Spielberg-produced "Deep
Impact" has arrived.
All those involved with "Deep Impact" have sworn up and down for the last couple
of weeks that their film is drastically different than "Armageddon" will be.
They insist that "Deep Impact" is really a drama, with the emphasis being on
realism and how various characters react to the knowledge that their death is
imminent. Maybe the deep impact of the title isn't meant to evoke the physical
collision of the meteor with the Earth's surface, but rather the psychological
and spiritual impact the impending disaster has on the many members of the human
race.
"Deep Impact" - unlike 1983's "Testament" which honestly and effectively
explored the dramatic reality of a nuclear disaster without ever showing the
disaster - is not a drama. Like all disaster movies dating to the beginning of
the cinema, "Deep Impact" is about the vicarious thrill of watching things
destroyed. It's a vicious, cruel-hearted thrill when you really boil it down,
but audiences seem to love it. No matter how much strained drama is inserted
into the first hour and forty-five minutes, it's the grand climax the people are
coming to see. Just think how ticked the throngs of moviegoers would be if the
meteor was thwarted in the end and never hit? But then again, what fun is it
going to a summer movie where the entire human race is wiped out?
Screenwriters Bruce Joel Rubin ("Ghost," "Jacob's Ladder") and Michael Tolkin
("The Player") are actually quite creative in solving this dilemma. They have
astronauts break the comet into two pieces while attempting to change it's
course. This way, we can still have the smaller piece hit the earth and cause
enough destruction to satiate the viewers expecting another "Independence Day,"
while keeping the chances of the larger chunk hitting the earth questionable.
Plenty of death and destruction, but not so much that it's morbid.
The majority of the movie plays out in the standard disaster movie formula,
tracing several sub-plots concerning a variety of characters. First off, we have
Téa Leoni as Jenny Lerner, an ambitious MSNBC reporter (CNN apparently got too
much flak for its omnipresence in last summer's "Contact," so they declined to
lend their letters to this film). Jenny stumbles across the government's
knowledge of the approaching meteor while investigating what she thinks is a sex
scandal, which the President (Morgan Freeman) may know about. Jenny then spends
most of the movie trying to reconcile her feelings about her father (Maximilian
Schell) leaving her mother (Vanessa Redgrave) for a woman half his age.
We also have Elijah Wood as Leo Biederman, an aspiring teenage astronomer who is
the first to actually discover the meteor. When the President announces that the
government has built an immense system of underground caves to protect one
million people in a worst case scenario, Leo marries his sweetheart, Sarah
(Leelee Sobieski), so they can be saved together. Of course, 800,000 of the
people to be saved are selected by a random lottery, and Sarah's parents aren't
selected, thus forcing her to choose between leaving her parents to live or
dying with them.
Last, but not least, there is the all-important American-Russian team of
astronauts who go into space in an attempt to stop the meteor with nuclear
missiles. The team is led by crusty-but-likable Spurgeon Tanner (Robert Duvall),
an aging astronaut resented by his younger comrades. Their first attempt to
deflect the comet results in its breaking into two pieces and the near deaths of
all those involved. But don't count them out until the end ...
Strictly speaking, "Deep Impact" is a by-the-numbers movie. Producers Richard
Zanuck and David Brown ("Jaws") first came up with the idea back in the heyday
of disaster movies, the seventies. The script has been through numerous
re-writes, with writers ranging from "A Clockwork Orange" novelist Anthony
Burgess to executive producer Steven Spielberg. The script is still the weakest
link in the film, but director Mimi Leder ("The Peacemaker") delivers all she
can: tons of tear-jerking melodrama, lots of pseudo-scientific explanations
about what's going on, and a slam-bang finale that involves gigantic tidal waves
destroying New York and Washington among other places.
"Deep Impact" is definitely a cut above most disaster epics, although that's not
saying much. On a tight schedule that involved finishing special effects shots
less than two weeks before theatrical release, Leder managed to get some
fantastic shots, including a highway jam-packed with escaping cars for endless
miles, and the aforementioned tidal waves, which were created in convincing
detail by the wizards at Industrial Light & Magic.
But because the story is divided up into several sub-plots, it's hard to get
involved with the characters. You can feel that the filmmakers were striving for
the same kind of emotional effect evoked in James Cameron's "Titanic," and in
some instances it succeeds. There are a few moments of genuine emotion,
especially the last scene between Jenny and her father. However, "Titanic" has
the benefit of being derived from a historic event that already carries
emotional weight; "Deep Impact," on the other hand, will always be a movie about
a giant meteor heading for Earth. Somehow, it's just not the same.


Title
Review for Vangelo secondo Matteo, Il (1964)
"The Gospel According to St. Matthew" ("Il Vangelo
secondo Matteo") (Italy, 1964)
A Film Review By James Kendrick
Director: Pier Paolo Pasolini
Screenplay: Pier Paolo Pasolini (based on the
Gospel of St. Matthew)
Stars: Enrique Irazoqui (Jesus Christ), Margherita
Caruso (Mary, as a Girl), Susanna Pasolini (Mary,
as a Woman), Marcello Morante (Joseph), Mario
Socrate (John the Baptist), Settimo Di Porto
(Peter), Otello Sestili (Judas), Ferruccio Nuzzo
(Matthew)
MPAA Rating: Not Rated
Review: ** (out of ****)
Pier Paolo Pasolini's "The Gospel According to St.
Matthew," certainly ranks as one of the most
unexpected films of all time. It was unexpected in
a number of senses, including the fact that the
film's writer/director not only rejected all forms
of organized religion, but he was also a Marxist
and an admitted homosexual.
So why did Pasolini make such a film? There are a
number of reasons, including his love and respect
for his mother, who was a devoted Catholic, and
his affinity for the socially aware Pope John Paul
XXIII (to whom the movie is dedicated). As
Pasolini himself put it, he made the film in a
"furious wave of irrationalism," much of which was
brought on by his growing unease with the ideology
of traditional Marxism and its antagonistic
relationship with Christianity.
Because Pasolini was such an unlikely candidate to
make this film, it shouldn't come as too much of a
surprise that his disarmingly simplistic style ran
counterpoint to other Christ films. "Gospel"
arrived right between two grand, Technicolor Jesus
epics: Nicholas Ray's "King of Kings" (1961) and
George Stevens' "The Greatest Story Ever Told"
(1965). This is not to mention the onslaught of
Hollywood's other Biblically-themed movies around
that time, including Cecil B. De Mille's "The Ten
Commandments" (1956) and John Huston's "The Bible"
(1966). What all those movies had in common was
their movieness -- they were large, boldly
conceived spectacles with enormous special effects
budgets and casts of thousands (Stevens even went
so far as to cast John Wayne as a Roman guard!).
When Pasolini's version was unveiled, it was
something of a shock. Filmed entirely in the
rocky, southern portions of Italy, and featuring a
cast of non-professional actors including the
director's own mother as Mary and a truck driver
as Judas, "The Gospel According to St. Matthew"
was quite a revolutionary film. There was no
grandiose color -- it was all shot in dusty black
and white, and the camerawork varied from
neorealism to shaky cinema verite. Although
the script adhered to the text of the Matthew's
Gospel in exacting fashion, "Gospel" was almost
the antithesis of all Christian epics before it.
It was small, spare, and deliberately plodding.
Unfortunately, what Pasolini's simple, bleak
vision proves is that small and spare is really no
more effective than glorious and overblown when
trying to adapt the Gospels to the screen.
Pasolini takes his film so far in the opposite
direction from those who had preceded him, that he
loses any sense of vitality and affection in the
story. The combination of his essential disbelief
in his subject matter and the Marxist imperative
to make a film with a national-popular dimension
renders the resulting film impotent on either
side.
While fundamentalist Christians were generally
accepting of the film, Pasolini was berated by
Marxists for having deserted them. Pasolini
defended himself by complaining about the
stagnation of traditional Marxism at that time,
and that he was trying to revive the ideology
through a rather unconventional "dialogue" with
Christianity. Because of this, many critics have
tried to shoehorn "Gospel" into a Marxist
interpretation, but it rarely works. Granted,
Jesus can be seen as a social outcast working on
behalf of the struggling proletariat, but it
stretches credulity to see "Gospel" as a truly
Marxist work of art.
Pasolini always defined himself first and foremost
as a poet, which is revealing in "The Gospel
According to St. Matthew," especially in his
choice to base the entire film on a single Gospel.
Pasolini made the decision early on to remain
almost completely faithful to the exact text of
the Book of Matthew, with no bridges between
scenes or added explanation about characters or
situations. His claim was that "inserted words or
images could never reach the poetic heights of the
text."
However, this ultimately turns out to be a
weakness in the film, because it ends up being
choppy and incomplete. The Book of Matthew does
not make for a good screenplay -- it's organized
topically rather than chronologically, and anyone
not familiar with the characters and situations in
advance might be somewhat confused at how the
story unfolds. The Gospels were written in almost
fragmented form, and each paints a slightly
different portrait of Jesus. The truest account
comes from the four Gospels being taken together
as a whole. By using only Matthew's account,
Pasolini made the project a little more
manageable, but only at the sacrifice of clarity.
One of the film's strengths is its use of actual
Italian peasants and beautiful location work.
Although it is historically inaccurate (aren't all
Biblical movies?), it's the spirit that matters,
and this is one of the points that Pasolini nails
down. The Book of Matthew was specific in its
portrayal of Jesus as a man who disdained a
typical leader role, and cared for the people no
one else cared about. Pasolini's Marxist
sensibilities are at their strongest when his
documentary-style camera is recording the wrinkled
and dusty faces of the poor people Christ spoke
to.
However, this same strength also works against the
film in certain portions. Pasolini often becomes
too fond of the masses, and the film moves back
and forth between identifying with them and
identifying with Christ. For instance, during the
Sermon on the Mount, the camera remains tightly
framed on Jesus' face for an extended period of
time, never once showing the reactions of the
crowd he's addressing. However, during Jesus' two
trials, Pasolini switches to a hand-held camera
and films the proceedings from the vantage point
of the crowed, complete with distant sound and the
backs of other people's heads obscuring the
foreground.
Much ado has been made about the naturalism of the
film, and how Pasolini captured the true essence
of the people; and while this is true, it
overlooks the fact that this is primarily the
story of Jesus of Nazareth, and if he doesn't work
as a character, the film doesn't work. In fact,
Pasolini's greatest failing is the casting and
portrayal of Jesus himself, and his relationship
with his disciples and the crowds.
Although Pasolini sought to reject all the
traditional iconography associated with the
Gospels (his Pharisees and Roman soldiers,
however, are modeled directly from paintings by
Piero della Francesca), he fell directly into the
aggravating myth that Jesus was gaunt, sallow, and
effectively feminine. When are filmmakers going to
realize that the man spent almost thirty years
working as a carpenter? Someday, a truly
revolutionary film about Christ will cast an actor
who looks as Jesus most likely would have been:
dark hair and skin, muscular, with shoulders like
a linebacker.
Instead, "Gospel" is filled with what Pauline Kael
rather bluntly termed, "that wretched masochistic
piety that makes movies about Christ so sickly."
Pasolini selected Enrique Irazoqui, a Spanish
college student, to play the pivotal role.
Irazoqui is a thin, slightly-built man with a
narrow, pointed face and dark, squinty eyes, whom
Kael accurately described as a "loathsome prissy
young man" who she couldn't wait to be crucified.
Irazoqui plays Christ as a lithe, but severe and
joyless man who seems to have little or no human
qualities (he smiles only once during the entire
film). Pasolini sees no happiness or enthusiasm in
Christ or his followers, and Irazoqui's portrayal
makes Jesus into a dull, dewy-faced bore spouting
Biblical teachings and parables as though he's
reading them from cue cards, whether that be
listing the beatitudes or droning out the Lord's
Prayer.
Watching him teach the masses or even his own
disciples, one has to wonder, who would be
interested in listening to him, much less leaving
their homes and families to follow him? There is
so much distance between the leader and his
followers, that it is almost impossible to accept
their relationship. The disciples are uniformly
interchangeable, and Christ addresses them in
several scenes with his back turned to them as
though they didn't matter. The same is true with
the masses -- they are sad and pathetic when he
begins to speak, and they are sad and pathetic
when he finishes, as if his words had no effect
whatsoever.
"The Gospel According to St. Matthew" is a trying
film to sit through. The opening segments dealing
with Mary and Joseph and the birth of Jesus, and
the closing segments dealing with his betrayal,
trial, crucifixion, and resurrection are
well-done. However, the middle hour and a half
detailing Christ's missionary travels bog down
immeasurably. At this point, the film's starkness
and documentary style take on a monotonous, static
quality that is almost unbearable.
What "The Gospel According to St. Matthew"
unwittingly suggests is that there is no truly
effective means of cinematically rendering the
story of Christ. In doing the exact opposite of
his predecessors and still failing to make a truly
vibrant, resounding film that remains true to the
nature of Christ without being preachy or
pedantic, Pasolini proved that the grass might not
be greener on the other side.
He also proved that adhering to the Biblical texts
don't guarantee success -- what works in print
doesn't always translate to screen. Twenty-four
years later, Martin Scorsese made "The Last
Temptation of Christ" based on a work of fiction,
and got closer to the heart of Christ and his dual
nature as man and God than Pasolini ever did.

Title
Review for Looking for Mr. Goodbar (1977)
Director: Richard Brooks || Screenplay: Richard Brooks (based on the novel by
Judith Rossner) || Stars: Diane Keaton (Theresa Dunn), Tuesday Weld (Katherine
Dunn), William Atherton (James), Richard Kiley (Mr. Dunn), Richard Gere (Tony),
Alan Feinstein (Martin), Tom Berenger (Gary), Priscilla Pointer (Mrs. Dunn) ||
MPAA Rating: R
"Looking For Mr. Goodbar" is a none-too-subtle cautionary tale about the dangers
of living a hedonistic nightlife masked by a legitimate daylife. The film stars
Diane Keaton as an attractive young woman named Theresa Dunn, who is a
successful and caring teacher of deaf students by day, and a nightclub-carousing
libertine by night. The message of director Richard Brooks, who adapted Judith
Rossner's popular novel of the same title, is twofold: first, a person can't
wear two faces at the same time without them interfering with each other, and
second, hedonism can only lead to eventual self-destruction.
Brooks gives us numerous reasons to explain Theresa's dangerous and often stupid
behavior when it comes to sex with strange men. Some of it is due to the
Freudian relationship with her overbearing father (Richard Kiley), as well as
her strict Catholic upbringing (why is Catholicism always blamed for sexual
dysfunction?). There was also a childhood episode involving extensive back
surgery, which left a long scar to remind her of the year she spent miserable in
a body cast.
Brooks also spends the first half-hour of the film detailing an unfulfilling
sexual relationship with her college professor, a blunt married man named Martin
(Alan Feinstein). Theresa has a crush on Martin, and although she gives up her
virginity to him, he basically treats her like dirt and dumps her, thus
introducing her to the notion that sex and love don't necessarily have to be
related. For the rest of the film, Theresa reverses the scenario with other men,
making sure that she is in the position of being the uncaring recipient of
pleasure, who doesn't have to take any responsibility for her actions.
And then there's the influence of Theresa's sister, Katherine (Tuesday Weld), a
light-headed airline stewardess who has numerous affairs and at least one
abortion, jumps into a quickie marriage with a Jewish man, and then experiments
with drugs, pornography, and group sex. Watching the two sisters develop as
characters is like watching side-by-side elevators going in opposite directions
- Katherine ends up getting clean and taking control of her life again, while
Theresa sinks into drugs, nameless sex, and general hedonism.
At one point in the film, Katherine tells Theresa that everybody is somehow
hurting, so everybody is looking for a painkiller; for Theresa, her heedless
lifestyle is her painkiller. She thinks that if she can have fun by sleeping
with strangers who never stay the night, she can absolve herself of the burden
of responsibility. The fact that it didn't work for Katherine should have been a
lesson for Theresa, but some people are simply intent on learning life's
harshest lessons firsthand, even if it means paying the ultimate price.
During the course of the film, Theresa meets a string of men, all of whom are
dangerous in one way or another. First, she meets a swinging, somewhat psychotic
playboy named Tony, played by a young Richard Gere with a bad Italian accent.
She later meets a liberal social worker named James (William Atherton), and
although he seems squeaky-clean on the outside, he harbors darkness inside.
There are others that are briefly mentioned in fleeting scenes, including a
perverted furniture salesman and a hypocritical police detective. Theresa sleeps
with all of them, because to her it's the sex that matters, not the person.
Parts of "Looking For Mr. Goodbar" are successful, especially its detailed
depiction of the Manhattan nightlife in the seventies. Some of it looks
painfully dated, especially the disco-themed soundtrack, but the basic timeless
elements are all there - heavy drinking, drug use, impulsive behavior, and an
atmosphere or reckless abandon.
The film was made several years before the AIDS epidemic struck, but that should
not blur the film's message. People sometimes forget that venereal disease is
not the only negative consequence of casual sex - there is a personal and
spiritual destruction, as well threats of physical violence. Anytime a person
allows someone else into that kind of physical closeness without knowing a thing
about him, there is an inherent element of risk that is made abundantly clear in
the film's graphically violent, but somehow inevitable conclusion.
Brooks, who has made many gritty, realistic films like "The Blackboard Jungle"
(1955) and the stark adaptation of Truman Capote's "In Cold Blood" (1967), would
seem like a perfect choice for this material. Social reality seems to be his
forte, but he goes against his better instincts by including several needless
fantasy sequences that are intended to illuminate Theresa's thoughts and dreams,
but end up being silly and distracting. Brooks also could have trimmed the film
by about twenty minutes, because it takes much more time than is needed to make
its point.
Much of the film's success can be attributed to Diane Keaton's stunning
performance. Almost the entire film is told from her point of view, which means
she is on-screen in almost every scene. Keaton makes Theresa into a complex
woman who knowingly wears two faces despite the obvious damage it is causing.
This is an incredibly difficult role to pull off, because Theresa must be both
infuriating and sympathetic at the same time. Keaton manages to do just that,
which lends weight and credibility to the cautionary tale the movie is so
desperate to put forward.


Title
Review for Sweet Sweetback's Baadasssss Song (1971)
Director: Melvin Van Peebles || Screenplay: Melvin Van Peebles ||
Stars: Melvin Van Peebles (Sweetback), Simon Chuckster (Beetle),
Hubert Scales (Mu-Mu), John Dullaghan (Commissioner), Rhetta
Hughes (Old Girl Friend), Mario Van Peebles (Young Sweetback),
John Amos (Motorcycle Guy) || MPAA Rating: X
Melvin Van Peebles' "Sweet Sweetback's Baadasssss Song" was a
watershed moment in the history of American cinema and the black
movement. It was released less than a decade after the Civil
Rights Movement had begun and almost twenty years before the
Rodney King incident. Its violent and highly sexualized revenge
tale of a macho black hustler fighting back against white
oppression and winning was something that had never been seen on
an American movie screen before. In style, content, and how it
was conceived and produced, "Sweet Sweetback" was a cinematic
revolution, whether or not one agrees with its subject matter.
Van Peebles, a black American who first gained recognition by
writing novels in France, built "Sweet Sweetback" from the ground
up almost entirely by himself. Because no studio would dare fund
such a film, he was forced to raise all the money himself. The
movie ended up costing about $500,000, part of which was put up
by none other than Bill Cosby. Van Peebles cut costs by hiring
non-union labor and taking on most of the film's responsibilities
himself. He wrote the script, scored the music, edited and
directed the film, as well as starred in the central role.
He was also a brilliant entrepreneur who always found a way to
make an extra buck. For instance, when the MPPA slapped the film
with a dreaded X-rating, Van Peebles not only threatened to bring
a lawsuit against Jack Valenti and the MPAA, but he also
developed a little marketing scheme: he coined the phrases "Rated
X by an all-white jury," which he put on the movie posters to
help advertise the film. He also printed the phrase on tee-shirts
which he had no problem selling.
The storyline in "Sweet Sweetback" is deceptively simple. It
takes place in Los Angeles, and Van Peebles stars as the title
character, a tough male hustler of few words who grew up in a
brothel, and makes money by doing what he does best: having sex.
One day, he agrees to go with a couple of amiable white cops down
to the station to make it look like they're bringing in suspects
on a politically-charged case involving murder. However, on the
way to the station the cops arrest a young black revolutionary
named Mu-Mu (Hubert Scales), who they proceed to beat viciously.
Acting out of complete impulse rather than political motivation,
Sweetback fights back and beats the cops to the brink of death.
The rest of the film follows Sweetback as he evades the cops on
his way to eventual escape in Mexico. Although the repetition of
watching Sweetback run gets a little old by the end of the film,
this plot allows Van Peebles' camera to roam the darker side of
L.A. - the ghettos, alleys, and back-street whorehouses that
other films had always overlooked.
Van Peebles' entire point in making the movie was to secure on
celluloid a vision of the black experience in America that other
filmmakers had ignored. At the beginning of "Sweet Sweetback," he
offers this epigraph, which is a traditional prologue used in
medieval times when a messenger brought bad news: "Sire, these
lines are not an homage to brutality that the artist has
invented, but a hymn from the mouth of reality..." Van Peebles
wanted to make sure that his vision was one of reality, not of
exaggeration.
Of course, with today's abundance of rap and hip hop music that
sings the same ode to black inner-city life, as well as films by
Spike Lee, John Singleton, and the Hughes Brothers, "Sweet
Sweetback" doesn't seem all that revolutionary. It is important
to remember that this film must be viewed in the context and time
period in which it was made. At that time, "Sweet Sweetback" was
so controversial that only two theaters in the entire United
States would play it. Distributors were petrified of a film that,
in Van Peebles' words, gave the black audience "a chance to see
some of their own fantasies acted out - about rising out of the
mud and kicking ass."
Of course, once it caught on, it caught on big. "Sweet Sweetback"
is now considered to be the film that kicked off the
blaxploitation era, although Van Peebles disassociates
"Sweetback" from other movies like "Shaft" (1972) and "The Mack"
(1973), because those were financed by big Hollywood studios.
"Sweet Sweetback" is also the only film deemed mandatory viewing
by the Black Panthers.
However, even if when viewed from an African-American
perspective, "Sweet Sweetback" is certainly not without its
controversies. When it was first released, an article was
published in "Ebony" magazine denouncing the film, while at the
same time the Black Panthers used an entire newsletter to praise
it.
There have been arguments that the victory for Sweetback is
really no victory at all - beating cops and then running away to
Mexico is nothing to be proud of. Others have pointed out that
Sweetback has little to say throughout the film; he has no
political motivations, and therefore the violence and havoc he
wreaks is not rooted in fundamental beliefs, but in personal and
selfish motives. Still others point to the cliché black potency
that stereotypes Sweetback as being good at nothing but having
sex, illustrated in a scene where he gains the respect of a white
biker group by bringing their female leader to orgasm.
Nevertheless, a movie like "Sweet Sweetback" cannot be made
without conflicting points of view. It is a revolutionary movie
not because it's about one man's defiance, but because it put
front-and-center black issues that had never been dealt with
before.  Until that point, American cinema was an almost
exclusively white domain, and with the exception of Sidney
Poitier, all black actors were relegated to specifically black
roles that were important only in relation to whites. The fact
that "Sweet Sweetback" was a movie by black about blacks, was
something new (in the opening credits, Van Peebles lists the
starring actors as simply "The Black Community").
Van Peebles tells an interesting story that goes a long way
toward defining the difference between "Sweet Sweetback" and all
movies that had come before it. When the movie first opened, he
saw it in a theater next to an older woman. Near the end of the
film, when Sweetback is wounded by the police and stumbling
through the Southern California desert, she kept saying to
herself, "Oh Lord, let him die. Don't let them kill him. Let him
die on his own." It was so ingrained in her mind that death was
imminent for any African-American in a movie who rebelled against
white authority, that she couldn't even conceive of the
possibility that the film might end with his successful escape.
And, of course, Sweetback does escape, and the screen fills with
the message: "Watch out! A baad asssss nigger is coming back to
collect some dues."
Beyond the political aspects, "Sweet Sweetback" is an
entertaining picture, which Van Peebles always intended it to be.
He squeezed every drop out of his limited budget, and produced a
film that, although dated now, was technically fantastic at the
time. He shot in rough, documentary-like fashion, while also
utilizing almost every visual and aural trick his technology
would allow him. He makes good use of older techniques like split
screens, freeze frames, reversed color schemes, and overlapping
images. The only time the film ever looks bad is during the night
sequences, because Van Peebles simply did not have the needed
equipment.
Watching "Sweet Sweetback" more than twenty-five years after its
initial release, one realizes that it still has bite. Arguments
can be made that race relations in the United States have made
quantum leaps since the early seventies, but there are still
problems that are reflected in this film. But there is more to
the film than its racial aspect. The legacy of "Sweet Sweetback's
Baadasssss Song" is not only the plentiful amount of art and
music told from the African-American perspective, but more
importantly, the work of every artist who has fought to fund and
produce that which is important to him.

Title
Review for American Pop (1981)
Director: Ralph Bakshi || Screenplay: Ronnie Kern || Voices: Gene
Borkan (Izzy), Frank DeKova (Crisco), Ben Frommer (Nicky
Palumbo), Jerry Holland (Louie), Roz Kelly (Eva Tanguay), Amy
Levitt (Nancy), Jeffrey Lippa (Zalmie), Lisa Jane Persky (Bella),
Elsa Raven (Hannele), Richard Singer (Benny), Marya Small
(Frankie), Leonard Stone (Leo), Eric Taslitz (Little Pete), Ron
Thompson (Tony) || MPAA Rating: R
"American Pop," Ralph Bakshi's animated generational history of
twentieth century American music, is an epic without scope. In
just over an hour and a half, it follows the paths of four
generations of fathers and sons, starting with their immigration
from czarist Russia, and taking them through the speakeasies of
Prohibition, the beatnik rhythms of the fifties, the drug-addled
sixties, and right into the New Wave era of the early eighties.
Any one of these segments, properly and thoroughly explored,
might have made an interesting film. Unfortunately, the way
screenwriter Ronnie Kern has it set up, "American Pop" is like a
tease - every time it starts engaging the viewer, it quickly
shifts gears and heads into a new decade, leaving the previous
developments all but forgotten.
The movie opens in Russia in 1907, when the family leaves the
violence of that country for the hope of America, symbolized by
Ellis Island. The first generation father starts out working in
vaudeville; but eventually he gets caught up in the Mafia's
dealings during Prohibition, and winds up in jail. The second
father is a quiet, masterful piano player who goes to World War
II and is killed by the Nazis while sitting at a piano.
The third father, Tony (voiced by Ron Thompson), is given the
deepest treatment. He is a rebellious young man who is awestruck
when he hears a beatnik reading from Allen Ginsberg's infamous
poem, "Howl." He travels across the U.S. - stopping long enough
in Kansas to father an illegitimate child via a one-night stand
with a waitress in a cornfield - before delving headfirst into
the rampantly hedonistic music scene of San Francisco in the
mid-sixties. There, he hooks up with a band obviously patterned
after Jefferson Airplane, where he writes songs and does a lot of
drugs.
But soon enough, the drug culture that spawned his success chews
Tony up and spits him out, leaving him alone with his son, Little
Pete (voiced by Eric Taslitz), who has managed to find him in
California. After the film's most effective dramatic scene
between a father and a son, Tony ends up deserting Little Pete.
Pete then grows up to be a cocaine dealer in the late seventies,
and eventually makes his way to stadium-filling stardom as a
full-fledged rock star, after wowing some of his drug clients by
pounding out Bob Seger's "Night Moves" on the piano (it's one of
several instances where the film has fictional characters writing
and performing actual songs as if they were their own).
If a single theme emerges from "American Pop," it's a lack of
paternal guidance resulting in profound unhappiness and loss of
identity. All four generations of fathers and sons have conflicts
in their relationships, and none of their lives end on an upbeat
note. One lands in jail; one dies violently in war; one is never
seen again after deserting his son; and although that final son
is last seen standing triumphantly on stage, it's not hard to
surmise that the drugs and fame will soon take their toll on him
as well.
This was surely Bakshi's intention, considering how essentially
downbeat and provoking most of his films have been. Bakshi
emerged in the early seventies as a kind of anti-Walt Disney by
introducing pimps and hookers and drug pushers into a mainstream
animated landscape that had previously been home only to the
likes Bambi and Snow White. One of Bakshi's earlier films, the
racially-charged "Coonskin" (1975)- which was later re-titled
"Streetfight" to avoid racist accusations - was a deliberate and
hilarious parody of Disney's "Song of the South."
Unlike that film, "American Pop" just isn't acerbic enough. The
tone is ultimately depressing, but Bakshi wraps it up in bright
colors and a pounding soundtrack of rock classics from Jimi
Hendrix, Janis Joplin, Jefferson Airplane, and Bob Seger (in
fact, it was the battle over the ancillary video rights to use
this music that kept the film off video shelves for so long). The
movie is a downer that doesn't have the sense to at least be
thought-provoking or shocking; it's just too plain for its own
good.
Maybe it's because "American Pop" is so steadfastly serious and
determined to rush through its eighty years of music-laden
history, that there's never a chance to crack a smile, either
on-screen or off. Bakshi's earlier animated films, including
"Coonskin" and his autobiographical "Heavy Traffic" (1973), dealt
with harsh social reality, but they were loaded with shocks,
jolts, and plenty of raw-edged humor. It gave those films life
and vitality, and "American Pop" displays none of that.
Technically, "American Pop" is one of Bakshi's more even-handed
efforts. His tendency is to mix too many styles and palettes,
including live action, animation, and still drawings, which
caused such ugly messes as "Wizards" (1977) and the awful ending
of "Lord of the Rings" (1978). "American Pop" maintains a
consistent visual style, but animation purists will be horrified
at the obvious rotoscoping throughout the film (For those who
don't know, rotoscoping is the practice of filming the movie
live-action, and then tracing the action into animation.)
Depending on one's point-of-view, rotoscoping is either a method
of achieving additional realism with ink and paper, or it is an
unforgivable bastardization of the animation process. I tend to
lean more toward the latter, because it seems pointless and
inartistic to deny the animators so much creativity. With the
action already on celluloid, all they do is trace the characters
and put them against expansive backdrops that would have cost
much more to film live. Much of it is probably due to money,
since Bakshi obviously didn't have the budget afforded a typical
Disney film. This is most obvious in large scenes filled with
many people - instead of having layers of animated people moving
about and creating a sense of motion and life, he simply pans
across a single, static drawing to establish the location. It
gets the job done, but it's a shortcut nonetheless.
However, "American Pop's" fundamental flaw is more basic than
technical merits or dramatic structure: simply put, there is
nothing about either the subject matter or its cinematic
treatment that in any way suggests it is best served through
animation. Nothing about the film couldn't have been done better
with live actors. For almost two decades, Bakshi waged a virtual
one-man fight to prove that animation was just as viable a medium
for telling mature, adult stories as live-action. If "American
Pop" proves anything, it's that some subjects are best left to
flesh and blood.

Title
Review for Jaws (1975)
director: Steven Spielberg
writers: Peter Benchley and Carl Gottlieb (based on of the novel by
Peter Benchley)
stars: Roy Scheider (Police Chief Martin Brody), Robert Shaw (Quint),
Richard Dreyfuss (Matt Hooper), Lorraine Gary (Ellen Brody), Murray
Hamilton (Mayor Larry Vaughn), Carl Gottlieb (Meadows), Jeffrey Kramer
(Deputy Hendricks), Susan Backlinie (Chrissie Watkins)
MPAA rating: PG
review: **** (out of ****)
"Jaws" is a rare film that grabs your attention before it shows you a
single image on screen. The movie opens with blackness, and only
distant, alien-like underwater sounds. Then it comes, the first ominous
bars of composer John Williams' now infamous score. Dah-dum. From there,
director Steven Spielberg wastes no time, taking us into the water on a
midnight swim with a beautiful girl that turns deadly. Right away he
lets us know how vulnerable we all are floating in the ocean, and once
"Jaws" has attacked, it never relinquishes its grip.
Perhaps what is most outstanding about "Jaws" is how Spielberg builds
the movie. He works it like a theatrical production, with a first act
and a second act. Unlike so many modern filmmakers, he has a great deal
of restraint, and refuses to show us the shark until the middle of the
second act. Until then, he merely suggests its presence with creepy,
subjective underwater shots and Williams' music. He's building the
tension bit by bit, so when it comes time for the climax, the shark's
arrival is truly terrifying. He doesn't let us get bored with the
imagery.
The first act opens with Police Chief Martin Brody (Roy Scheider), a New
York cop who has taken an easy, peaceful job running the police station
on Amity Island, a fictitious New England resort town where there hasn't
been a murder or a gun fired in 25 years. The island is shaken up by
several vicious great white shark attacks right before the Fourth of
July, and the mayor, Larry Vaughn (Murray Hamilton), doesn't want to
shut down the beaches because the island is reliant on summer tourist
money.
Brody is joined by Matt Hooper (Richard Dreyfuss), a young, ambitious
shark expert from the Marine Institute. Hooper is as fascinated by the
shark as he is determined to help Brody stop it -- his knowledge about
the exact workings of the shark ("It's a perfect engine, an eating
machine") make it that much more terrifying. When Vaughn finally
relents, Hooper and Brody join a crusty old shark killer named Quint
(Robert Shaw) on his decrepit boat, the Orca, to search for the shark.
The entire second act takes place on the Orca as the three men hunt the
shark, and inevitably, are hunted by it.
"Jaws" is a thriller with a keen sense of humor and an incredible sense
of pacing, tension, and horror. It is like ten movies all rolled into
one, and it's no wonder it took America by storm in the summer of 1975,
taking in enough money to crown it the box office champ of all time
(until it was unceremoniously dethroned in 1977 by "Star Wars"). Even
today, fascination with this film is on par with Hitchcock's "Psycho,"
and it never seems to age.
Although grand new technology exists that makes the technical sequences,
including several mechanical sharks, obsolete, none of it could improve
the film because it only would lead to overkill. The technical
limitations faced by Spielberg in 1975 may have actually produced a
better film because it forced him to rely on traditional cinematic
elements like pacing, characterization, sharp editing, and creative
photography, instead of simply dousing the audience with digital shark
effects.
Scheider, Dreyfuss, and Shaw were known actors at the time "Jaws" was
made, but none of them had the draw of a Robert Redford or Paul Newman.
Nevertheless, this film guaranteed them all successful careers because
each gave an outstanding performance and refused to be overshadowed by
the shark. Scheider hits just the right notes as a sympathetic husband
and father caught in the political quagmire of doing what's right and
going against the entire town. "It's your first summer here, you know,"
Mayor Vaughn warns him.
Dreyfuss, who had previously been seen in "American Graffiti" (1973) and
"The Apprenticeship of Duddy Kravitz" (1974) gives a surprisingly
mature, complex performance for someone who had literally only played
kids and teenagers. However, most outstanding is the gnarled performance
by Robert Shaw as the movie's Captain Ahab, a performance sorely
overlooked by the Academy Awards. Bordering of parody, Shaw plays Quint
as a grizzled old loner whose machismo borders on masochism. He's
slightly deranged, and Shaw's performance is almost a caricature.
However, there is one scene late in the film, when he and Brody and
Hooper are below deck on the Orca comparing scars. Quint is drawn into
telling the story of his experiences aboard the U.S.S. Indianapolis, a
Navy ship in World War II that was sunk by the Japanese. His tale of
floating in the water for more than a week with over 1,000 other men
while swarms of sharks slowly devoured them them is actually more
hair-raising than anything Spielberg put on screen. Shaw delivers the
story in one long take, and it is the best acting in the film.
Of course, we can't leave out the shark itself; with its black eyes,
endless rows of teeth, and insatiable urge to eat, it is basically the
epitome of all mankind's fears about what is unknown and threatening in
nature. A shark is such a perfect nemesis it is real -- having survived
sinch the dinosaurs, great whites do exist, they can be as large as the
shark in "Jaws," and they are a threat. Every one of Spielberg's
subjective underwater shots makes us feel queasy because lets us see how
we look to the shark: a bunch of writihing, dangling, completely
unprotected legs just ready to be chomped into.
The shark in "Jaws" was actually a combination of actual footage and
five different mechanical sharks (all nicknamed "Bruce" by the crew)
built to be shot from different angles. Many have forgotten, but "Jaws"
was a sort of precursor to "Waterworld" (1995), a movie's who soggy
production and cost overruns had Universal Studios worried about a bomb.
But, as we can see now, Spielberg overcame all the obstacles, and
delivered one of the finest primal scare-thrillers ever to come out of
Hollywood.


Title
Review for Grease (1978)
Director: Randall Kleiser
Screenplay: Bronte Woodard and Allan Carr (adapted by Carr from the
musical by Jim Jacobs and Warren Case)
Stars: John Travolta (Danny), Olivia Newton-John (Sandy), Stockard
Channing (Rizzo), Jeff Conaway (Kenickie), Didi Conn (Frenchy), Eve
Arden (Principal McGee)
MPAA Rating: PG
Review: *** (out of ****)
After the phenomenal success of the re-release of "Star Wars" last year,
the fifties'-style musical "Grease" seems like a logical flick to bring
back to theaters. Not only was it an enormous hit back in 1978, but like
"Star Wars," an entire generation of kids have grown up with it on
video, but have never seen it on the big screen. Not to mention, John
Travolta is even hotter now than he was in '78, the public is hungry for
seventies' memorabilia, and the music is still an ageless trip. The
soundtrack continues to sell well after twenty years, and a year ago the
"Grease Megamix" (a souped-up re-mix of bits and pieces of all the hit
songs) was one of the most requested tunes on pop stations around the
country.
So now "Grease" is back on the silver screen, and watching it again
feels like going to a class reunion. Seeing Travolta back in his early
twenties, with a lean body and greasy black ducktail makes it all the
more amusing to drop next door and see him playing a gray, overweight
Clinton clone in "Primary Colors." In both movies he radiates off the
screen like a true movie star, but in "Grease" it's a more primal,
teen-angst kind of stardom, like the kind Leonardo DiCaprio is currently
enjoying. And, like DiCaprio, Travolta was not only desired for his
physical attributes, but also for his talent -- he rode into "Grease" on
the critical and commercial success of "Saturday Night Fever," for which
he was nominated for a Best Actor Oscar.
In viewing "Grease" today, we are effectively in the late nineties
watching a film that was made in the late seventies reminiscing about
the late fifties. When "Grease" was made, there was a strong nostalgic
feel for the innocence and joviality of the late fifties; as the
turbulent seventies were coming to a close, with the emphasis on
Vietnam, Watergate, racial tension, and general unpleasantness, it was a
nice returning to a time when black leather, fast cars, and necking in
back seats were harmless means of being bad. Movies at the time were
gritty, urban tales of corruption and moral ambiguity, and "Grease" made
itself out to be the absolute antithesis.
Of course, the fifties portrayed in "Grease" is a time period that never
really existed.  It's more a whimsical version of how we think it was --
filled with shiny hot rods, black leather jackets, hip diners, clueless
principals, and gangs with names like the T-Birds and the Pink Ladies.
Everything is simplified down to its barest essentials, and that what's
so nice about the movie. It doesn't demand much of anything from the
audience, other than they check their problems at the door and have a
good time. The story about the good greaser Danny (Travolta), and his
love for the squeaky-clean new girl in town, Sandy (Olivia Newton-John),
is a kind of ageless high school myth.
"Grease" would probably never get made today (musicals are pretty much
dead, even when they're starring Madonna). Based on the hit Broadway
show by Jim Jacobs and Warren Case, "Grease" is imaginatively campy,
kind of goofy, but always energetic and fun. The music, ranging from the
disco-inspired opening song by Frankie Valli, to the infamous "Greased
Lightning" with all its automobile-inspired sexual innuendo, was hot
stuff then and still is now.
The songs, brought to life by the lively performances by Travolta and
Co. and the fantastic choreography by Patricia Birch, have a campy,
timeless quality that always makes you want to sing along with them, no
matter how cheesy (how can you not at least tap your feet to "Summer
Nights" or "You're the One That I Want"?). In fact, the musical
sequences will be the most eye-opening to those who have never seen
"Grease" on the big screen before. Those poor souls who have been stuck
with lousy pan-and-scan copies on video will be amazed seeing it in
widescreen for the first time, which finally allows full viewing of
Birch's dance numbers.
Probably the only let-down of "Grease" is how little it did for its
performers. It's easy to assume that a hit like this would be a
launching pad for its twenty-something actors and actresses, but in
fact, almost none of them went on to meaningful film careers. Jeff
Conaway, who was so good in the role of Danny's best friend Kenickie,
went nowhere. Didi Conn, who played the unforgettable Frenchy, didn't
even get that far (she was desperate enough to show up in "Grease 2").
Even Stockard Channing -- whose performance as Rizzo, the leader of the
Pink Ladies, gives "Grease" the closest thing it has to real drama --
had a mostly uneventful movie career until she resurfaced in the early
nineties with her Oscar-nominated role in "Six Degrees of Separation."
And what of the leads? How did Olivia Newton-John's career take off?
Does "Xanadu" ring a bell? And even Travolta, whose career seemed
infallible at the time, made one good film ("Blowout"), one okay film
("Urban Cowboy") and two really bad films ("Staying Alive" and "Two of a
Kind") before sinking into a fifteen-year rut until 1994's "Pulp
Fiction" set him free.
Nevertheless, "Grease" was a huge success for its time because it bucked
the trends and gave moviegoers something they hadn't seen in a long
time. Upbeat, funny, occasionally witty, and always enjoyable, "Grease"
is no great piece of art, but with its complete lack of pretension, it
is about as fun a movie experience as you can get, even with inflated
ticket prices.
Visit "Charlie Don't Surf!"
an eclectic collection of film reviews by James Kendrick
http://www.bigfoot.com/~jimkendrick
E-mail: jimkendrick@bigfoot.com

Title
Review for Jag är nyfiken - en film i gult (1967)
director: Vilgot Sjöman
writer: Vilgot Sjöman
stars: Lena Nyman (Lena), Vilgot Sjöman (Vilgot Sjöman), Börje Ahlstedt
(Börje, Lena's boyfriend), Peter Lindgren (Lena's Father), Chris
Wahlström (Rune's Woman), Marie Göranzon (Marie, Börje's mistress),
Magnus Nilsson (Magnus, Lena's school friend), Ulla Lyttkens (Ulla,
Lena's friend)
MPAA rating: Not rated
"I Am Curious -- Yellow" would mostly likely be a forgotten movie --
left somewhere in the ranks of slightly artistic avant garde films that
mix sex and politics -- if the U.S. Customs Office hadn't seized the
first copy being imported into the United States in 1968.
In its misguided attempt to protect decent American citizens from
Swedish obscenity, the government touched off a firestorm, and "I Am
Curious -- Yellow" became one the final straws that helped pull American
cinema out from under years of prior restraint by the Hays Code and
other forms of censorship. Several court cases later, "I Am Curious --
Yellow" was allowed to play in U.S. theaters, and despite picketing, it
did $20 million worthy of business from moviegoers dying to see on the
silver screen what their counterparts in Europe had been seeing for
years: bare skin and simulated copulation, all in the name of art.
I'm sure that back in the late sixties, when moviegoers flocked to the
few theaters that were brave enough to show such a film, their minds
were running away with dirty notions of what they might see. And some of
them may have been duly shocked at what they saw . . . forty minutes
into the film.
Despite its raunchy reputation as the movie that paved the way "Last
Tango in Paris" and "Showgirls," "I Am Curious -- Yellow" is a
surprisingly dull affair. In fact, it often borders on trite silliness
when it isn't being overbearingly pretentious. It's more political than
sexual, and the majority of the film is given over to endless ranting,
meandering storylines, and journalistic-style interviews about the
political climate in Sweden in the late sixties. It almost gives the
impression that there was no finished script in use while the film was
shot.
The 22-year-old heroine of the story is Lena (Lena Nyman), a
sociologist-wannabe trying to get herself situated in a constantly
changing world. She is insatiably curious about everything, and she
collects information in huge boxes organized alphabetically. The first
forty minutes of the movie deal primarily with her interviewing people
on the streets about their opinions on whether or not Sweden has a class
structure, if women have the same job opportunities as men, and so on
and so forth. It's vaguely interesting for the first ten minutes, but
one can only watch so many man-on-the-street interviews involving the
same questions before its gets tiresome.
However, that repetition makes the film's politics stick with you, even
more than the sexual imagery. A scene showing a man trying to explain
why a doctor should make more money than a dishwasher, a group of
Swedish youth in the streets protesting America's involvement in
Vietnam, footage of Martin Luther King explaining the tenets of
non-violence -- in the end, these are the things we remember from the
film.
The director, Vilgot Sjöman, started off in Swedish theater and moved on
to cinema in the early sixties. He directed "I Am Curious -- Yellow" as
a sort of cinema verite mock documentary, casting himself as the
director of the movie-within-a-movie and having all the actors use their
real names (he actually shot much more footage, which was released a
year later as a second film, "I Am Curious -- Blue," yellow and blue
being the colors of the Swedish flag).
Sjöman used grainy black and white photography with mostly handheld
cameras, and the inept editing and sound is most likely done on purpose.
But that doesn't stop it from being terribly distracting, because there
seems to be little reason why this particular story should be shot as a
documentary. Oftentimes the action will stop in the middle of scene, and
Sjöman will walk on-camera and begin coaching the actors about their
lines.
While "I Am Curious -- Yellow" certainly represents an important moment
in world cinema, it has mellowed with age and is now merely a curiosity
piece, rather than a controversial exploration of politics and sex. I
have no doubt that the MPAA would slap it with an NC-17 rating if it
were ever re-released into U.S. theater (there's far too much male
frontal nudity), but despite its intrinsically biting nature, it still
feels droll and creaky when seen today.


Title
Review for Sweet Hereafter, The (1997)
director: Atom Egoyan
screenwriter: Atom Egoyan (based on the novel by Russell Banks)
stars: Ian Holm (Russell Stephens), Bruce Greenwood (Billy Ansell),
Gabrielle Rose (Dolores Driscoll), Sarah Polley (Nicole Burnell), Tom
McCamus (Sam Burnell), Brooke Johnson (Mary Burnell), Maury Chaykin
(Wendell Walker), Alberta Watson (Risa Walker), Arsinee Khanjian (Wanda
Otto), Earl Pastko (Hartley Otto), Stephanie Morgenstern (Allison),
Caerthan Banks (Zoe Stephens)
MPAA rating: R
Review: **** (out of ****)
In "The Sweet Hereafter," writer/director Atom Egoyan takes us beyond
the tragedy of death into the tragedy of living. He shows us how it
isn't dying that hurts, but rather the pain of living in the hereafter
of death, and dealing with the loss and grief that it brings.
On a cold winter day in a small, isolated town in British Columbia, a
school bus full of children slides off the highway and onto a frozen
lake, where it cracks through the ice and sinks. Fourteen children die,
and numerous others are hurt. For the residents of this small town, all
of whose children were on that bus, it is an earth-shattering event that
resolutely alters their lives. They have always relied on each other in
the past to deal with heartache and pain, but it seems that this tragedy
is more than they can handle.
Alberta and Risa Walker, who own a local motel and lost their child in
the accident, hire an attorney named Mitchell Stephens (Ian Holm) to
bring a lawsuit against someone, anyone for responsibility. The bus
driver, Dolores Driscoll (Gabrielle Rose), is a kindly woman who loved
the children and, although she lives with a burden of guilt, is not held
responsible for the accident. The bus seems to have simply slipped on
some ice, and there was nothing should could do to prevent it.
However, according to Stephens, there are no "accidents" in life, and
someone will pay for this tragedy, whether that be the manufacturer of
the bus or the guardrail the bus broke through. He goes through the
town, approaching the parents who have lost children, asking them to
join the class action suit and find vent for their anger. And, for his
work, Stephens will receive one-third of the settlement money.
However, it is immediately apparent that Stephens has little or no
interest in the money. He is driven by something else, something deeper
that he shares in common with the grieving parents. He has lost a child,
too, but not in the same manner. His daughter, Zoe (Caerthan Banks), who
once almost died in his arms as a young child after a spider bite, has
been in and out of drug re-hab clinics and detox stations for ten years.
She calls him on an irregular basis, begging him for money, but refusing
to tell him what she needs it for. "I don't know who I'm taking to," he
tells her. In his mind, his daughter is dead.
The lawsuit is, to Stephens, not only a way to mend the town's pain, but
also his own. However, not everyone in town wants it to happen. Billy
Ansell (Bruce Greenwood), who was driving behind the bus when the
accident happened and lost two children, wants nothing to do with it. He
has already lost his wife, and he buries his grief in an affair with a
married woman. He doesn't want to talk about the accident, and he sees
the lawsuit as nothing more than the unnecessary opening of old wounds.
To him, the town should be able to take care of its own pain, and it
doesn't need outsiders like Stephens getting in the way.
Central to "The Sweet Hereafter" is the tale of Nicole Burnell (Sarah
Polley), a teenage girl who dreams of being a singer before the accident
turned her into "a wheelchair girl," as she puts it. Aside from
Stephens, Nicole is the most complex character in the film, and it is
she who ultimately decides the fate of the town and how the lawsuit will
turn out.
It is also her sad, haunted voice that we often hear on the soundtrack,
reading Robert Browning's poem about the Pied Piper, and how when he led
all the town's children away, one was left behind because he was
crippled. Obviously, Nicole is that child, and she feels somehow
betrayed that the rest of the town's children left her alone by dying in
the wreck.
Her situation is further complicated because she is involved in a
loving, but incestuous relationship with her father (Tom McCamus). There
is only one, fleeting scene that suggests this relationship, but it is
somehow tied into the final act of the film. Of all the storylines in
"The Sweet Hereafter," this is the most complicated and unresolved,
although its implications stretch throughout the entirety of the film.
Egoyan knows that the kinds of questions he brings up have no simple
answers -- if any at all -- and he doesn't condescend to the audience by
trying to neatly wrap it up.
What Egoyan has done in "The Sweet Hereafter" is really nothing short of
miraculous. In his adaptation of the novel by Russell Banks, he has made
a deeply moving film about a lawyer by transcending the pettiness of law
and driving headlong into the deeper meaning of what is loss, and how
pitiful monetary and material possessions are when compared to human
life.
Egoyan has always been a talented, but distant and cerebral filmmaker
whose work suffered only in that it felt so cold. "The Sweet Hereafter"
is quite the opposite; Egoyan's stylistic and narrative structures work
brilliantly to heighten the impact of the natural emotion, and draw the
audience into the tragedy. "The Sweet Hereafter" seems to contain the
combined emotional impact that all his other films lacked.
The film is filled with beautiful, subtle performances from all the
actors, especially Ian Holm as the lawyer and Sarah Polley as the sad
child who was left behind. The beautiful, roving camerawork by Paul
Sarossy and the haunting, melodic musical score by Mychael Danna (both
previous Egoyan collaborators) give the film a visual and aural
cohesiveness with the thematic elements.
Like his earlier films, Egoyan weaves together multiple storylines that
form a blanketing whole. He works with time as a fluid substance,
shifting back and forth between the past, the distant past, and the
present with effortless ease. The actual bus wreck itself doesn't happen
until midway through the film, but by that time the event has built up
so much emotion that Egoyan can film it from a distance with no graphic
detail, and still have it carry great, devastating weight.
Because human life has become such a cheap commodity in movies, it is
astounding that Egoyan can convey so much heartbreak in such simple,
direct terms. Certainly one of the best films of 1997, "The Sweet
Hereafter" is a deeply rewarding, mystifying, and ultimately human film.


Title
Review for She's So Lovely (1997)
Director: Nick Cassavetes / Screenplay: John
Cassavetes / Stars: Sean Penn (Eddie), Robin
Wright Penn (Maureen), John Travolta (Joey), Harry
Dean Stanton (Shorty), Debi Mazar (Georgie), James
Gandolfini (Kiefer), Kelsey Mulrooney (Jeanie) /
MPAA Rating: R / Review: ** (out of ****)
The only way to approach "She's So Lovely" is with
the understanding that everyone in the film is
crazy in one way or another. Their decisions are
illogical and often infuriating, and the movie has
no pretension of passing judgment on them or even
understanding why they are the way they are. You
must come to this film with the anticipation that
little or nothing about these characters makes
sense, because if you try to understand them, you
will be completely frustrated.
Personally, I am not a big fan of this kind of
film, and I have to admit this movie frustrated
me. I don't mind crazy characters, but I like to
have some kind of reasoning behind their mania. In
movies like "She's So Lovely," the characters'
weirdness is just taken for granted with no frame
of reference, and it gives license for the
filmmakers to do almost anything, because it can
be explained away. Remember, they're crazy -- it
doesn't have to make sense.
The film was directed by Nick Cassavetes, the son
of legendary actor and pioneer independent
writer/director John Cassavetes, who wrote the
script. The elder Cassavetes had originally
intended to direct and star in the film himself
back in the 1970s, but he was never able to get
the project off the ground before he died in 1989.
While his son's directing style is much more
controlled and refined than his father's, he
respects the manic people which are so dear to his
father. Alcoholism, insanity, and violence are all
at the heart of "She's So Lovely," although at
times it's intended to play as a comedy.
The film opens with Maureen (Robin Wright Penn),
waking up in a drunken stupor to find that her
husband, Eddie Quinn (Sean Penn) is still missing
after three days. She's pregnant, and apparently
Eddie is having trouble dealing with that fact, so
he tends to disappear for days at a time. She goes
down to the seedy, smoke-filled local bar where
Eddie usually hangs out, but his best friend
Shorty (Harry Dean Stanton) hasn't seen him.
Maureen ends up having drinks with her neighbor,
Kiefer (James Gandolfini), and when they go back
up to his apartment, he attacks her and beats her
up.
Maureen is terrified that Eddie will find out
Kiefer beat her up, because she knows Eddie is
slightly imbalanced and has an intense violent
streak. So, when she finally finds him, she lies
and says she fell. It doesn't take Eddie long to
figure out what happened, and he goes after Kiefer
with a gun. Maureen calls the local mental
institution to pick Eddie up, and when the
orderlies arrive to take him away, Eddie shoots on
of them in the stomach. He is eventually caught by
the police, and locked up in the institution.
Fast forward ten years, and Maureen has cleaned
herself up, gotten off drugs, divorced Eddie,
stopped wearing heavy black eye make-up, and is
now married to a rich contractor named Joey (John
Travolta). She and Joey have three daughters, one
of whom is actually Eddie's, and they live in
comfortable suburban splendor. Unfortunately, that
splendor is disrupted when Eddie is released from
the institution, and comes looking for Maureen,
sure that he still loves her and she still loves
him. In fact, he's absolutely right. Maureen tells
Joey to his face the morning Eddie is being
released, "I love you, but I love him
more."
"She's So Lovely" begins and ends very abruptly.
Many people will be extremely baffled by it,
especially because the previews made it look like
a quirky romantic comedy. The movie seems to want
to tell a simple story, but it has everything
going against it. It comes at you in sudden
bursts, and there is little explanation about
characters or situations. For instance,
Maureen-Eddie and Maureen-Joey is bridged with a
black screen and the titles "Ten Years Later."
There movie doesn't go into how and why Maureen
and Joey got together and, more importantly, why
their marriage seems so unhappy.
Although it's readily apparent that Maureen will
most likely leave Joey for Eddie, you don't feel
sorry for Joey because he's a loud-mouthed,
obnoxious, boor of a man. Was he like this when
Maureen first met him? If he was, is it because
she's naturally attracted to crude, violent men?
In fact, the movie doesn't give us anyone to
identify with (unless you're a sociopath), so we
are given the strange opportunity to sit back and
not take sides while Maureen, Eddie, Joey and even
Shorty fight it out in the living room like a
sitcom on acid.
The saving grace of "She's So Lovely" are the
performances, especially Sean Penn's which won him
top honors at the 1997 Cannes Film Festival. His
Eddie is a constant enigma, ranging from fiercely
violent to almost child-like passivity. Travolta
plays strongly against type, and it is only his
insensitive idiocy that adds any laughs to the
film. Robin Wright Penn, who is married to Sean
Penn in real life, gives an affecting performance
as the woman caught in the middle (although her
New York accent is a bit overbearing at times).
She is the most confusing character because you
keep wanting to believe that she is sane, when in
fact, she may be the craziest person in the whole
movie.
"She's So Lovely" is really more of a curiosity
piece than anything else. It's not really
satisfying as a well-told story or as a character
study, so it can only be taken as an off-beat
movie that defies all the typical rules of comedy
and drama. Not for all tastes, but some will find
it quite fascinating, although I wasn't one of
them.

Title
Review for Big Hit, The (1998)
Director: Che-Kirk Wong || Screenplay: Ben Ramsey || Stars: Mark
Wahlberg (Melvin Smiley), Lou Diamond Phillips (Cisco), Christina
Applegate (Pam Schulman), Avery Brooks (Paris), Bokeem Woodbine
(Crunch), Lela Rochon (Chantel), China Chow (Keiko Nishi), Sab
Shimono (Jiro Nishi), Robin Dunne (Gump) || MPAA Rating: R
There are scenes in "The Big Hit" that are so awful, they simply
defy description. The movie is infected with the same kind of
blunderheaded idiocy and misplaced confidence that made "Last
Action Hero" (1993) such a chore to sit through.
Presumably, "The Big Hit" is an action-comedy, a difficult but
not impossible genre to pull off. Movies of this sort require a
fine balance and careful tone, and the comedy is usually meant to
work as catharsis for the violence. "Lethal Weapon 2" (1989) is a
perfect example of an action thriller that was also very, very
funny. Unfortunately, in "The Big Hit," it seems that comedy is
the main motive, and the violence is only intended to punctuate
the laughs. Unfortunately, there are no laughs.
The movie resembles some of the goofy, throwaway ridiculousness
of early Jackie Chan films, but it doesn't benefit from Chan's
incredible stunts and goofy, charismatic presence. Instead, we
are left with a lot of digital effects and Mark Wahlberg, who
must have considered himself invincible after his
critically-acclaimed performance in last year's "Boogie Nights."
However, if he wants to maintain a decent career, he had better
start selecting his projects more carefully - movies like this
are a sure-fire recipe for a long career in the straight-to-video
market.
Wahlberg plays Melvin Smiley, an amiable guy who also happens to
be a professional hitman (see "Grosse Pointe Blank" for the same
character, much better developed). The movie wants us to think,
"Gee how clever and ironic - a guy who can kill without any moral
implications, and yet he can't stand for anyone not to like him."
The fact is, Melvin is so desperate to keep people from not
liking him, that he puts up with both an obnoxious fiancee
(Christina Applegate, with a horrendous New York accent) and an
abusive girlfriend (Lela Rochon ) who is only using him for his
money. His constant bending over backwards to please people makes
him a complete patsy at best, and a thoroughly unbelievable
character at worst.
Melvin is employed exclusively by a crime boss named Paris (Avery
Brooks) as part of a team of hitmen, which also includes Cisco
(Lou Diamond Phillips) and Crunch (Bokeem Woodbine). One day,
Melvin agrees to do some moonlighting with Cisco by kidnapping
the teenage daughter of a rich Japanese mogul named Jiro Nishi
(Sab Shimono) for a million dollar ransom.
However, not only has Jiro Nishi lost all his money producing a
big Hollywood movie (inside joke, get it?), but his kidnapped
daughter, Keiko (China Chow), also happens to be Paris'
goddaughter. So, when Paris finds out she's been kidnapped, he
takes it personally and becomes determined to find out who did
it. Not knowing the Cisco is actually behind the whole scheme,
Paris puts him in charge of rooting out the kidnapper. Of course
Cisco blames the whole thing on poor, innocent Melvin.
Along the way, there are several obligatory gunfights,
explosions, and car chases, plus a literal cliffhanger inspired
by "Jurassic Park," and a completely unconvincing romance between
Melvin and Keiko (who looks like she's barely pushing fifteen).
What the movie passes off as humor resorts to thoroughly unfunny
jokes about overweight Jewish mothers, hara-kiri, drinking
problems, leaking body bags, and a running gag about how Crunch
has recently discovered the pleasures of masturbation, and now
spends all his time doing hand exercises. Not to mention the
pimply video store clerk who is always calling Melvin and
screeching about how he needs to return his copy of "King Kong
Lives," which is two weeks overdue.
This mess of a movie was helmed by Che-Kirk Wong, the latest Hong
Kong director imported by John Woo ("Face/Off"), who also served
as executive producer. Woo needs to stop acting as a conduit for
other directors, and start making more of his own films. Wong,
who directed such films as "Rock'n'Roll Cop" back in Hong Kong,
is completely tone deaf when it comes to comedy. Maybe jokes
about vexatious video clerks and vomiting on other people are
funny across the ocean, but they're not here, at least in the
manner Wong handles them.
Many of the problems can be traced back to the script, which was
penned by obvious freshman writer Ben Ramsey. In addition to his
vague characterizations and uninspired action sequences, Ramsey's
script assaults the audience with his attempts to copy the
vulgar, poetic rhythms of Tarantino or Mamet-style dialogue. What
he comes out with is just a lot of annoying blather, most of
which spews from the lips of Lou Diamond Phillips (whose favorite
phrase is "It's all love") and Robin Dunne, who plays Cisco's
stuttering, black-wannabe assistant. The irritation factor of
Phillips and Dunne combined is almost off the scale, which can
pretty much describe the film as a whole.

Title
Review for City of Angels (1998)
Director: Brad Silberling || Screenplay: Dana Stevens (based on
an original screenplay by Wim Wenders and Peter Handke) || Stars:
Nicolas Cage (Seth), Meg Ryan (Maggie), André Braugher (Cassiel),
Dennis Franz (Messinger), Colm Feore (Jordan), Robin Bartlett
(Anne), Joanna Merlin (Teresa) || MPAA Rating: PG-13
There is a striking scene early in "City of Angels," where all
the angels who live unseen in our midst, gather at the beach to
watch the sun rise. The camera moves above them, showing the
endless rows of ethereal men and women, all garbed in black. Then
the camera moves in on the face of Seth, an angel played by
Nicolas Cage, and as the sun rises, he smiles and his entire face
lights up. You see, the angels can hear music in sunrises and
sunsets, but they cannot feel a human touch.
It is an important scene for several reasons. First of all, it is
one of many instances in the film that make angels seem
thoroughly plausible. The film presents these fantastic beings as
normal-looking people who drift amongst the inhabitants of earth,
watching what goes on with little interference. There are none of
the standard, hokey angel references used in recent films like
"Angels in the Outfield" (1994) or "Michael" (1996). The angels
here are stark and believable.
This early scene on the beach is also an important scene of
juxtaposition, for its shows how God's angels can enjoy aspects
of the earth that human cannot, and yet they are denied so many
simple human pleasures, like feeling the sand on their feet or
the waves lapping at their legs, or the smell of the salt in the
air. There is an inherent tragedy in being an angel, although
there is much beauty in it as well. They eternally walk the
earth, listening to our thoughts, touching us in our pain, and
leading the dying to heaven. Like human existence, being an angel
is often confused and unsure.
"City of Angels" is essentially a love story, between Seth and a
human, a beautiful but sad heart surgeon named Maggie (Meg Ryan).
He first sees her when he is in her operating room, waiting to
lead the soul of her dying patient to heaven. Maggie is
distraught, doing everything in her power to stop the man from
dying on her table, and Seth is moved by her efforts and, more
importantly, her overwhelming sadness when the patient dies.
Angels have the limited power to soothe humans in time of misery
and pain, and Seth does what he can with his invisible touch, but
it's not enough. He wants to be with her and share her pain, not
just stand back at a distance.
He learns that the only way to fulfill his desire for human love
and touch is for him to "fall" and become human. He learns this
from another fallen angel, played by Dennis Franz ("N.Y.P.D.
Blue") in a touching and humorous performance. Sitting at a diner
together, Franz tells Cage's character about how wonderful it is
to be human - to be able to taste food, feel another person's
skin, smell the air, and most importantly, have a loving wife and
children. Of course, there is pain to go along with all this, but
for Seth, it will be worth it.
"City of Angels" is something of a reinterpretation of Wim
Wender's haunting 1988 film "Wings of Desire." Wenders' film was
more like a poem - it was the feeling, the emotion that truly
mattered over what actually happened. The Americanized version
moves the location from divided Berlin to broken Los Angeles, and
the emphasis shifts onto the relationship between the immortal
angel and the mortal human. And, unlike most foreign films that
are re-made into Hollywood fare, it doesn't suffer extensive
damage. This may be because director Brad Silberling ("Casper")
and screenwriter Dana Stevens ("Blink") wanted to make "City of
Angels" its own movie - inspired by "Wings of Desire," but not an
attempt to copy it.
And yet, "City of Angels" is not a typical Hollywood movie. It is
beautifully filmed in lush colors by cinematographer John Seale
("The English Patient"), whose sweeping aerial shots and golden
lighting make Los Angeles into an almost unrecognizable new
world.  Seale creates many striking visuals: in addition to the
beach scene, there is a wonderful sequence in a circular library
where all the angels appear at banisters all around, looking down
at Seth as he watches Maggie walk by.
While the film travels along a charted plot, it takes time to
develop its characters and situations; it sheds light on the
boundaries between what is earthly and what is heavenly, and
shows just how thin those boundaries are. Both Cage and Ryan give
soulful, soft-spoken performances. Ryan, who is usually so bouncy
and energetic, truly embodies a sadness that can only be
alleviated by a heavenly touch. Cage projects all his desire and
longing to be human in simple, heartfelt gazes, and speaks with
the comforting, knowing voice that only an angel could have.
What is most striking about "City of Angels" is that Stevens has
added a new ending to the screenplay, which is both unexpected
and challenging. It's not a formulaic Hollywood ending, because
it is both sad and uplifting at the same time.  It doesn't give
the audience what it thinks it wants at the end of a romance.
Instead, it offers something much better, something that speaks
to the depths of what it means to be human and alive.
           ____________________________________________
                   Visit "Charlie Don't Surf!"
     an eclectic collection of film reviews by James Kendrick
          http://www.bigfoot.com/~jimkendrick || E-mail:
                     jimkendrick@bigfoot.com

Title
Review for Life Less Ordinary, A (1997)
director: Danny Boyle
screenwriter: John Hodge
stars: Ewan McGregor (Robert), Cameron Diaz (Celine), Holly Hunter
(O'Reilly), Delroy Lindo (Jackson), Ian Holm (Naville), Ian McNeice
(Mayhew), Stanley Tucci (Elliot), Dan Hedaya (Gabriel)
MPAA rating: R
Review: **1/2 (out of ****)
"A Life Less Ordinary" premiered in theaters with heavy anticipation as
the follow-up film by director Danny Boyle, screenwriter John Hodge, and
actor Ewan McGregor, the team that brought the wildly entertaining
"Trainspotting" (1995) to life. Unfortunately, the film was ransacked by
critics and, worse, lost on audiences. Its love story of a
kidnapping-gone-wrong mixed with heavenly angels and earthly black humor
was either too bizarre, not bizarre enough, or just plain muddled.
Nevertheless, "A Life Less Ordinary" is a slightly better movie than it
was made out to be, although it comes nowhere close to the astounding
achievement of "Trainspotting," or even Boyle's freshman film, "Shallow
Grave" (1994). Here, the filmmakers try to put a fresh, clever spin on
what is essentially an old, tired story, and the result is a freaky
grab-bag of humor, action, and surreal idiocy.
McGregor stars as Robert, an aspiring pulp novelist who works as a
janitor at a huge, unnamed corporation run by a selfish, cruel
millionaire mogul (Ian Holm). On the same day Robert is informed that he
has been replaced by a robot, his girlfriend dumps him for an aerobics
instructor. In a moment of sheer frustration, Robert bursts into Holm's
office to complain about his unfair treatment. He is quickly swamped by
security guards, and in a sequence reminiscent of "The Three Stooges,"
he manages to get one of their guns and escape by kidnapping the mogul's
daughter, Celine (Cameron Diaz), who happens to be in the office.
The whole time we know that Robert and Celine are supposed to eventually
fall in love. The movie opens in heaven (everything is white, how
original) where the archangel Gabriel (Dan Hedaya in either the best or
worst casting decision in years, depending on your view) is instructing
two lesser angels, Jackson (Delroy Lindo) and O'Reilly (Holly Hunter)
that God is upset about the divorce rate. Gabriel tells them that they
must go to earth to ensure that Robert and Celine fall in love, or they
will be exiled on earth permanently.
>From here, it's not hard to see where the plot goes. Celine is not a
passive kidnappee, and it isn't long before she's helping the befuddled
Robert get a bigger ransom (she was offended that he would only ask for
$500,000). Celine and her dad don't get along very well, and she sees
Robert as a great opportunity to get back at him. Robert turns out to be
more of a victim because he's simply too nice to be a kidnaper. He
apologizes to everyone for everything, and his inability to assert
himself is displayed in a hilarious sequence where he tries
(unsuccessfully) to make a threatening ransom demand over the phone.
Through all this lunacy, McGregor and Diaz are the only actors who make
it out alive. McGregor's Robert is an amusing and sympathetic character,
while Diaz makes Celine into a believably frustrated rich-girl who has
spent her whole life searching for a man who's not like her father. Ian
Holm, who was so brilliant in "The Sweet Hereafter," is a boring
caricature of wealthy insolence. Delroy Lindo and especially Holly
Hunter are downright goofy as the angels; Hunter does some kind of weird
and ineffectual combination of her performance in "Raising Arizona" and
"Crash."
Some of this may be because Boyle doesn't put any tight restrictions on
his direction; he seems willing to just go with the flow. The stylized
cinematography by Brian Tufano ("Trainspotting," "Dreamscape") gives the
film's assorted locations a wicked, cartoonish feel; the colors are
exceptionally bright and glossy, as if everything was lit with one light
too many. He has one great transition shot, from a scene in heaven to a
sparkling blue swimming pool in the Hollywood hills.
In fact, if anything undermines "A Life Less Ordinary," it is the script
by John Hodge, whose adaptation of "Trainspotting" was nominated for an
Oscar. Here he doesn't seem to have a very clear-cut notion of what he
wants, so the movie is uneven throughout.
For instance, he insists on including angels and divine intervention
(the end of the movie is a literal deux ex machina), but he never
establishes clear guidelines within which the angels must act. On earth,
they appear to be completely human and can only operate within the same
earthly confines as you or I, but in one sequence Holly Hunter's
character is literally crushed between a falling pickup truck and a
giant rock, and she comes away with only a broken arm. Plus, Hodge's
ideas about intervention in the name of love are a bit screwy, since the
angels do more harm than good.
But, of course, that may have been in the service of making what is
essentially 45 minutes worth of material much longer . . .


Title
Review for Primary Colors (1998)
Director: Mike Nichols
Screenplay: Elaine May (based on the novel by Anonymous)
Stars: John Travolta (Gov. Jack Stanton), Emma Thompson (Susan Stanton),
Billy Bob Thornton (Richard Jemmons), Kathy Bates (Libby Holden), Adrian
Lester (Henry Burton), Maura Tierney (Daisy Green), Larry Hagman (Gov.
Fred Picker), Diane Ladd (Mamma Stanton), Paul Guilfoyle (Howard
Ferguson), Rebecca Walker (March)
MPAA rating: R
Review: **1/2 (out of ****)
"Primary Colors" opens and closes with images of hearty handshakes. The
handshakes at the beginning of the film are introductory, as an unknown
Democratic candidate named Jack Stanton (John Travolta) from a forgotten
Southern state is trying to ingratiate himself with potential voters. At
the end of the film, that same unknown candidate is now President of the
United States, and the handshakes are congratulatory, as he thanks all
the men and women who worked behind the scenes to get him to the top.
I don't mind giving away the ending because I think we all knew it
already. No matter how much director Mike Nichols tries to deny it, Jack
Stanton is (or will be seen by the majority of the public as) a
thinly-veiled personage of Bill Clinton, and we all know how his 1992
presidential campaign ended. In between the handshakes that open and
close the film, "Primary Colors" weaves the tale of everything that goes
on -- both known and unknown to the public -- in order to get Stanton to
the Oval Office.
There is no sense in denying the connection between the film and real
life. If Nichols had really wanted to disassociate Stanton from Clinton,
why did he have Travolta not only impersonate Clinton in voice and
manner, but also put on weight and streak his hair gray? There are a
million opportunities to separate fact from fiction, and yet the movie
never takes those routes, and the results might be confusing to those
who aren't sure where the separation lies.
The movie is based on the novel by Joe Klein, a reporter for "Newsweek"
whose position as author of the book remained anonymous for six months
before "The Washington Post" ousted him. A great deal of the book is
pure fiction, but a great deal more of it is uncannily reflective of the
actual 1992 presidential campaign. Why else would it have stirred up all
the controversy it did when it was first published two years ago?
Both the book and the movie are told not from Stanton's perspective, but
through the eyes of Henry Burton (English stage actor Adrian Lester), a
campaign manager based on George Stephanopoulos, who is now a media
consultant for ABC. Burton is a young, idealistic political worker whose
grandfather was a great civil rights leader (unlike Stephanopoulos,
Burton is black). He joins Stanton's team because he truly believes that
Stanton is a winner, someone who really cares about the common people
and the issues facing them.
Among the other characters are Stanton's shrewd and sometimes icy wife,
Susan (Emma Thompson), obviously based on Hillary Clinton; Richard
Jemmons, the crafty, obnoxious redneck James Carville clone played by
Billy Bob Thornton; Daisy Green (Maura Tierney), based on campaign
advisor Mandy Grunwald; and last but certainly not least, Libby Holden,
the character played by Kathy Bates based on "the dust buster" Betsey
Wright, who spent most the '92 campaign digging up dirt in order to
protect Clinton from "bimbo eruptions."
In the weeks before the film opened, the question on everybody's mind
was whether it would remain true to the angry, indicting portrait of the
Clinton-like character painted by the novel. There was a great deal of
speculation that Hollywood, which so infatuates Clinton and is so
infatuated with him, would be unable to deliver a $65 million movie that
makes him look bad. Would Nichols' attendance of Clinton-thrown dinner
parties at Martha's Vineyard taint his ability to be critical of the
president, even in this fictional form? Would Thornton, an Arkansas
native and big Clinton supporter who actually asked the President's
permission to appear in the film, try to make his Carville character
look more decent that the conniving, sexist pig in the book?
In short, the movie is no doubt a softened version of the book. Of
course, how you feel about Bill Clinton will greatly taint your response
to the film's lighter look at his fictional doppleganger. Even Travolta,
in a interview for "George" magazine, said, "You have to be dead not to
see that the film favors Clinton."
"Primary Colors" can be seen as favoring Clinton because it shifts the
focus (or more accurately, blame) off the individual and puts it on the
political system. The movie goes to great pains to ensure we see it is
the system that is truly corrupt, and Stanton himself is simply a flawed
human being caught up in it and forced to play by its rules. When Henry
is threatening to quit at the end of the film, it's not because he's
tired of Stanton's morally reprehensible behavior and constant lying,
but because he's tired of playing "the game."
As "Primary Colors" makes clear, the blame lies with the cynical media
and the disaffected public at large, which is more interested in the
hair length of the candidate's wife than the candidate himself. The
movie portrays Stanton as an imperfect, but nonetheless decent and
caring man who has to work within a system of mud-slinging, back
stabbing, and constant spin control in order to achieve a greater good.
Of course, this is hardly a hidden agenda. Nichols has said in
interviews, "It's about our process, and where we've brought it and it's
brought us."
The problem with the movie-version of "Primary Colors" is that it never
seems very sure of where it stands. The book was explicit in its
indictment of Clinton (or his clone or whatever), but the movie, while
keeping most of the storyline the same and many of the scenes literally
verbatim, still manages to tiptoe around the issue of personal
responsibility. When Stanton is informed that a 17-year-old black girl
is claiming he is the father of her unborn child, he slams the wall and
says, "I just can't get a break, can I?" Never mind that he did sleep
with her and the child could very well be his (according to the book, it
is his, but the movie never makes it clear). The movie portrays this
situation as just another piece of tabloid garbage intended to derail
him. With the exact same dialogue, this could have been a thoroughly
satirical scene, but it just doesn't play out in that manner.
Another problem with the film is its dramatic structure and how it
develops the relationships between its characters. The film makes a
point to keep the marriage between Jack and Susan confusing and
ill-defined. Since the story is told through the eyes of Henry, I
suppose it's impossible to know completely what's going on between the
candidate and his wife since he's not privy to their private
conversations. Still, it makes for frustrating viewing because we never
know for sure if they still love each other, or if they're just playing
the game for the sake of politics.
However, some of the most egregious character development occurs between
the campaign staffers. For instance, twice we see Henry and Daisy in bed
together, although it does nothing to serve the story. Nothing is
suggested beforehand that they might sleep together, and the
relationship is never carried through to any kind of conclusion. A
similar situation happens between Libby (who's a lesbian), and a young,
attractive campaign volunteer played by Stacy Edwards (who was so
brilliant in "In the Company of Men"). Libby comes into the office,
tells some other staffers that she wants this particular volunteer
working for her, and the next thing we know, they're living together in
a loving, sexual relationship. Hello? Where did that come from and what
purpose does it serve?
However, despite these failures, "Primary Colors" has some truly funny
moments and interesting insight into the political process. Its
indictment of the mass media is sometimes effective, although it's a
tired, worn-out accusation that newspapers and television are behind all
the world's ills. Although the movie skillful depicts the dangers,
pitfalls, and all-around messiness of running for public office in this
country, it seems as a whole to be little more than another nail in the
coffin of personal responsibility.


Title
Review for Clockwork Orange, A (1971)
Director: Stanley Kubrick
Screenplay: Stanley Kubrick (based on the novel by Anthony Burgess)
Stars: Malcolm McDowell (Alex DeLarge), Patrick Magee (Frank Alexander),
Michael Bates (Chief Guard), Warren Clarke (Dim), James Marcus
(Georgie), Michael Tarn (Pete), Aubrey Morris (P.R. Deltoid)
MPAA Rating: R
Review: **** (out of ****)
Dehumanization is at the heart of almost every film by Stanley Kubrick,
but none so much as his masterfully disturbing and ultimately edifying
"A Clockwork Orange." What makes it is troublesome is not the violence
itself, but the film's suggestion that violence is an inherently human
characteristic, and to take that potential away from someone is to, in
effect, make him less than human. That's hardly a pleasant thought, and
you have to wonder if it's the theme of this film, not so much the
actions portrayed on screen, that generated such controversy when it was
first released in 1971.
Through a first person narrative, the film traces the adventures of its
hero Alex DeLarge (Malcolm McDowell), and his gang of Droogs (Warren
Clarke, James Marcus, and Michael Tarn). The film is set in England in
the near future -- a future which vaguely reflects our own, but it seems
that society has started to crumble, and at night the streets are
overrun with teenage gangs who run free of parental control. According
to the original novel by Anthony Burgess, Alex is only 15 years old
(although McDowell as 26 when he played him), which adds an additionally
disturbing dimension to his antics because he is at such a young and
customarily vulnerable age.
The first half hour of the film is a relentless portrayal of a typical
night for Alex's gang. They start off in the Korova milk bar, drinking
drug-laced milk that "sharpens them up for a bit of the old
ultraviolence." After leaving, they happen upon a drunk beggar who they
first ridicule, then beat senseless. They later happen upon a rival
group in the midst of raping a woman, and a gang fight ensues. Still
restless and looking for something to do, Alex and company steal a car,
break into a the isolated home of Frank Alexander (Patrick Magee), and
rape his wife in front of him. Even then, they still go back to the milk
bar for a few more drinks before going home at dawn and sleeping through
school.
Kubrick presents the violence in a dizzying, heightened fashion that
makes it alarmingly attractive. With close, hand-held camera shots, he
invites us to join Alex in raping and pillaging to show that violence
and power are inherently attractive. Alex is like the Freudian id
running free, and that pulls at something in all of us, making this film
all the more uncomfortable because you find yourself sympathizing with
such a morally repugnant person.
Alex's twisted life seems safe and secure, until one night his Droogs
double cross him when he's breaking into a woman's home. During an
attempted rape, he accidentally kills the woman with a giant phallic
statue, and his friends leave him for the police. He is subsequently
arrested, spit on and beat by the cops, and sentenced to prison.
While in prison, he hears of a new reform treatment, and willing to do
anything to get out of the suffocating world of prison life where he can
only dream of violence, Alex volunteers as one of the subjects. The
experimental treatment involves his being strapped to a chair in a movie
theater with his eyes pried open with clamps. He is then given a drug
and forced to watch violent films. The drugs causes him to feel
nauseous, and therefore his body adapts so that any time he is exposed
to anything violent, he becomes sick. He is therefore conditioned
against violence, and as the government proudly points out during an
ironic stage display to prove the success of the treatment, he is the
ultimate in goodness, unable to harm a fly.
And so he is released into the world where he runs into all the people
he harassed as a young hoodlum, including the drunk beggar, the husband
of one of his rape victims, and even his old Droogs who are now corrupt
members of the police. This all feels like contrived plot conveniences,
but "A Clockwork Orange" is really more of a fable than a story. It is
devised entirely to make its point about the nature of free will, and
everything in the film is contrived to work to that end.
Of course, Alex is unable to defend himself in the evil world he helped
create, and he becomes the victim. It is both harshly ironic and
ultimately heartbreaking. He is, as Burgess coined the term, a clockwork
orange -- seemingly a healthy and vital human on the outside, but inside
he is programmed, no longer able to make choices for himself.
Kubrick is single-minded in his goal, and at times the film feels a bit
preachy, especially near the end. But the rest of the film is unnerving
and invigorating in its ability to manipulate the audience. Never has
such a vile character been so charismatic and attractive as Alex.
McDowell's performance is cunning and lethal in its sincerity. He can be
brash, funny, horrifying or sympathetic.
Kubrick never gives Alex any excuses for his behavior -- he just asks us
to accept him as is. Reasons for his behavior are never clearly
explained -- his parents are shown, but they are weak and unguiding,
easily manipulated by Alex's obvious intelligence and craftiness. A
better explanation may come from the society he was raised in, which is
slowly but surely losing its moral fiber, and becoming a military state
with no care or control of its people. The state is so desperate that it
is willing to program its citizens in order to gain control, a sure sign
that they are near the end.
"A Clockwork Orange" continues to be a powerful film, more than
twenty-five years later. The on-screen violence, while probably less
explicit than half the action films shown today, still resonates of true
horror because it is tied to a deeper meaning, not just surface
exhilaration. With its dynamic futuristic set design by John Barry,
pulsating classical music score, and striking visuals by John Alcott
(who also did Kubrick's "2001" and "Barry Lyndon"), this is one of
Kubrick's masterpieces, a film will continue to strike chords and rattle
nerves for years to come.


Title
Review for Man in the Iron Mask, The (1998)
director: Randall Wallace
screenwriter: Randall Wallace (based on the novel "L'homme au masque de
fer" by Alexandre Dumas)
stars: Leonardo DiCaprio (King Louis / Philippe), Jeremy Irons (Aramis),
John Malkovich (Athos), Gérard Depardieu (Porthos), Gabriel Byrne
(D'Artagnan), Anne Parillaud (Queen Anne), Judith Godrčche (Christine),
Edward Atterton (Lieutenant Andre), Peter Sarsgaard (Raoul)
MPAA rating: PG-13
review: ** (out of ****)
"The Man in the Iron Mask," based on the classic novel by Alexandre
Dumas, is a well-made adventure film that doesn't have much adventure.
It has a lot of beautiful French locations, a stunning A-list cast of
actors, and technical merit oozing from every corner, but it never
really grabs hold of you the way a good swashbuckling adventure should.
Maybe it has something to do with the fact that the Three Musketeers,
Aramis (Jeremy Irons), Athos (John Malkovich ), and Porthos (Gérard
Depardieu) are retired when the film opens. Or maybe it's because much
of the plot deals with intrigue and mystery rather than swordplay and
gunfights. But no, I think it's something deeper than that. There's an
underlying problem with "The Man in the Iron Mask" that keeps it from
ever being truly entertaining or rousing in the way that it should be.
Simply put, it never convinces us that it's not a costume movie.
The story takes place in France in 1662, where the spoiled young King
Louis (Leonardo DiCaprio) rules in decadent luxury while his subjects
are starving in the streets. The original Three Musketeers have retired,
leaving their fourth, D'Artagnan (Gabriel Byrne) as the head of the
Musketeers, sworn to protecting the King. Louis is a self-absorbed, evil
brat of a king, and he finally pushes the original Musketeers over the
edge when he uses one of King David's nasty tricks from the Old
Testament: he sends Athos's son, Raoul (Peter Sarsgaard) to die in the
front lines of battle so he can make off with Raoul's fiancee, Christine
(Judith Godrčche).
Although D'Artagnan refuses to betray the King, the other Musketeers
conspire to get rid of Louis. It turns out that Louis has a twin brother
that not even his mother, Queen Anne (Anne Parillaud), knows about
because she was told he died after birth. In order to maintain his
unchallenged claim to the throne, Louis had his brother, Philippe (also
played by DiCaprio) put in prison and locked inside an iron mask so no
one would know his identity. The Three Musketeers plan get rid of Louis
by breaking Philippe out of jail and switching him with the evil King.
"The Man in the Iron Mask" was adapted from the Dumas novel by
first-time director Randall Wallace, whose main claim to fame is his
Academy Award-nominated script for Mel Gibson's "Braveheart." Because of
his connection with that film -- also a period movie filled with swords,
evil royalty, and revolution -- comparisons will be inevitable. The fact
is, "Braveheart" worked brilliantly because it pulled use into the story
from its opening moments and convinced us that we were watching William
Wallace fight the English armies in the 12th century. "The Man in the
Iron Mask" never gets us to make that leap, and we are so consciously
aware that it is a period movie that it becomes impossible to be fully
engulfed by it.
Technically, the film is a marvel. Wallace assembled a team of cinematic
professionals who have worked in this kind of material before. The
production design by Anthony Pratt, who did such a brilliant job on John
Boorman's Arthurian epic "Excalibur," is as glorious in the wealth
surrounding King Louis as it is grotesque in the dingy dungeon occupied
by the prisoner of the title. The costumes were designed by James
Acheson, whose experience ranges from "Mary Shelley's Frankenstein" to
his Academy Award-winning design for "The Last Emperor."
Ironically, the movie's main drawback is the cast of Academy Award
darling actors. DiCaprio, hot off "Titanic," hits a wall from the get-go
-- he never convinces us that he's a French king. Irons, Malkovich, and
Depardieu all come off like themselves with hair extensions and
Musketeer clothing. Their performances aren't bad, they're just
inadequate for the material. Depardieu has some amusing moments as
Porthos, who is traditionally the fun-loving jokester of the group, but
Irons is too grim and Malkovich is terribly miscast as the grieving
Athos. All these actors have worked in period pieces before, but you
wouldn't know it; their acting is much too stagy to be taken seriously
on film.
Of course, some of the fault can be laid at the feet of Wallace's
dialogue, which is all too often stilted and showy. Not even an actor as
talented and multi-faceted as Gabriel Byrne can pull off a line like,
"To love you is treason to France. But not to love you is treason to my
heart." But, as bad as that sounds, at least we can take heart in the
fact that he didn't even attempt a French accent.


Title
Review for Gingerbread Man, The (1998)
Director: Robert Altman || Screenplay: Robert Altman (based on an
original story by John Grisham) || Stars: Kenneth Branagh (Rick
Magruder), Embeth Davidtz (Mallory Doss), Robert Downey Jr.
(Clyde Pell), Daryl Hannah (Lois Harlan), Robert Duvall (Dixon
Doss), Tom Berenger (Pete Randle), Famke Janssen (Leeanne), Jesse
James (Jeff), Mae Whitman (Libby) || MPAA Rating: R
Whenever writer/director Robert Altman works in a specific genre,
he has the tendency to rewrite it on his own terms. He made the
West dirty in "McCabe and Mrs. Miller" (1971), he parodied
hard-boiled detective stories in "The Long Goodbye" (1973), and
he transformed a cartoon into flesh and blood with "Popeye"
(1980). The same holds true for his most recent film, "The
Gingerbread Man," which reinvents a genre that has developed at
an exponential rate over the last five years: the John Grisham
Movie.
By the time "The Gingerbread Man" was completed, there was very
little evidence that it was ever based on a story by Grisham.
There's no idealist young lawyer ala Tom Cruise, Matthew
McConaughey, Chris O'Donnell or Matt Damon, and it doesn't
feature a great showdown in a courtroom. Instead of being a grand
ode to the powers of the legal profession, "The Gingerbread Man"
is a rain-soaked, Southern Gothic noir thriller with wildly
eccentric characters, a twisting plot line, black humor, a
somewhat bleak ending, and even Altman's trademark full-frontal
female nudity.
The central character of the film is Rick Magruder, who is unlike
any of Grisham's other lawyer heroes. He is older, experienced,
and rich; he drives a cherry-red $80,000 Mercedes that never gets
dirty, even in the incessantly pouring rain of Savannah, Georgia,
where the story unfolds. Rick is in the midst of an ugly divorce
with his wife, Leeanne (Famke Janssen), and he rarely gets to see
his two children, Jeff (Jesse James) and Libby (Mae Whitman). A
reason is never given for the divorce, but it isn't hard to
surmise that Rick's womanizing had a large part in it. Whenever
he's late to pick up the kids on his visitation days, Leeanne
always assumes it's because he's been "screwing around."
After an office party celebrating another of his court victories
(he hasn't lost in eight years), Rick becomes involved with
Mallory Doss (Embeth Davidtz), one of the catering waitresses. He
drives her home because her car has been stolen, and they end up
in bed together. Rick finds out that Mallory is being terrorized
and stalked by her slightly psychotic father, Dixon Doss (Robert
Duvall), a grungy, stringy, bare-footed old man who leads a
commune of other greasy old codgers. It was actually Dixon who
stole her car that night, and when Rick asks why, Mallory replies
that he always does "weird" stuff like that. As another character
puts it, Dixon is "a few beers short of six-pack."
Rick ends up convincing Mallory to have Dixon brought to court
and tried for competency. He succeeds with information dug up by
Clyde Pell, a private investigator friend (Robert Downey Jr.),
and testimony from Mallory's begrudging ex-husband, Pete Randle
(Tom Berenger). Dixon is put in a mental hospital, but his
commune buddies succeed in breaking him out. From there, the
story delves into kidnapping, murder, double-crossing, and even a
hurricane that adds an ominous cloud of constant violence to the
action.
Altman's cinematographer, Changwei Gu, gives the film a dark,
soaked look. If it isn't night-time, at least it's raining. Gu
shoots the interiors, which are almost all dark wood paneling,
with a minimum of light. A great deal of the action takes place
in the leafy Georgia backwoods, which Altman uses to create an
acute sense of dread and vulnerability. In the city there is
danger enough, but when Rick has to venture into the woods, you
can almost feel him leaving all hope of civilization behind as he
literally enters another world.
Altman has worked in just about every conceivable genre, from
westerns to epic dramas to comedies. But, no matter what the
genre, he is always sure to give it the Altman stamp, which
usually consists of all kinds of idiosyncratic quirks and little
details that are often missed without repeat viewings. "The
Gingerbread Man" is no different, although his style is much more
restrained here. However, without those little touches, the film
could have easily slumped into a routine action/thriller.
A great deal of the credit for the film's success can be given to
the actors, especially Branagh, who rarely works outside of
period pieces and his own direction. Here, the British actor
consistently maintains a serviceable Southern drawl, while making
an essentially contemptible character interesting and
sympathetic. Rick is an extremely flawed man, but Branaugh brings
real humanity to his character. Without it, the entire film would
fall flat because so much of it is reliant on the audience
feeling Rick's pain and frustration.
The supporting actors also put in fine performances, including
Embeth Davidtz, who is probably best known for her heart-breaking
role as the Jewish maid in "Schindler's List" (1993). Tom
Berenger provides some gruff comic relief, and Robert Duvall
spends most of his on-screen time just looking weird. It doesn't
seem like he does much because he has very little spoken
dialogue, but watch him closely during the film's one courtroom
scene: his entire performance is in his eyes and his body
language, and few actors could have pulled it off without being
either silly or overbearing.
While "The Gingerbread Man" isn't in league with Altman's
greatest works like "Nashville" (1975) or "The Player" (1992), it
is nonetheless a solid piece of genre filmmaking, which may prove
a successful vehicle to restart his somewhat lagging career. Some
critics love to stamp films like this as "commercial," as if
Altman can only maintain artistic integrity if his films are
aimed at a tiny audience and don't make money. Altman has done
something much better: he took what could have been a generic
movie, and by investing artistry and effort, he made it into
something more.


Title
Review for Big Lebowski, The (1998)
director: Joel Coen
screenwriters: Joel and Ethan Coen
stars: Jeff Bridges (The Dude), John Goodman (Walter Sobchak), Julianne
Moore (Maude Lebowski), Steve Buscemi (Donny), David Huddleston (The Big
Lebowski), John Turturro (Jesus Quintana), Peter Stormare (Nihilist),
Sam Elliott (The Stranger), Ben Gazzara (Jackie Treehorn), Tara Reid
(Bunny Lebowski)
MPAA rating: R
review: ***1/2 (out of ****)
Since their film debut in 1984 with the tightly wrought Texas thriller
"Blood Simple," Joel and Ethan Coen have been one of the most eclectic,
original, and downright fascinating creative teams in modern Hollywood.
Their films are highly stylized, deeply embedded in a particular time
and place, and their characters are more often than not everyday people
who get caught up in highly unusual circumstances.
In "The Big Lebowski," their first cinematic offering since the multiple
Academy Award-winning "Fargo," the action takes place in Los Angeles
during the Gulf War, and the hero of the story is Jeff Lebowski, aka The
Dude. The Dude is played by Jeff Bridges -- one of Hollywood's most
underrated actors -- in the best stoned performance since Sean Penn
stumbled through the halls of Ridgemont High.
The Dude is a simple man who has never quite made it out of the sixties.
He has shaggy, shoulder-length hair, a grizzled goatee badly in need of
a trim, and he wears mostly stained tee-shirts, long shorts, and gellies
without socks. He smokes a lot of pot, drinks a lot of White Russians,
and is more than content to spend the majority of his time bowling with
his two buddies, a slightly psychotic Vietnam vet named Walter Sobchak
(John Goodman) and Donny (Steve Buscemi), one of those guys who always
wants to be part of the conversation, but never quite makes it in.
One day, the Dude is confused with another Jeff Lebowski (David
Huddleston), this one being a millionaire philanthropist whose trophy
wife, Bunny (Tara Reid), owes a lot of people a lot of money. The main
plot and all its accompanying side-plots and Coenesque diatribes are far
too complicated to get into here. Suffice to say that The Dude becomes
deeply involved with the Big Lebowski when Bunny is kidnaped and The
Dude is asked to be a courier for the ransom money. By the time all is
said and done, Walter has become deeply involved, as has The Big
Lebowski's daughter, Maude (Julianne Moore), a feminist performance
artist, a pornographer named Jackie Treehorn (Ben Gazzara), and a group
of German nihilists led by Peter Stormare, who was so great as the
silent but deadly kidnaper in "Fargo."
"The Big Lebowski" plays like an amalgam of all the Coen Brothers'
earlier efforts. It shares their previous films' strong sense of time
and place, as well as their send-ups of movie genres and political and
cultural ideologies. "Lebowski" has the same kind of crazed caricatures
that made "Raising Arizona" such a hoot; it has surrealistic dream
sequences (one of which involves a Busby Berkley-like dance number) that
characterized the ending of "Barton Fink"; and it has the same kind of
cartoonish look and feel that pervaded "The Hudsucker Proxy."
The film was shot by veteran cinematographer Roger Deakins, who has
worked with the Coens on three other films, "Barton Fink," "The
Hudsucker Proxy," and "Fargo." Deakins always gives the Coens' films a
distinctive visual style, and here he does a brilliant job of capturing
the bright colors of seedy Los Angeles in the early nineties, whether
that by the obnoxious blue bowling suit worn by The Dude's main
competitor Jesus Quintana (John Turturro), or the strikingly manic dream
sequences, one of which involves the dizzy spectacle of watching a
strike from a bowling ball's point of view.
If "Fargo" was the Coen Brothers' most restrained effort in years, "The
Big Lebowski" marks their return to over-the-edge filmmaking. It is
overflowing with style and attitude, which helps make up for the
scattered plot fragments that never quite come together in the end. The
Coens fill the screen with lighting, set design, music, and hilarious
performances from all the leads, especially Bridges and the always
reliable John Goodman, who shows real comic timing in his untimely
'Nam-inspired outbursts and his intense dedication to his adopted
Judaism.
With Joel directing, Ethan producing, and both writing, the Coen
Brothers seem limitless in their capacity to turn our world inside out.
Their talent lies not in their ability to reflect the norms of reality,
but in their potential to dig out the darkest corners of life and bring
them to light. The Coens rejoice in the oddballs of the world, and they
put them center-stage to show that it's not just guys like The Dude who
are nuts, but the entire planet.


Title
Review for Misérables, Les (1998)
Director: Bille August || Screenplay: Rafael Yglesias (based on the novel by
Victor Hugo) || Stars: Liam Neeson (Jean Valjean), Geoffrey Rush (Inspector
Javert), Uma Thurman (Fantine), Claire Danes (Cosette), Reine Brynolfsson
(Beauvoir), Hans Matheson (Marius) || MPAA Rating: PG-13
For those who have seen the Broadway musical version of "Les Misérables" (and
after more than a decade of performances, I know there are many of you out
there), Bille August's film rendition of Victor Hugo's sweeping French novel
will seem very familiar. The screenplay, by novelist Rafael Yglesias
("Fearless"), follows almost the exact same trajectory as the musical, which
maintains the major plot points of Hugo's 1862 novel, but pares away many of the
subplots and political dimensions.
At roughly two hours and twenty minutes, "Les Misérables" feels much longer than
it actually is. The story itself spans almost three decades and numerous major
characters, but that is not why the film feels long. Instead, it is because
August never manages to build any real momentum or urgency to pull the story
along- it's more like he wades through it, moving from one set-piece to the next
with deliberate care. There are few moments of real tension and little comic
relief; although the movie is beautifully filmed and performed with vigor and
intensity by the principle actors, "Les Misérables" never really gets going.
The story begins in France around 1815. Liam Neeson stars as Jean Valjean, a man
who has just been released from nineteen years of prison for stealing a loaf of
bread. At this point he is a gruff, bitter man; he repays a kind priest who
offers him food and shelter by stealing his silver. When the priest forgives him
and allows him to keep the silver, Valjean decides to become a new man. He
breaks his parole and assumes another identity, later becoming a successful
factory owner and the mayor of a small town.
However, Valjean's past is always following close behind him in the form of the
relentless Inspector Javert (Geoffrey Rush), an inhuman, no-nonsense police
official who remembers Valjean from his days in prison. Javert is the kind of
man who lives only within the strict parameters of the law. There is no gray
area, no room for negotiation or mercy. Even though Valjean has turned his life
around and treats all his workers with dignity and respect, Javert sees him as
only one thing: a convict who has broken his parole and is therefore subject to
punishment.
Most of the film details Valjean's lifelong quest to live in peace without
Javert discovering him. Things become complicated when Valjean takes on the
responsibility of Cosette (Claire Danes), the young daughter of Fantine (Uma
Thurman), one of his factory workers. After being fired for having a child out
of wedlock, Fantine is reduced to prostitution in order to make money. Valjean
attempts to rescue her from her miserable condition, but she eventually becomes
sick and dies, leaving him with Cosette. In an attempt to escape Javert's
pursuit, Valjean raises Cosette in a Parisian convent.
When the teenage Cosette falls in love with a young student revolutionary named
Marius (newcomer Hans Matheson), Valjean's existence is again put into peril.
While investigating Marius, Javert discovers Valjean's new identity. Their paths
become crossed during the Parisian student revolutions following the death of
the last sympathetic government leader, General Lamarque. (For those not up on
their French history, some portions of the film may be a bit confusing.)
"Les Misérables" is considered one of the greatest novels of all time, but at
more than 1,400 pages in length, it represents a daunting task for a movie
adaptation. Hugo was a fervent political activist, and much of the novel was
written as a fierce political statement. However, the majority of the political
dimension is lost in the transformation to the big screen, and what is left is
essentially a cinematic human drama, which has its ups and downs.
The best aspect of the film is the antagonistic relationship between Valjean and
Javert. Neeson gives Valjean a bold, powerful, yet noble presence. You can truly
feel that this man has a good heart, and the constant persecution he endures is
sometimes painful. On the other side, Geoffrey Rush - in his first starring role
since winning the Oscar for "Shine" (1996) - is outstanding as the rigid
Inspector Javert, whose strict enforcement of the law is really a perversion of
it. Rush is cunning, harsh, and unsmiling in his performance, although he gives
Javert just enough humanity that the audience can feel some pity for him at the
end.
On the down side, the romance between Cosette and Marius is woefully
underdeveloped. Their relationship seems more plot necessity than an integral
aspect of the story's thematic development. It might have been better if August
had trimmed the beginning of the film to allow more narrative expansion at the
end, instead of cramming so much into the last thirty minutes. As Cosette,
Claire Danes is never truly effective because she doesn't get enough screen time
to make her character sympathetic - she comes off as kind of a brat. This is
unfortunate because the way her romance with Marius plays out in the movie, it's
puppy love, not worthy of the noble Valjean's destruction.
"Les Misérables" does get a good boost from its outstanding technical qualities,
including beautiful cinematography by Jörgen Persson and gritty production
design by Anna Asp, both of whom worked with August on "Smilla's Sense of Snow"
(1997). However, the battle scenes at the barricade between the student
revolutionaries and Javert's army are quick and seemingly inconsequential,
despite the bloodshed. The intense realism of Hugo's prose is almost entirely
lost at what should have been the grand climax. Instead, it is undermined by
August's apparent rush to bring the film to its conclusion.


Title
Review for Gummo (1997)
Director: Harmony Korine / Screenwriter: Harmony
Korine / Stars: Jacob Reynolds (Solomon), Nick
Sutton (Tummler), Jacob Sewell (Bunny Boy), Darby
Dougherty (Darby), Chloe Sevigny (Dot), Max
Perlich (Cole), Carisa Bara (Helen), Linda Manz
(Solomon's Mom) / MPAA Rating: R / Review: No
Stars (out of ****).
Rest assured, it is never too late for the
cinematic medium to hit a new low.
The bottom rung of the moviegoing ladder, which
has been littered with such lonely disgraces as
"Caligula" (1980) and "I Spit On Your Grave"
(1978), must now  make room for "Gummo," the
atrocious and horrendously pretentious new "film"
from Harmony Korine. Apparently, Korine needed
more than the fifteen minutes of fame he garnered
for writing the screenplay for "Kids" (1995),
Larry Clark's effective, but overpraised
examination of disillusioned youth in New York
City.
"Gummo" represents everything that can possibly be
bad about a movie. It revels in the filth and
squalor of the worst variations of human
existence, without giving any true insight or
understanding about the predicaments of its
pathetic characters. Some have (laughably) called
the movie an attack on bourgeois taste and values,
but one doesn't need to look so high. "Gummo" is
an all-out assault on fundamental human decency,
and worst of all, it's not funny, interesting, or
in the least bit entertaining. It has a sort of
curious shock value for all of ten minutes, then
it just bogs down into its own rut of
grotesqueries.
The movie is filled with slightly related
vignettes that take place in the small,
dilapidated town of Xenia, Ohio, all of whose
residents are either uneducated rednecks, morally
depraved children, or the mentally incapacitated.
"Gummo" opens with shaky home video footage of a
tornado that hit Xenia in 1974, which I suppose is
intended to explain why the town is a spiritual
wasteland -- the tornado must have blown away all
forms of intellect, decency, and humanity.
Throughout the film's seemingly endless duration,
we are introduced to several recurring characters
going about their sad, daily routines. First we
see Bunny Boy (Jacob Sewell), a scrawny,
bare-chested youth who wears pink rabbit ears on
his head (Why? you might ask. Why not?). During
the opening credits we get to watch him pissing
and spitting off a bridge onto the cars below him.
How insightful.
Then we move on to Solomon (Jacob Reynolds) and
Tummler (Nick Sutton), two freakish-looking
teenagers who ride their bikes around the
neighborhood, looking for stray cats to kill and
sell to the local restaurant supplier. Solomon is
a short kid with a head and face that look two
sizes too big for his body. Tummler, who is tall
and lanky with peach-fuzz sideburns, is played by
Nick Sutton, who Korine first saw on an episode of
"Sally Jesse Raphael" about kids who sniff spray
paint.
I think everybody associated with "Gummo" has been
sniffing a lot of spray paint, especially the
self-professed 23-year-old "artist" responsible
for writing and directing it. Of course, Korine is
not content to sit behind the camera (even though
his name appears three time larger than any one
else's during the opening credits), so he appears
in one pathetic scene as a drunken kid making
clumsy, homosexual advances on a black dwarf. The
movie also features several people who are
mentally challenged in some way, including one
girl with Down's Syndrome and another woman who is
rented out by her husband (Max Perlich) as a
prostitute to the neighborhood kids.
The most sickening thing about "Gummo" is not what
transpires on-screen; there have been other movies
far more repugnant than this one (try Pasolini's
"Salo"), and it really isn't good enough to be
morally reprehensible. What makes the film so
nauseating is Korine's pretension that this is
some kind of new art form that he has privileged
us with. You only need to hear him in one
interview to understand how full of himself he
really is.
Just as a sampling, here are his thoughts on film
schools, which incidentally have produced such
real filmmakers as Martin Scorsese, Oliver Stone,
Francis Ford Coppola, and Steven Spielberg: "I
hate that shit. It's eating the soul of cinema.
Filmmaking has become like a process, and it's all
garbage. All these rich kids who were going to be
doctors now want to be filmmakers, but they have
very little life experience and they're just
writing really shitty wit for each other."
According to Korine, "Gummo" represents a "new
kind of film with a new kind of syntax." That
statement is about as ridiculous as the fact that
producer Cary Woods (who actively defends the
film) actually managed to scrape together $1.3
million to get this film made.
For those under the misconception that they're
seeing something original or groundbreaking in
"Gummo," that Korine has somehow recaptured "the
soul of cinema," let me clear a few things up.
Todd Browning learned the value of using human
oddities for cinematic shock value way back in
1932 when he made "Freaks." "Boldly" mixing film
stocks is nothing new. John Schlesinger did that
back in 1969 with "Midnight Cowboy," and Oliver
Stone has been making it his stock and trade for
the last decade. And making fun of poor white
trash has been a staple of television talk shows
and tabloid newspapers for years. Even the
gross-out factor is old. John Waters pioneered
that back in '72 with "Pink Flamingos," and at
least he was smart enough to do it with a sense of
humor.
Korine once said about moviegoing, "I want to feel
hatred, disgust, anything but boredom." I assume
that this was the major imperative behind making
"Gummo," which says much about him as a filmmaker.
What it says is this: he is incapable of
alleviating boredom without being disgusting and
repulsive, which points not only to a fundamental
lack of true creative energy, but to a really sick
mind.
I suppose we can all take comfort in the fact
that, even at its minimal budget, "Gummo" still
bombed at the box office and lost money, so maybe
it will be a long time before anyone funds another
one of Korine's so-called films. Let's hope so.

Title
Review for RoboCop (1987)
director: Paul Verhoeven
screenwriter: Edward Neumeier and Michael Miner
stars: Peter Weller (Alex J. Murphy / RoboCop), Nancy Allen (Anne
Lewis), Ronny Cox (Dick Jones), Kurtwood Smith (Clarence J. Boddicker),
Miguel Ferrer (Robert Morton), Robert Doqui (Sgt. Reed), Dan O'Herlihy
(The Old Man), Ray Wise (Leon Nash), Felton Perry (Johnson)
MPAA rating: R
Review: **** (out of ****)
When "RoboCop" first premiered in 1987, it looked like just another
gimmicky sci-fi thriller quickly thrown together to make a couple of
bucks before hitting the video shelves and falling into obscurity. It
was directed by Paul Verhoeven, then an unknown director who had made a
few art films in his native Holland. "RoboCop" looked cheesy all over,
from the poster design, to the tag line ("Part man. Part machine. All
cop"), to the goofy title.
However, when audiences went to see it, they were surprised to find an
extremely well-made, often humorous comic book revenge fantasy with an
underlying subtext of constant satirical jabs at American corporate
domination and capitalism in general. A hybrid of B-movies, video games,
and societal satire, "RoboCop" was much more than it appeared on the
surface. It has only been through the passage of time and subsequent
viewings that all its subtleties have fully emerged.
"RoboCop" takes place some time in the near future in Detroit, the city
whose massive steel mills once stood for the grand possibilities of
American manufacturing power. However, when the film opens, Detroit is
sagging. Riddled by crime and lagging in industrial output, the city has
become so pathetic that it has turned to a private corporation, Omni
Consumer Products (OCP), to manage the police departments.
OCP, run by a serious old businessman referred to only as The Old Man
(Dan O'Herlihy), is in the midst of its own struggles. Here, "RoboCop"
take a pointed look at the battlefield that is American business by
focusing on the intensifying battle between Dick Jones (Ronny Cox), an
older vice president who is losing his edge, and Richard Morton (Miguel
Ferrer), the hotshot young executive who wants to take his place at any
cost.
Jones' solution to Detroit's crime problem is a massive militaristic
robot, ED-209, which is brought to life with stunning stop-motion
animation by Phil Tippett ("Return of the Jedi," "Jurassic Park").
Unfortunately, in one the movie's funniest and goriest scenes, ED-209
goes berserk in the boardroom during a demonstration in disarming
technique, and turns a volunteering executive into Swiss cheese. Morton
doesn't waste a moment, jumping right into the fray and offering up his
RoboCop contingency program. "I'm sure we can have prototype ready in 90
days," he declares.
The man who eventually becomes that first RoboCop prototype is a
policeman named Alex Murphy (Peter Weller), a good-hearted family man
who happens to be in the wrong place at the wrong time. He and his
partner, Anne Lewis (Nancy Allen), attempt to foil a robbery heist
masterminded by evil crime lord and gleeful cop killer Clarence
Boddicker (Kurtwood Smith). Murphy and Lewis track Boddicker and his
gang back to an abandoned steel mill, and although Lewis escapes alive,
Murphy is captured by the sadistic gang of thugs. After a prolonged
torture in which his hand is blown off and he is shot repeatedly with
shotguns, Murphy is killed with a bullet to the head.
This entire sequence is filmed in bloody, graphic violence, and it is a
major turning point that defies all expectations and puts the audience
on edge for the remainder of the film. Until this moment, the tone of
"RoboCop" had been fairly light-hearted and downright comical at times,
especially during its satires of commercial television. Verhoeven said
he intentionally filmed Murphy's death in such graphic detail for two
reasons. First, he wanted the audience to sympathize with Murphy,
because he dies only thirty minutes into the film after being into only
a few previous scenes, hardly enough for the audience to understand his
character. Secondly, Verhoeven wanted the murder to serve as a kind of
Christ-like crucifixion, with Murphy then resurrected as RoboCop.
(Verhoeven is very intent on the Christ allegorical aspect of the film,
but I feel it's a bit of stretch).
When Murphy is pronounced dead at the hospital, his body is given over
to OCP to become the first RoboCop prototype. By combining the remains
of his body with a massive, technological suit of body armor and
computer chips, Murphy is transformed into a bullet-proof cyborg law
enforcement officer. The only problem is that OCP didn't manage to erase
his mind completely, and he is left with trace memories of his now lost
family and, even more importantly, the vile gangsters that murdered him
in his previous life.
In this way, "RoboCop" becomes a film about identity. Murphy is now part
man and part machine; but he is fully neither, and therein lies the
tragedy. He is caught between two worlds-- the flesh and the iron.
Indeed, he is caught in the crux of other vexing situations as well,
including the dilemma between enforcing the law while existing as the
creation of a corrupt private company that has vested interest in his
not doing his job.
"RoboCop" is a hard movie to pin down simply because it is so many
things. It is intensely violent (over two minutes of footage had to be
cut to avoid an "X" rating), but it is also quite funny. The humor is
sometimes elevated and satirical, and can't be completely grasped on the
first viewing. But other times it is bawdy, cheap humor, such as a
commercial advertising a board game called "Nuke 'Em" (much of the humor
is directed specifically at 80's social problems).
The movie is greatly aided by fine performance by all the actors. It is
easy to overlook Peter Weller as the title character because he spends
most of the film encased in a metal suit. But, like the great silent
performances, his is mostly body language. When, at the end of the film,
his helmet is removed and we see his face again, he makes it a great
melodramatic moment with his sad, dour eyes. When we finally get to see
the two halves -- Murphy and RoboCop -- coming together, it has a
disarming, mystical quality about it.
Like many crime films, "RoboCop" relies a great deal on its villains,
and Kurtwood Smith is simply great as the maniacal Boddicker. With his
receding hairline, intellectual glasses, and sneering grin, he is evil
personified in an ambitious street hoodlum. In every scene he occupies,
Smith chews the scenery with psychotic glee, and many of his lines were
improvised during filming. His character is frightening simply because
he always seems to be in such command of everything around him. He is
the ringleader in the gruesome killing of Murphy, so when RoboCop gets
to throw him through a number of plate-glass windows and reduce him to a
sobbing wimp, it's a guilty pleasure to watch.
Of course, the other star of the film is director Paul Verhoeven, who
quickly rose in the ranks after "RoboCop." He solidified his position
three years later with the Arnold Schwarzegger vehicle "Total Recall,"
and then entered American film lore forever with his two sexy
sleazefests "Basic Instinct" and "Showgirls."
However one feels about his later output, it's hard to deny that
Verhoeven's talents are on full display here. He never allows the
audience to get fully settled because the tone switches so easily from
humor to melodrama to adventure to gruesome violence. And, despite these
drastically varying elements, Verhoeven manages to keep it all rolled up
into one slick package that constantly plunges ahead.


Title
Review for Wild Things (1998)
Director: John McNaughton
Screenwriter: Stephen Peters
Stars: Kevin Bacon (Ray Duquette), Matt Dillon (Sam Lombardo), Neve
Campbell (Suzie Toller), Theresa Russell (Sandra Van Ryan), Denise
Richards (Kelly Van Ryan), Daphne Rubin-Vega (Gloria Perez), Carrie
Snodgress (Ruby), Jeff Perry (Bryce Hunter), Robert Wagner (Tom Baxter),
Bill Murray (Ken Bowden)
MPAA Rating: R
Review: *** (out of ****)
Making good sleaze is more difficult than you would expect, and "Wild
Things" is one of the best sleaze movies to come out since "Basic
Instinct."
Director John McNaughton, who first came on the scene in 1989 when he
stunned audiences with his ultra-low budget shocker "Henry: Portrait of
a Serial Killer," lets "Wild Things" be exactly what it should be: a
twisting, luridly depraved Southern noir tale of sex, scandal, and
devious plotting. It doesn't make the "Showgirls" mistake of taking
itself too seriously, but neither does it take the John Waters route of
sinking into complete camp. The movie resides somewhere in the middle,
making it amusing, shocking, erotic, and inarguably absorbing, all at
the same time.
Because plot secrets are so important to making "Wild Things" an
enjoyable experience, I will only reveal what happens during the first
half-hour.
Sam Lombardo (Matt Dillon) is a handsome high school guidance counselor
in the small, rich community of Blue Bay, Florida (the town's name
itself seems to drip of sex). Kelly Van Ryan (Denise Richards), a
beautiful high school seductress with thick lips and a thoroughly
aerobicized body, has had her eye on Lombardo for several years. Kelly
is the daughter of Sandra Van Ryan (Theresa Russell), an elitist rich
slut who has her own past with Lombardo. Kelly's father, a real estate
tycoon, had committed suicide a year earlier, leaving Kelly and Sandra
living in the lap of luxury.
One day, Kelly comes over to Lombardo's house to wash his car for a
community service project. She and girlfriend flirt shamelessly outside
by spraying each other with hoses, all of which is filmed by McNaughton
like a "Playboy" video. Kelly comes into Lombardo's house, dripping wet,
with that look in her eye. The screen fades to black, and when we
next see her, she is walking out of Lombardo's house, looking somewhat
disheveled and very perturbed. What happened in there?
Kelly answers that question by accusing Lombardo of rape. Police
detective Ray Duquette (Kevin Bacon) and his partner, Gloria Perez
(Daphne Rubin-Vega) begin to look into the case, but they have
suspicions that Kelly is fabricating the story. That is, until Suzie
Toller (Neve Campbell), a  another senior at Blue Bay High who happens
to be from the wrong side of the tracks, accuses Lombardo of raping her
a year earlier. It seems to be a closed case, because the stories Kelly
and Suzie tell are extremely similar, and it has already been
established that they are enemies at school, so they couldn't have
conspired together.
The case goes to court, with Bill Murray in an amusing supporting role
as Lombardo's cut-rate attorney. Things go hay-wire at the trial, and
from there "Wild Things" spins down a spiral of deceit, murder, and
double- and triple-crosses of all parties involved. By the time it is
arriving at its conclusion, we don't know who or what to trust anymore
because we've been so thoroughly spun around. "Wild Things" is the kind
of movie where the question isn't who's innocent and who's guilty, but
who's guilty of what. It gets so complicated that McNaughton includes
bit scenes during the credits that flesh out the explanation of how it
all transpired.
The screenplay, by Stephen Peters, is tightly written and offers more
surprises that three other movies put together. Because the script has
no shame and no pretensions, McNaughton is free to take the material to
its limits. A script like this deserves the full treatment, and
McNaughton comes through; any time he has the chance to be overtly
sexual or leeringly sensationalistic, like Paul Verhoeven before him, he
goes for it. And who can blame him? The story is screaming out for it
(when co-producer and star Bacon first read it, he described as "the
trashiest piece of crap" he had ever read). "Wild Things" isn't asking
to be legitimized; it's just good old-fashioned, nasty fun.
The A-list cast in both main and supporting roles gives "Wild Things" a
little more stamina than a straight-to-video release with a group of
no-names (although the material is roughly the same). Dillon, although a
little too sexy and handsome to be taken for a high school counselor, is
nonetheless effective in his role. Our sympathies are with him from the
outset, and it is exactly those emotions that come into play later.
Richards, who had previously been seen battling giant bugs in "Starship
Troopers," proves here that she is an actress of decidedly limited
range. I would be surprised to see her career reach great heights.
However, she can act thoroughly sultry and seductive without losing the
appearance that she is a 17-year-old with far too much experience, which
is essential to the story's success. Too many "teenagers" in movies look
like they're 28.
And, for those who are used to Neve Campbell in her role on "Party of
Five" or even in the two "Scream" movies, watch out. Her portrayal of a
drug-addled loser with too much black eye-make-up (Hollywood's new
calling card for troubled girls) is an eye-opener, especially in its
physical elements (remember that just because her contract has a
no-nudity clause, that doesn't rule out other things . . .)
To sum up, if you're easily offended, stay away from "Wild Things."
However, if you don't mind a little bit of artful sleaze every once in a
while, you can't do much better.


Title
Review for Men with Guns (1997/II)
Director: John Sayles || Screenplay: John Sayles || Stars: Federico Luppi (Dr.
Fuentes), Damián Delgado (Domingo, the Soldier), Dan Rivera González (Conejo,
the Boy), Tania Cruz (Graciela, the Mute Girl), Damián Alcázar (Padre Portillo,
the Priest), Mandy Patinkin (Andrew), Kathryn Grody (Harriet), Iguandili López
(Mother), Nandi Luna Ramírez (Daughter), Rafael de Quevedo (General) || MPAA
Rating: R
John Sayles' "Men With Guns" is about what happens to a society when brute force
and constant threat of violence are the only means of gaining and maintaining
power.
The film takes place in an unnamed Central American country, where the men with
guns are the rulers. Most of the country is divided into tiny segments - some
are controlled by guerrillas with guns, some are controlled by Army soldiers
with guns, and all the spaces in-between are controlled by thieves, bandits, and
terrorists. All people not fitting one of those descriptions are defined only by
their powerlessness.
However, like so many Central American countries, this one also features
modernity. There is an unnamed capital city that bears all the hallmarks of
contemporary civilization: skyscrapers, hospitals, televisions, highways, etc.
But, it might as well be in another country because those who live in the
comforts of the city have either decided to ignore the violence ravaging the
rest of the land, or else they are simply ignorant of it.
The film's main character, Dr. Fuentes (Federico Luppi) falls into the latter
category. One of his patients, an Army general, describes him as the most
educated man he has ever met, and also the most naive. Fuentes is a true
liberal, a caring man who thinks he can cure the ills of his country by fighting
bacteria and ignorance among the indigenous Indians. With government assistance,
he has trained a large group of eager young medical students and sent them into
the rainforest to cure and educate. This program was to be his legacy, and he
repeats over and over that it was a good idea.
However, when he ventures into that same rainforest to visit his protégés, he
finds that things have not turned out as he has envisioned. As he travels deeper
into the forest, going from village to village, the story is always the same:
the doctors were all killed by either the guerrillas or the Army soldiers,
usually for helping the other. When Dr. Fuentes asks a village woman why the
Army killed one of the doctors, she replies simply, "Because they had guns, and
we didn't." Rational science and all its attempts to cure have been wiped out by
the men with guns, because others' sickness and ignorance helps them maintain
power.
Dr. Fuentes picks up several companions during his journey, all of whom are
characterized by their loss. First, there is a young boy named Conejo (Dan
Rivera González), who has neither a mother nor a father. Next, Fuentes crosses
paths with a thief named Domingo (Damián Delgado), who deserted the Army because
he was tired of being jeered into committing murderous atrocities. Through his
ordeal in the Army, Domingo has lost most of his self-respect, and defines
himself only by his pistol.
Along the way, the group also picks up Padre Portillo (Damián Alcázar), a priest
who has lost his faith. As Domingo is running from the Army, so is Portillo - he
has been labeled a guerrilla sympathizer, and ran away from the village in which
he was preaching. Last, the group takes on a mute girl named Graciela (Tania
Cruz), who hasn't spoken since she was raped two years earlier, her innocence
and even her will to live forcefully taken from her.
Sayles two major strengths as a director - characters and setting - are
abundantly evident in "Men With Guns." (Like many of his films, Sayles might
have tightened this one somewhat in the editing room, but a
longer-than-necessary running time is a sin almost always committed when the
director is also the editor.) He creates fascinating, complex characters,
especially Dr. Fuentes and Domingo. Their uneasy relationship is also somewhat
humorous in context of the film's overarching theme of violence as power -
Domingo's attempts to control Fuentes with his revolver are constantly
undermined by Fuentes' belief that the revolver is unloaded (at first it is, but
later is isn't).
The setting is also as thick with detail as the rainforest itself. Sayles knows
how to bring a location to life, whether it be an early twentieth-century coal
mining town in "Matewan" (1987) or a contemporary Texas/Mexico bordertown in
"Lone Star" (1996). Sayles is not a particularly inventive director - he likes
to let his actors do most of the work - but he and cinematographer Slavomir
Idziak ("Gattaca") successfully evoke both the beauty and the danger of the
Central American terrain.
Sayles also maintains a strong sense of authenticity by filming everything on
location in Mexico, using all Latin American actors, and having all the dialogue
spoken in either Spanish or native Indian dialects. The one exception is a
couple of bumbling American tourists who work not only as comic relief, but as
evidence of just how clueless the United States is about what is going on a few
hundred miles south of the Texas border.
It would not be a stretch to say that "Men With Guns" is a depressing film. In
fact, the two feelings it evokes most are hopelessness and failure. In addition
to loss, the main characters are also failures at something, whether that be Dr.
Fuentes failure to change anything through medicine, or Padre Portillo's
inability to stand up and be the martyr he always dreamed of being.
Nevertheless, it is bleak material Sayles has chosen, and he deals with it
accordingly. The last shot of the film does offer a hint of hope, even in a
world where, as one character puts it, "Nobody refuses the men with guns."

